Table of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
_____________________________________________________________ 
FORM 10-K
☒ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022
or
☐TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period from              to             
Commission File Number: 0-14338
_____________________________________________________________  
AUT ODESK, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware  94-2819853
(State or other jurisdiction
of incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. employer
Identification No.)
111 McInnis Parkway,
San Rafael, California 94903
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (415) 507-5000
 _____________________________________________________________ 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each classTrading
Symbol(s)Name of each exchange
on which registered
Common Stock, $0.01 Par Value ADSK The Nasdaq Global Select Market
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
_____________________________________________________________ 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐ 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (“Exchange
Act”).    Yes    ☐    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act during the preceding 12
months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90
days.    Yes  ☒    No    ☐  
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation
S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such
files).    Yes  ☒  No    ☐  
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or an emerging
growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filerx Accelerated filer  ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐ Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐  
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over
financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.
☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined by Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).    Yes    ☐     No  ☒
As of July 30, 2021, the last business day of the registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter, there were approximately 219.7 million shares of the
registrant’s common stock outstanding that were held by non-affiliates, and the aggregate market value of such shares held by non-affiliates of the registrant (based on
the closing sale price of such shares on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on July 30, 2021) was approximately $70.6 billion. Shares of the registrant’s common stock
held by each executive officer and director have been excluded in that such persons may be deemed to be affiliates. This determination of affiliate status is not
necessarily a conclusive determination for other purposes.
As of March 10, 2022, the registrant had outstanding 217,307,974 shares of common stock.
1
Table of Contents
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Proxy Statement for registrant’s Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”), are incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-
K to the extent stated herein. The Proxy Statement will be filed within 120 days of the registrant’s fiscal year ended January 31, 2022.
2
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC. FORM 10-K
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
  Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 5
Item 1A. Risk Factors 16
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 34
Item 2. Properties 34
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 34
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 34
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 35
Item 6. [Reserved] 37
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 38
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 64
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 65
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 111
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 111
Item 9B. Other Information 111
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections. 112
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 113
Item 11. Executive Compensation 114
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters 114
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 114
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 114
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 115
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 115
Signatures 118
3
Table of Contents
FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
The discussion in this Annual Report on Form 10-K contains trend analyses and other forward-looking statements within the
meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-looking
statements may appear throughout this Form 10-K, including the following sections: “Business” (Part I, Item 1), “Risk Factors”
(Part I, Item 1A), and “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” (Part II, Item 7).
Forward-looking statements are any statements that look to future events and consist of, among other things, our business strategies;
future financial results (by product type and geography), operational and key metrics and subscriptions; the effects of global economic
and political conditions, including the impact of economic volatility and geopolitical activities in certain countries such as the Russian
invasion of Ukraine; the impact of the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic on our business and results of operations; the impact of
past and planned acquisitions and investment activities; expected market trends and market opportunities; our ability to successfully
expand adoption of our products; our ability to gain market acceptance of new businesses and sales initiatives; cybersecurity and
privacy issues or incidents; the effect of competition; the effect of unemployment; the availability of credit; the effects of revenue
recognition; the effects of newly recently issued accounting standards; expected trends in certain financial metrics, including
expenses; expectations regarding our cash needs and expenditures; the effects of fluctuations in exchange rates and our hedging
activities on our financial results; the effect of laws and regulations that we are subject to; the timing and amount of purchases under
our stock repurchase plan; and the effects of potential non-cash charges on our financial results and the resulting effect on our
financial results. In addition, forward-looking statements also consist of statements involving expectations regarding product
capability and acceptance, statements regarding our liquidity and short-term and long-term cash requirements, as well as statements
involving trend analyses and statements including such words as “may,” “believe,” “could,” “anticipate,” “would,” “might,”
“plan,” “expect,” and similar expressions or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These forward-looking
statements speak only as of the date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and are subject to business and economic risks. As such, our
actual results could differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements as a result of a number of factors,
including those set forth below in Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” and in our other reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission. We assume no obligation to update the forward-looking statements to reflect events that occur or circumstances that exist
after the date on which they were made, except as required by law.
4
Table of Contents
PART I
 
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Note: A glossary of terms used in this Form 10-K appears at the end of this Item 1.
GENERAL
We are a global leader in 3D design, engineering, and entertainment software and services, offering customers productive
business solutions through powerful technology products and services. We serve customers in architecture, engineering, and
construction; product design and manufacturing; and digital media and entertainment industries. Our customers design, fabricate,
manufacture, and build anything by visualizing, simulating, and analyzing real-world performance early in the design process. These
capabilities allow our customers to foster innovation, optimize their designs, streamline their manufacturing and construction
processes, save time and money, improve quality, deliver more sustainable outcomes, communicate plans, and collaborate with others.
Our professional software products are sold globally, both directly to customers and through a network of resellers and distributors.
Corporate Information
Our internet address is www.autodesk.com. The information posted on our website is not incorporated into this Annual Report
on Form 10-K. Our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments
to reports filed or furnished pursuant to Sections 13(a) and 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, are available
free of charge on the Investor Relations portion of our website at www.autodesk.com as soon as reasonably practicable after we
electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC.
PRODUCTS
Our architecture, engineering, and construction products improve the way building, infrastructure, and industrial projects are
designed, built, and operated. Our product development and manufacturing software provides manufacturers in automotive,
transportation, industrial machinery, consumer products, and building product industries with comprehensive digital design,
engineering, manufacturing, and production solutions. These technologies bring together data from all phases of the product
development and production life cycle, creating a digital pipeline that supports greater productivity, accuracy through process
automation, and insights that enable more sustainable outcomes. Our digital media and entertainment products provide tools for digital
sculpting, modeling, animation, effects, rendering, and compositing for design visualization, visual effects, games production, and
enables connection of workflows and data from post-production to pre-production. Our portfolio of products and services enables our
customers to foster innovation, optimize and improve their designs, save time and money, improve quality, communicate plans, and
collaborate with others. A summary of our revenue by geographic area and product family is found in Note 2, “Revenue Recognition,”
in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Autodesk’s product offerings include:
Architecture, Engineering and Construction (“AEC”)
•AutoCAD Civil 3D
AutoCAD Civil 3D solution provides a surveying, design, analysis, and documentation solution for civil engineering, including
land development, transportation, and environmental projects. Using a model-centric approach that automatically updates
documentation as design changes are made, AutoCAD Civil 3D enables civil engineers, designers, drafters, and surveyors to
significantly boost productivity and deliver higher-quality designs and construction documentation faster. With AutoCAD Civil 3D,
the entire project team works from the same consistent, up-to-date model so they stay coordinated throughout all project phases.
•BIM 360
BIM 360 construction management cloud-based software enables almost anytime, anywhere access to project data throughout
the building construction lifecycle. BIM 360 empowers those in the field to better anticipate and act, and those in the back office to
optimize and manage all aspects of construction performance.
5
Table of Contents
•Architecture, Engineering & Construction Collection
The AEC Collection, including AutoCAD, AutoCAD Civil3D, and Revit, aims to help our customers design, engineer, and
construct higher quality, more predictable building and civil infrastructure projects, commonly used by AEC industry experts.
•Autodesk Build
Autodesk Build delivers a connected set of project management and collaboration tools for the construction industry. Autodesk
Build provides a toolset for managing, sharing, and accessing project documents that results in streamlined workflows between the
office, trailer, and jobsite. In addition, Autodesk Build can be used to track the quality and safety of the project with issues and forms.
Team members can use Autodesk Build for requests for information (RFIs), submittals, and meetings to manage the flow of
information and track project progress across the construction timeline. The PlanGrid Build mobile app delivers field critical project
information and collaboration from Autodesk Build to the jobsite. As part of Autodesk Construction Cloud, Build connects data
originating in design and preconstruction to the construction and operations phase, allowing users to identify, manage and de-risk
project decisions.
•Revit
Revit software is built for Building Information Modeling (“BIM”) to help professionals design, build, and maintain higher-
quality, more energy-efficient buildings. Using the information-rich models created with Revit, architects, engineers, and construction
firms can collaborate to make better-informed decisions earlier in the design process to deliver projects with greater efficiency. Revit
includes features for architectural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing design as well as structural engineering and construction,
providing a comprehensive solution for the entire building project team.
AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT
•AutoCAD
AutoCAD software is a customizable and extensible CAD application for professional design, drafting, detailing, and
visualization. AutoCAD software provides digital tools that can be used independently and in conjunction with other specific
applications in fields ranging from construction and civil engineering to manufacturing and plant design.
•AutoCAD LT
AutoCAD LT software is purpose built for professional drafting and detailing. AutoCAD LT includes document sharing
capability without the need for software customization or certain advanced functionality found in AutoCAD. Users can share all
design data with team members who use AutoCAD or other Autodesk products built on AutoCAD.
Manufacturing (“MFG”)
•CAM Solutions
Our computer-aided manufacturing (“CAM”) software offers industry-leading solutions for computer numerical control
(“CNC”) machining, inspection, and modeling for manufacturing. A comprehensive line-up of expert products, including PowerMill,
FeatureCAM, PowerInspect, PowerShare, and others, help our customers manufacture complex, innovative products and components
with maximum quality, control, and production efficiency.
•Fusion 360
Fusion 360 is the first 3D CAD, CAM, and computer-aided engineering (“CAE”) tool of its kind. It connects the entire product
development process on a single cloud-based platform.
•Product Design & Manufacturing Collection
The Product Design & Manufacturing Collection offers connected, professional-grade tools that help our customers make great
products today and compete in the changing manufacturing landscape of the future. The collection offers access to a wide range of our
products, including AutoCAD, Fusion 360, Vault, and Inventor.
6
Table of Contents
•Inventor
Inventor enables manufacturers to go beyond 3D design to digital prototyping by giving engineers a comprehensive and flexible
set of tools for 3D mechanical design, simulation, analysis, tooling, visualization, and documentation. Engineers can integrate
AutoCAD drawings and model-based design data into a single digital model, creating a virtual representation of a final product that
enables them to validate the form, fit, and function of the product before it is ever built.
•Vault
Vault data management software makes it easier to manage data in one central location, accelerate design processes, and
streamline internal/external collaboration. Vault integrates with more than 30 Autodesk design applications, provides powerful
revisioning and access control capabilities, and enables customers to share product data securely to improve engineering cycle time
and reduce manufacturing errors.
Media and Entertainment (“M&E”)
•Media & Entertainment Collection
The M&E Collection provides end-to-end creative tools for entertainment creation. This collection enables animators, modelers,
and visual effects artists to access the tools they need, including Maya and 3ds Max, to create compelling effects, 3D characters, and
digital worlds.
•Maya
Maya software provides 3D modeling, animation, effects, rendering, and compositing solutions that enable film and video
artists, game developers, and design visualization professionals to digitally create engaging, lifelike images, realistic animations and
simulations, extraordinary visual effects, and full-length animated feature films.
•ShotGrid
ShotGrid is cloud-based software for review and production tracking in the M&E industry. Creative companies use the ShotGrid
platform to provide essential business tools for managers and visual collaboration tools for artists and supervisors, who often work
globally with distributed teams.
•3ds Max
3ds Max software provides 3D modeling, animation, and rendering solutions that enable game developers, design visualization
professionals, and visual effects artists to digitally create realistic images, animations, and complex scenes and to digitally
communicate abstract or complex mechanical, architectural, engineering, and construction concepts.
PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT AND INTRODUCTION
The technology industry is characterized by rapid technological change in computer hardware, operating systems, and software.
In addition, our customers’ requirements and preferences rapidly evolve, as do their expectations of the performance of our software
and services. To keep pace with these changes, we maintain a vigorous program of new product development to address demands in
the marketplace for our products, such as enabling more flexibility and sustainable outcomes.
Autodesk was founded during the platform transition from mainframe computers and engineering workstations to personal
computers. We have developed and sustained a compelling value proposition based upon software for the personal computer. Just as
the transition from mainframes to personal computers transformed the industry over 30 years ago, the software industry has undergone
a transition from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to subscriptions and cloud-enabled technologies.
Subscription plan offerings are designed to give our customers increased flexibility with how they use our products and service
offerings and to attract a broader range of customers such as project-based users and small businesses. Subscription plans represent a
combined hybrid offering of desktop software and cloud functionality which provides a device-independent, collaborative design
workflow for designers and their stakeholders. In order to offer better service to our customers, we are transitioning our existing
customers from serial numbers to named users. We
7
Table of Contents
completed the migration of our single-user subscriptions from serial numbers in fiscal 2021 and are transitioning multi-user
subscriptions to named users through February 2024.
We dedicate considerable technical and financial resources to research and development to deliver additional automation and
insights to our customers through artificial intelligence, machine learning, and generative design, which increase efficiency and
sustainability and reduce waste. These investments further enhance our existing products and create new solutions and technologies
which connect the workflows and data of our customers across the ecosystem of their projects and expand our market opportunity. Our
tools connect and automate the phases of design and creation, enabling greater collaboration and the seamless flow of data for
individuals and teams across all phases.
Our software is primarily developed internally; however, we also use independent firms and contractors to perform some of our
product development activities. Additionally, we acquire or license products and technologies developed by third parties. We
continually review these investments to ensure that we are generating sufficient revenue or gaining a competitive advantage to justify
their costs.
The majority of our research and product development is performed in the United States, China, Singapore, Canada, and the
United Kingdom. However, we employ experienced software developers in many of our other locations. Translation and localization
of our products are performed in several local markets, principally Singapore and Ireland. We generally localize and translate our
products into German, French, Italian, Spanish, Russian, Japanese, Korean, and simplified and traditional Chinese.
We plan to continue managing significant product development operations internationally over the next several years. We
believe that our ability to conduct research and development at various locations throughout the world allows us to optimize product
development, lower costs, and integrate local market knowledge into our development activities. We continually assess the significant
costs and challenges, including intellectual property protection, against the benefits of our international development activities.
For further discussion regarding risks from our product development and introduction efforts, see Item 1A, “Risk Factors.”
MARKETING AND SALES
We sell our products and services globally, primarily through indirect channels consisting of distributors and resellers. We also
transact directly with our enterprise and named account customers and with customers through our online Autodesk branded store. Our
indirect channel model includes both a two-tiered distribution structure, where distributors sell to resellers, and a one-tiered structure,
where Autodesk sells directly to resellers. We have a network of approximately 1,500 resellers and distributors worldwide. For fiscal
2022, approximately 65% of our revenue was derived from indirect channel sales through distributors and resellers.
    
We anticipate that our channel mix will continue to change, particularly as we scale our online Autodesk branded store business
and our largest accounts shift towards direct-only business models. Importantly, we expect that the majority of our revenue will
continue to be derived from indirect channel sales in the near future. We employ a variety of incentive programs and promotions to
align our reseller channel with our business strategies. Our ability to effectively distribute our products depends in part upon the
financial and business condition of our distributor and reseller networks. The loss of, or a significant reduction in, business with any
one of our major distributors or large resellers could harm our business. See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion.
Sales through our largest distributor, Tech Data Corporation and its global affiliates (collectively, “Tech Data”), accounted for
36%, 37%, and 35% of our net revenue for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Ingram Micro Inc.
(“Ingram Micro”), our second-largest distributor, accounted for 9% of Autodesk's total net revenue for fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 and 10% of total net revenue for fiscal years ended January 31, 2021 and 2020. We believe our business is not substantially
dependent on either Tech Data or Ingram Micro. Should any of the agreements between us and Tech Data or Ingram Micro be
terminated for any reason, we believe the resellers and end users who currently purchase our products through Tech Data or Ingram
Micro would be able to continue to do so under substantially the same terms from one of our many other distributors without
substantial disruption to our revenue. No other distributor, reseller, or direct customer accounted for 10% or more of our revenue.
8
Table of Contents
Our customer-related operations are divided into three geographic regions: the Americas; Europe, Middle East, and Africa
(“EMEA”); and Asia Pacific (“APAC”). Each geographic region is supported by global marketing and sales organizations. These
organizations develop and manage overall marketing and sales programs and work closely with a network of domestic and
international sales offices. We believe that international sales will continue to comprise the majority of our total net revenue. Adverse
economic conditions and currency exchange rates in the countries that contribute a significant portion of our net revenue, including
emerging economies, may have an adverse effect on our business in those countries and our overall financial performance. Our
international operations and sales subject us to a variety of risks. See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion.
We also work directly with reseller and distributor sales organizations, computer manufacturers, other software developers, and
peripherals manufacturers in cooperative advertising, promotions, and trade-show presentations. We employ mass-marketing
techniques such as webcasts, seminars, telemarketing, direct mailings, sponsorships, advertising in business and trade journals, and
social media. We have a worldwide user group organization and we have created online user communities dedicated to the exchange
of information related to the use of our products and services.
We generate revenue primarily through various offerings that provide recurring revenue. Under our subscription plan, customers
can use our software anytime, anywhere, and get access to the latest updates to previous versions through term-based product
subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and enterprise business agreements (“EBA”). Historically, we have had increased EBA sale
activity in our fourth fiscal quarter. This seasonality may not have an immediate impact on our revenue as we recognize subscription
revenue over the term of the contract. This seasonality may also affect the relative value of our billings, RPO, and collections in the
fourth and first fiscal quarters.
CUSTOMER AND RESELLER SUPPORT
We provide technical support and training to customers through a multi-tiered support model, augmented by direct programs
designed to address certain specific customer needs. Most of our customers receive support and training from the resellers and
distributors from which they purchased subscriptions or licenses for our products or services, with Autodesk in turn providing second-
tier support to the resellers and distributors. Other customers are supported directly via self-service using the Autodesk Knowledge
Network, which guides customers to answers in our online support assets, support forums, or webinars, or to support representatives
using different modalities such as social media, phone, email, and webchat. We also support our resellers and distributors through
technical product training, sales training classes, webinars, and other knowledge-sharing programs.
ENVIRONMENTAL, SOCIAL, AND GOVERNANCE PROGRAMS
Impact at Autodesk
Autodesk is committed to advancing a more sustainable, resilient, and equitable world. We don’t believe in waiting for progress,
we believe in making it. We take action as a business and to support our employees, customers, and communities in our collective
opportunity to design and make a better world for all.
We focus our efforts to advance positive outcomes across three primary areas: energy and materials, health and resilience, and
work and prosperity. These impact opportunity areas are derived from the UN Sustainable Development Goals (“SDGs”) and have
been focused through a multi-pronged process to align the top needs of our stakeholders, the important issues of our business, and the
areas we are best placed to accelerate positive impact at scale.
These opportunities manifest as outcomes through how our customers leverage our technology to design and make net-zero
carbon buildings, resilient infrastructure, more sustainable products, and a thriving workforce. We realize these opportunities in our
business through our 100% renewable and net-zero greenhouse gas operations and inclusive culture. We advance these opportunities
with industry innovators through collaboration, grants, software donations, and training.
Education
Autodesk is committed to helping fuel a lifelong passion for design and making among students of all ages, both within and
outside the classroom. We offer free educational licenses of Autodesk’s professional software to students, educators, and accredited
educational institutions worldwide. We inspire and support beginners with Tinkercad, a simple online 3D design and 3D printing tool.
Through Autodesk Design Academy, we provide secondary and post-secondary schools hundreds of standards-aligned class projects to
support design-based disciplines in Science, Technology, Engineering, Digital Arts, and
9
Table of Contents
Math (STEAM) using Autodesk’s professional-grade design, engineering, and entertainment software. Autodesk Design Academy
curricula is also syndicated on iTunes U and Udemy, where millions of students go to learn online. Classes and projects are available
on our Instructables website for anyone looking to expand their “making” skills. In November 2020, we launched a credential
program, which empowers current and future Autodesk customers to learn in-demand toolsets, skillsets, and mindsets, while earning
credentials that demonstrate their job readiness. We offer self-paced, modular learning through a range of skill levels, roles, and career
ambitions, helping professionals demonstrate and apply relevant knowledge, step into emerging roles, and stay at the forefront of their
industry. Our intention is to make Autodesk software ubiquitous and the design and making software of choice for those poised to
become the next generation of professional users.
Sustainability
Climate Change
In addressing the global challenges posed by climate change, we make it possible for our customers to innovate and respond to
associated changes in regulation, building code, physical climate parameters, and other climate-related developments. This effort can
directly and indirectly create more demand for existing and new Autodesk products and services in the short and long-term.
Furthermore, our leadership is committed to taking climate action and that commitment goes hand in hand with our values and
reputation in the marketplace. In fiscal 2022, we integrated regular analysis of various climate scenarios into our enterprise strategy
and risk processes.
Climate Change Management Actions
To drive continued progress and meet growing demand, we continue to expand the solutions, education, and support we offer,
helping customers secure a competitive advantage for a low-carbon future by designing high-performance buildings, resilient cities
and infrastructure, and more efficient transportation and products. To continue to grow this market, we provide software and support to
early-stage entrepreneurs, nonprofit organizations, and start-up companies who are designing clean technologies. We are expanding
these offerings based upon demand and opportunity in response to challenges posed by climate change.
Internally, we are investing in best practices to mitigate our greenhouse gas emissions (“GHGs”) and climate change risk through
investments in renewable energy, energy efficiency, and disaster management and recovery strategies. In fiscal year 2022, we
deployed a new sustainability financing framework to accelerate new and existing efforts in these areas. Details about this effort can
be found in our Sustainability Financing Framework on our website at www.autodesk.com. Information contained on or accessible
through our website is not part of or incorporated by reference into this report.
Emissions Performance & Other Key Performance Indicators
In fiscal year 2022, we launched our second science-based GHG reduction target, to reduce Scope 1 and Scope 2 GHGs 50%,
and reduce Scope 3 GHGs per dollar of gross profit 25%, by fiscal year 2031, compared to fiscal year 2020.
In fiscal year 2021, we attained our ongoing commitment to being net-zero emissions, and before carbon offsets, were
responsible for 126,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent across our operational, market-based, boundary. This represents a
45% reduction compared to our fiscal year 2020 base line. Our assured results for fiscal year 2022 and our ongoing commitments will
be published in our fiscal year 2022 impact report. This change in GHGs largely stemmed from changes in travel during the global
pandemic and also continued investment in renewable energy and efficiency across our footprint areas. More information about our
sustainability commitment can be found in our annual impact reports, which we have published on our website since 2008. Our fiscal
2022 impact report will be published in the second quarter of fiscal 2023.
Philanthropy
The Autodesk Foundation (the “Foundation”), a privately funded 501(c)(3) charity organization established and solely funded
by us, leads our philanthropic efforts. The purpose of the Foundation is twofold: to support employees to create a better world at work,
at home, and in the community by matching employees’ volunteer time and/or donations to nonprofit organizations; and to support
organizations and individuals using design to drive positive social and environmental impact. In the latter case, we use grant funding,
software donations, and training to accomplish this goal, selecting the most impactful and innovative organizations around the world,
thus leading to a better future for our planet. On our behalf, the Foundation also administers a discounted software donation program
to nonprofit organizations, social and environmental entrepreneurs, and others who are developing design solutions that will shape a
more sustainable future. During fiscal 2020, Autodesk committed to target 1% of annual operating margin for the long-term support of
the Autodesk Foundation.
10
Table of Contents
DEVELOPER PROGRAMS
Our business and our customers benefit from our relationships with an extensive developer network. These developers create
and sell their own interoperable products that further enhance the range of integrated solutions available to our customers. One of our
key strategies is to maintain an open-architecture design of our software products to facilitate third-party development of
complementary products and industry-specific software solutions. This approach enables customers and third parties to customize
solutions for a wide variety of highly specific uses. We offer several programs that provide strategic investment funding, technological
platforms, user communities, technical support, forums, and events to developers who develop add-on applications for our products.
For example, we created a web services platform, Autodesk Forge, which includes web services that enable software developers to
rapidly develop the next generation of applications and experiences that will power the future of making things. Forge facilitates the
development of a single connected ecosystem for integrating Autodesk applications with other enterprise, web, and mobile solutions.
COMPETITION
The markets for our products are highly competitive, are subject to rapid change, and can have complex interdependencies
between many of the larger businesses. We strive to increase our competitive separation by investing in research and development,
allowing us to bring new products to market and create exciting new versions of existing products that offer compelling efficiencies
for our customers. We also compete through investments in marketing and sales to more effectively reach new customers and better
serve existing customers.
Our competitors include large, global, publicly traded companies; small, geographically focused firms; startup firms; and
solutions produced in-house by their users. Our primary global competitors include Adobe Systems Incorporated, AVEVA Group plc,
Bentley Systems, Inc., Dassault Systèmes S.A. and its subsidiary Dassault Systèmes SolidWorks Corp., Intergraph Corporation, a
wholly owned subsidiary of Hexagon AB, MSC Software Corporation, Nemetschek AG, Oracle Corporation, Procore Technologies,
Inc., PTC Inc., 3D Systems Corporation, Siemens PLM, and Trimble Navigation Limited, among others.
The software industry has limited barriers to entry, and the availability of computing power with continually expanding
performance at progressively lower prices contributes to the ease of market entry. The industry continues to undergo a platform shift
from the personal computer to cloud and mobile computing. This shift further lowers barriers to entry and poses a disruptive challenge
to established software companies. The design software market is characterized by vigorous competition in each of the vertical
markets in which we compete, both from existing competitors and by entry of new competitors with innovative technologies.
Competition is increasingly enhanced by consolidation of companies with complementary products and technologies and the
possibility that competitors in one vertical segment may enter other vertical segments that we serve. In addition, some of our
competitors in certain markets have greater financial, technical, sales and marketing, and other resources than we do. Because of these
and other factors, competitive conditions in these industries are likely to continue to intensify in the future. Increased competition
could result in price reductions, reduced net revenue and profit margins, and loss of market share, any of which could harm our
business. See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion of risks regarding competition.
We believe that our future results depend largely upon our ability to better serve customers by offering new products, including
cloud and mobile computing products, whether by internal development or acquisition, and to continue to provide existing product
offerings that compete favorably with respect to ease of use, reliability, performance, range of useful features, continuing product
enhancements, reputation, price, and training.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY AND LICENSES
We maintain an active program to legally protect our investment in technology through intellectual property rights. We protect
our intellectual property through a combination of patent, copyright, trademark, and trade secret protections, confidentiality
procedures, and contractual provisions. The nature and extent of legal protection associated with each such intellectual property right
depends on, among other things, the type of intellectual property right and the given jurisdiction in which such right arises. We believe
that our intellectual property rights are valuable and important to our business.
Nonetheless, our intellectual property rights may not be successfully asserted in the future or may be invalidated, circumvented,
or challenged. In addition, the laws and enforcement of the laws of various foreign countries where our products are distributed do not
protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as U.S. laws. Enforcement of intellectual
11
Table of Contents
property rights against alleged infringers can sometimes lead to costly litigation and counterclaims. Our inability to protect our
proprietary information could harm our business.
From time to time, we receive claims alleging infringement of a third party’s intellectual property rights, including patents.
Disputes involving our intellectual property rights or those of another party have in the past and may in the future lead to, among other
things, costly litigation or product shipment delays, which could harm our business.
We retain ownership of software we develop. Our combined hybrid offerings include both desktop software and cloud
functionality. Desktop software is licensed to users pursuant to ‘click through’ or signed license agreements containing restrictions on
duplication, disclosure, and transfer. Cloud software and associated services are provided to users pursuant to online or signed terms of
service agreements containing restrictions on access and use.
We believe that because of the limitations of laws protecting our intellectual property and the rapid, ongoing technological
changes in both the computer hardware and software industries, we must rely principally upon software engineering and marketing
skills to continually maintain and enhance our competitive market position.
While we have recovered some revenue resulting from the unauthorized use of our software solutions, we are unable to measure
the full extent to which unauthorized use of our software products exists. We believe, however, that unauthorized use of our software
is and can be expected to be a persistent problem that negatively impacts our revenue and financial results. We believe that our
transition from perpetual use software licenses to a subscription-based business model combined with the change from desktop to
cloud-based computing will shift the incentives and means by which software is used without authorization.
In addition, through various licensing arrangements, we receive certain rights to intellectual property of others. We expect to
maintain current licensing arrangements and to secure licensing arrangements in the future, as needed and to the extent available on
reasonable terms and conditions, to support continued development and sales of our products and services. Some of these licensing
arrangements require or may require royalty payments and other licensing fees. The amount of these payments and fees may depend
on various factors, including but not limited to: the structure of royalty payments, offsetting considerations, if any, and the degree of
use of the licensed technology.
See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion of risks related to protecting our intellectual property.
PRODUCTION AND SUPPLIERS
The production of our software products and services involves duplication or hosting of software media. The way that we
deliver software has evolved during our business model transition. For certain cloud-based products, we use a combination of co-
located hosting facilities and increasingly Amazon Web Services and to a lesser degree other infrastructure-as-a-service providers. We
offer customers an electronic software download option for both initial product fulfillment and subsequent product updates. Customers
who choose electronic fulfillment receive the latest version of the software from our vendor’s secure servers. Customers may also
obtain our software through media such as DVDs and USB flash drives available from multiple sources. The purchase of media and
the transfer of the software programs onto media for distribution to customers are performed by us and by licensed subcontractors.
Packaging materials are produced to our specifications by outside sources. Production is performed in leased facilities operated by
independent third-party contractors. To date, we have not experienced any material difficulties or delays in the production of our
software and documentation.
12
Table of Contents
TALENT AND HUMAN CAPITAL MANAGEMENT
Our employees play a central role in the success of our long-term strategy. Autodesk’s Culture Code defines values and
behaviors that support our commitment to being a customer company, where each employee takes responsibility for understanding our
customers’ needs, expectations, and experiences. As of January 31, 2022, we employed approximately 12,600 people, an increase from
approximately 11,500 employees as of the end of fiscal year 2021. None of our employees in the United States are represented by a
labor union. In certain foreign countries, our employees are represented by trade unions or work councils. We have never experienced
any work stoppages and believe our employee relations are strong. Reliance upon employees in other countries entails various risks
and changes in these foreign countries, such as government instability or regulation unfavorable to foreign-owned businesses, which
could negatively impact our business in the future.
Diversity and Belonging
Autodesk is committed to building and maintaining a diverse workforce and a culture of belonging that welcomes people from
all backgrounds, perspectives, and beliefs. We have developed and embedded a holistic global Diversity and Belonging (“D&B”)
strategy into all that we do. Our D&B strategy includes a variety of activities, such as inclusive leadership training for all people
managers and senior employees, hiring manager and interview classes that include training on mitigating bias and inclusive practices,
Culture Sprints for all employees to foster belonging, and a D&B speaker series featuring leaders from a range of disciplines.
To help us build a more diverse workforce, we have continued to invest in our diversity partnerships. We partner with
educational institutions such as Hispanic-Serving Institutions and Historically Black Colleges and Universities, and professional
organizations around the globe supporting underrepresented groups in technology. We provide a variety of scholarships, internship
programs, mentoring and development partnerships, and program support to organizations focused on women and underrepresented
groups.
We also have an Emerging Leaders Program which is focused on developing a diverse cohort of leaders through professional
development, mentoring, and networking opportunities. In addition, we provide ongoing development opportunities, such as the
Autodesk Mentorship Program, which provides one-on-one mentorship relationships. Autodesk has seven employee resource groups
(“ERGs”), which are employee-led groups that bring employees together based on common backgrounds or diversity characteristics,
to foster a sense of belonging and connection.
Additional information on our D&B program, initiatives, and metrics can be found on our website at
https://www.autodesk.com/company/diversity-and-inclusion. Information contained on or accessible through our website is not part of
or incorporated by reference into this report.
Professional Development and Employee Impact
We believe career development plays an important role in keeping our employees engaged and to provide additional
opportunities to grow and build their careers. Autodesk offers extensive professional and technical development opportunities for our
employees. These include self-service online modules and personalized learning paths, professional and management development
programs, and a tuition reimbursement program.
We also encourage our employees to advance our vision for a better world and support their professional development by
participating in our pro bono consulting program, using paid time to volunteer, and have their charitable giving matched by the
Autodesk Foundation.
Total Rewards
To attract, retain, and support our highly qualified employees, we offer competitive compensation and benefits, which include
an element of choice to meet the needs of our diverse and global population. In addition to base pay and opportunities to receive short-
and long-term incentives, we have an employee stock purchase plan, and retirement and other financial support. In addition to
comprehensive health insurance and wellness benefits, we have a generous time off program, including sabbatical, financial tools and
education, and an employee assistance program. In fiscal 2021, we made changes to our equity strategy, expanding our grant program
eligibility for new hires and existing employees. As part of this strategy, we made a one-time equity grant to all regular employees
with no unvested equity to align all employees to the long-term success of the company and encourage an owner mindset.
13
Table of Contents
COVID-19
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we supported our employees by adopting remote work and providing reimbursements
to employees to equip their home offices, unlimited videoconferencing access to gather virtually with friends and family, and
additional company holidays in recognition of the unusual demands of the working environment during the pandemic.
ACQUISITIONS
We acquired new technology or supplemented our existing technology by purchasing businesses or technology related assets
focused in specific markets or industries. For the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, we acquired companies accounted for
as business combinations. Autodesk did not complete any business combinations during fiscal year 2020. The following were
significant acquisitions for fiscal years 2022 and 2021:
Date of closing Company Details
May 2021 Upchain Inc. (“Upchain”)Autodesk integrated Upchain’ s unified cloud platform in Autodesk solutions to centralize
data management and process management.
March 2021Storm UK Holdco Limited,
the parent of Innovyze, Inc.
(“Innovyze”) Innovyze provided comprehensive water modeling solutions that augment Autodesk’ s BIM
offerings in civil engineering, and extended Autodesk’ s presence into operations and
maintenance of water infrastructure assets
November 2020Spacemaker AS
("Spacemaker")The acquisition of Spacemaker strengthened and enabled Autodesk’ s early-stage design and
outcome-based design capabilities.
We acquire technology-related assets that are complementary to or otherwise enhance our existing technologies. We also make
investments in privately held companies that develop technology that is complementary to or provide strategic value and expand
opportunities for our technologies.
REGULATION
We are subject to various regulations, particularly those involving privacy and import/export controls. See Item 1A, “Risk
Factors—Risks Relating to Laws and Regulations,” for further discussion.
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
Billings: Total revenue plus the net change in deferred revenue from the beginning to the end of the period.
Cloud Service Offerings: Represents individual term-based offerings deployed through web browser technologies or in a hybrid
software and cloud configuration. Cloud service offerings that are bundled with other product offerings are not captured as a separate
cloud service offering.
Constant Currency (CC) Growth Rates: We attempt to represent the changes in the underlying business operations by eliminating
fluctuations caused by changes in foreign currency exchange rates as well as eliminating hedge gains or losses recorded within the
current and comparative periods. We calculate constant currency growth rates by (i) applying the applicable prior period exchange
rates to current period results and (ii) excluding any gains or losses from foreign currency hedge contracts that are reported in the
current and comparative periods.
Design Business: Represents the combination of maintenance, product subscriptions, and all EBAs. Main products include, but are not
limited to, AutoCAD, AutoCAD LT, Industry Collections, Revit, Inventor, Maya, and 3ds Max. Certain products, such as our
computer aided manufacturing solutions, incorporate both Design and Make functionality and are classified as Design.
Enterprise Business Agreements (EBAs): Represents programs providing enterprise customers with token-based access to a broad pool
of Autodesk products over a defined contract term.
Free Cash Flow: Cash flow from operating activities minus capital expenditures.
14
Table of Contents
Industry Collections: Autodesk Industry Collections are a combination of products and services that target a specific user objective
and support a set of workflows for that objective. Our Industry Collections consist of: Autodesk Architecture, Engineering and
Construction Collection, Autodesk Product Design and Manufacturing Collection, and Autodesk Media and Entertainment Collection.
Maintenance Plan: Our maintenance plans provide our customers with a cost effective and predictable budgetary option to obtain the
productivity benefits of our new releases and enhancements when and if released during the term of their contracts. Under our
maintenance plans, customers are eligible to receive unspecified upgrades when and if available, and technical support. We recognize
maintenance revenue over the term of the agreements, generally one year.
Make Business: Represents certain cloud-based product subscriptions. Main products include, but are not limited to, Assemble,
Autodesk Build, BuildingConnected, Fusion 360, and ShotGrid. Certain products, such as Fusion 360, incorporate both Design and
Make functionality and are classified as Make.
Net Revenue Retention Rate (NR3): Measures the year-over-year change in subscription and maintenance revenue for the population of
customers that existed one year ago (“base customers”). Net revenue retention rate is calculated by dividing the current quarter
subscription and maintenance revenue related to base customers by the total corresponding quarter subscription and maintenance
revenue from one year ago. Subscription and maintenance revenue is based on USD reported revenue, and fluctuations caused by
changes in foreign currency exchange rates and hedge gains or losses have not been eliminated. Subscription and maintenance revenue
related to acquired companies, one year after acquisition, has been captured as existing customers until such data conforms to the
calculation methodology. This may cause variability in the comparison.
Other Revenue: Consists of revenue from consulting, training and other products and services, and is recognized as the products are
delivered and services are performed.
Product Subscription: Provides customers a flexible, cost-effective way to access and manage 3D design, engineering, and
entertainment software tools. Our product subscriptions currently represent a hybrid of desktop and cloud functionality, which
provides a device-independent, collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders.
Recurring Revenue: Consists of the revenue for the period from our traditional maintenance plans and revenue from our subscription
plan offerings. It excludes subscription revenue related to consumer product offerings, select Creative Finishing product offerings, and
third-party products. Recurring revenue acquired with the acquisition of a business is captured when total subscriptions are captured in
our systems and may cause variability in the comparison of this calculation.
Remaining Performance Obligations (RPO): The sum of total short-term, long-term, and unbilled deferred revenue. Current remaining
performance obligations is the amount of revenue we expect to recognize in the next twelve months.
Spend: The sum of cost of revenue and operating expenses.
Subscription Plan: Comprises our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and EBAs. Subscriptions represent a
combined hybrid offering of desktop software and cloud functionality which provides a device-independent, collaborative design
workflow for designers and their stakeholders. With subscription, customers can use our software anytime, anywhere, and get access
to the latest updates to previous versions.
Subscription Revenue: Includes our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible EBAs.
Unbilled Deferred Revenue: Unbilled deferred revenue represents contractually stated or committed orders under early renewal and
multi-year billing plans for subscription, services, and maintenance for which the associated deferred revenue has not been recognized.
Under FASB Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") Topic 606, unbilled deferred revenue is not included as a receivable or
deferred revenue on our Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet.
15
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
We operate in a rapidly changing environment that involves significant risks, a number of which are beyond our control. In
addition to the other information contained in this Form 10-K, the following discussion highlights some of these risks and the possible
impact of these factors on our business, financial condition, and future results of operations. If any of the following risks actually
occur, our business, financial condition, or results of operations may be adversely impacted, causing the trading price of our common
stock to decline. In addition, these risks and uncertainties may impact the forward-looking statements described elsewhere in this
Form 10-K and in the documents incorporated herein by reference. They could affect our actual results of operations, causing them to
differ materially from those expressed in forward-looking statements.
Summary of Risk Factors
Our business is subject to numerous risks and uncertainties that you should consider before investing in our securities. These risks are
described more fully below and include, but are not limited to, risks relating to the following:
•Our strategy to develop and introduce new products and services, exposing us to risks such as limited customer acceptance,
costs related to product defects, and large expenditures.
•The effects of the COVID-19 pandemic and related public health measures.
•Global economic and political conditions.
•Costs and challenges associated with strategic acquisitions and investments.
•Dependency on international revenue and operations, exposing us to significant international regulatory, economic,
intellectual property, collections, currency exchange rate, taxation, political, and other risks.
•Inability to predict subscription renewal rates and their impact on our future revenue and operating results.
•Existing and increased competition and rapidly evolving technological changes.
•Fluctuation of our financial results, key metrics and other operating metrics.
•Deriving a substantial portion of our net revenue from a small number of solutions, including our AutoCAD-based software
products and collections.
•Any failure to successfully execute and manage initiatives to realign or introduce new business and sales initiatives.
•Net revenue, billings, earnings, cash flow, or subscriptions shortfalls or volatility of the market causing the market price of
our stock to decline.
•Social and ethical issues relating to the use of artificial intelligence in our offerings.
•Security incidents compromising the integrity of our or our customers’ offerings, services, data, or intellectual property.
•Reliance on third parties to provide us with a number of operational and technical services as well as software.
•Our highly complex software, which may contain undetected errors, defects, or vulnerabilities.
•Increasing regulatory focus on privacy issues and expanding laws.
•Governmental export and import controls that could impair our ability to compete in international markets or subject us to
liability if we violate the controls.
•Protection of our intellectual property rights and intellectual property infringement claims from others.
•The government procurement process.
•Fluctuations in currency exchange rates.
•Our debt service obligations.
•Our investment portfolio consisting of a variety of investment vehicles that are subject to interest rate trends, market
volatility, and other economic factors.
16
Table of Contents
Risks Relating to Our Business and Strategy
Our strategy to develop and introduce new products and services exposes us to risks such as limited customer acceptance, costs
related to product defects, and large expenditures, each of which may result in no additional net revenue or decreased net revenue.
The software industry is characterized by rapid technological changes as well as changes in customer requirements and
preferences. In recent years, the industry has undergone a transition from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises
products to subscriptions and cloud-enabled technologies. Customers are also reconsidering how they purchase software products,
which requires us to constantly evaluate our business model and strategy. In response, we are focused on providing solutions to enable
our customers to be more agile and collaborative on their projects. We devote significant resources to the development of new
technologies. In addition, we frequently introduce new business models or methods that require a considerable investment of technical
and financial resources, such as our introduction of flexible subscription and service offerings and our transition of multi-subscription
plans to named-user plans. It is uncertain whether these strategies, including our product and pricing changes, will accurately reflect
customer demand or be successful, or whether we will be able to develop the necessary infrastructure and business models more
quickly than our competitors. We make such investments through further development and enhancement of our existing products and
services, as well as through acquisitions. Such investments may not result in sufficient revenue generation to justify their costs and
could result in decreased net revenue or profitability. If we are not able to meet customer requirements, either with respect to our
software or the manner in which we provide such products, or if we are not able to adapt our business model to meet our customers’
requirements, our business, financial condition, or results of operations may be adversely impacted.
In particular, a critical component of our growth strategy is to have customers of our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT products, as
well as other individual Autodesk products, expand their portfolios to include our other offerings and cloud-based functionality, and
we are taking steps to accelerate this migration. At times, sales of our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT or individual Autodesk flagship
products have decreased without a corresponding increase in Industry Collections or cloud-based functionality revenue, or without
purchases of customer seats to our Industry Collections. Should this continue, our results of operations will be adversely affected.
Our executive management team must continuously act quickly and with vision, given the rapidly changing customer
expectations and technology advancements inherent in the software industry, the extensive and complex efforts required to create
useful and widely accepted products, and the rapid evolution of cloud computing, mobile devices, new computing platforms, and other
technologies, such as consumer products. Although we have articulated a strategy that we believe will fulfill these challenges, if we
fail to execute properly on that strategy or adapt the strategy as market conditions evolve, we may fail to meet our customers’
expectations, be unable to compete with our competitors' products and technology, and lose the confidence of our channel partners and
employees. This in turn could adversely affect our business and financial performance.
The effects of the COVID-19 pandemic and related public health measures have affected how we and our customers are operating our
respective businesses, and the extent of the impact on our business and results of operations remains uncertain.
We are continuing to conduct business during the COVID-19 pandemic with substantial modifications to employee travel and
work locations, as well as virtualization, postponement, or cancellation of certain sales and marketing events, among other
changes. We have observed other companies as well as governments taking precautionary measures to address COVID-19. While
government authorities in some geographies are removing COVID-19 related business operations restrictions, we continue to actively
monitor the situation and may take further actions to alter our business operations as may be required by federal, state, or local
authorities, or that we determine are in the best interests of our employees, customers, partners, suppliers, and stockholders, including
in response to outbreaks and variants. The extent of the impact of any such modifications on our business, including the effects on our
customers and prospects, and on our financial results, remains uncertain.
We will continue to invest in critical areas such as research and development, construction, and digitizing the company to
support our future success as we come out of the pandemic. If we are not able to successfully manage our spending and investment, it
could have a material adverse effect on our cash balances, business, and results of operations.
Although recent vaccine approvals and rollouts have raised hopes of a turnaround in the COVID-19 pandemic, renewed waves
and new variants as well as delays in vaccinations pose risks to recovery and our outlook. In addition, supply chain disruption and
resulting inflationary pressures, a global labor shortage, and the ebb and flow of COVID-19, including in specific geographies, are
currently impacting the pace of our recovery and our outlook. Growth may slow if virus outbreaks
17
Table of Contents
(including from new variants) prove difficult to contain, infections and deaths mount rapidly before vaccines are widely available, and
social distancing measures and/or lockdowns return and are more stringent than anticipated. Moreover, if economic policy support is
insufficient or withdrawn before full economic recovery, bankruptcies of viable but illiquid companies could mount, leading to further
or renewed employment and income losses and a more protracted recovery. Together, these uncertainties and risks could have a
material adverse impact on our financial condition, business and results of operations.
Global economic and political conditions may further impact our industries, business, and financial results.
Our overall performance depends largely upon domestic and worldwide economic and political conditions. The United States
and other countries’ economies have experienced cyclical downturns, in which economic activity was impacted by falling demand for
a variety of goods and services, restricted credit, poor liquidity, decreased government spending, reduced corporate profitability,
volatility in credit, equity, and foreign exchange markets, bankruptcies, and overall uncertainty. These economic conditions can occur
abruptly. For example, the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic has caused additional uncertainty in the global economy, and an
economic downturn or recession in the United States or in other countries may occur or has already occurred and may continue. The
extent to which COVID-19 will impact our financial condition or results of operations is still uncertain and will continue to depend on
developments such as the impact on our customers, vendors, distributors, and resellers, such as the supply chain disruption and
resulting inflationary pressures and global labor shortage that we have seen recently, as well as other factors, including the full
duration and the extent of the pandemic, including as a result of outbreaks and variants; actions taken by governments, businesses, and
consumers in response to the pandemic; speed and timing of economic recovery, including in specific geographies; speed of rollout of
COVID-19 vaccines, lifting of restrictions on movement, and normalization of full-time return to work and social events; our billings
and renewal rates, including new business close rates, rate of multi-year contracts, pace of closing larger transactions, and new unit
volume growth; and effect of the pandemic on margins and cash flow. All of these factors continue to evolve and remain uncertain at
this time, and some of these factors are not within our control. Due to our subscription-based business model, the effect of COVID-19
may not be fully reflected in our results of operations until future periods, if at all. If economic growth in countries where we do
business slows or if such countries experience further economic recessions, customers may delay or reduce technology purchases,
which we have seen recently in certain countries including China. Our customers include government entities, including the U.S.
federal government, and if spending cuts impede the ability of governments to purchase our products and services, our revenue could
decline. In addition, a number of our customers rely, directly and indirectly, on government spending.
As described elsewhere in these risk factors, we are dependent on international revenue and operations and are subject to related
risks of conducting business globally. Trends toward nationalism and protectionism and the weakening or dissolution of international
trade pacts may increase the cost of, or otherwise interfere with, conducting business. These trends have increased political and
economic unpredictability globally and may increase the volatility of global financial markets, and the impact of such developments
on the global economy remains uncertain. Political instability or adverse political developments in any of the countries in which we do
business could harm our business, results of operations, and financial condition. A financial sector credit crisis could impair credit
availability and the financial stability of our customers, including our distribution partners and channels. A disruption in the financial
markets may also have an effect on our derivative counter-parties and could also impair our banking partners, on which we rely for
operating cash management. War, including the significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia and any related
political or economic responses and counter-responses or otherwise by various global actors or the general effect on the global
economy, could also affect our business. Any of these events could harm our business, results of operations, and financial condition.
Our business could be adversely impacted by the costs and challenges associated with strategic acquisitions and investments.
We regularly acquire or invest in businesses, software solutions, and technologies that are complementary to our business
through acquisitions, strategic alliances, or equity or debt investments, including several transactions in fiscal 2022. The risks
associated with such acquisitions include the difficulty of integrating solutions, operations, and personnel; inheriting liabilities such as
intellectual property infringement claims; failure to realize anticipated revenue and cost projections and expected synergies; the
requirement to test and assimilate the internal control processes of the acquired business in accordance with the requirements of
Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002; and diversion of management's time and attention. In addition, such acquisitions and
investments involve other risks such as:
•the inability to retain customers, key employees, vendors, distributors, business partners, and other entities associated with
the acquired business;
•the potential that due diligence of the acquired business or solution does not identify significant problems;
•exposure to litigation or other claims in connection with, or inheritance of claims or litigation risk as a result of, an
acquisition, including claims from terminated employees, customers, or other third parties;
18
Table of Contents
•the potential for incompatible business cultures;
•significantly higher than anticipated transaction or integration-related costs;
•potential additional exposure to economic, tax, currency, political, legal, and regulatory risks associated with specific
countries; and
•the potential impact on relationships with existing customers, vendors, and distributors as business partners as a result of
acquiring another business.
We may not be successful in overcoming such risks, and such acquisitions and investments may negatively impact our business.
In addition, if we do not complete an announced acquisition transaction or integrate an acquired business successfully and in a timely
manner, we may not realize the benefits of the acquisition to the extent anticipated. Acquisitions and investments have in the past and
may in the future contribute to fluctuations in our quarterly financial results. These fluctuations could arise from transaction-related
costs and charges associated with eliminating redundant expenses or write-offs of impaired assets recorded in connection with
acquisitions and investments, and could negatively impact our financial results.
We are dependent on international revenue and operations, exposing us to significant international regulatory, economic, intellectual
property, collections, currency exchange rate, taxation, political, and other risks, which could adversely impact our financial results.
International net revenue represented 67% and 66% of our net revenue for fiscal 2022 and 2021, respectively. Our international
revenue, some of which comes from emerging economies, is subject to economic and political conditions in foreign markets, including
those resulting from economic and political conditions in the United States, as well as country-specific conditions related to COVID-
19, such as varied speed of recovery in different geographies. For example, we have recently seen a deceleration in growth in certain
geographies including China. Our total revenue is also impacted by the relative geographical and country mix of our revenue over
time. Our dependency on international revenue makes us much more exposed to global economic and political trends, which can
negatively impact our financial results even if our results in the United States are strong for a particular period.
We anticipate that our international operations will continue to account for a significant portion of our net revenue and, as we
expand our international development, sales, and marketing expertise, will provide significant support to our overall efforts in
countries outside of the United States. Risks inherent in our international operations include:
•economic volatility;
•tariffs, quotas, and other trade barriers and restrictions , including any political or economic responses and counter-responses
or otherwise by various global actors to the significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia;
•fluctuating currency exchange rates, including devaluations, currency controls, and inflation, and risks related to any hedging
activities we undertake;
•changes in regulatory requirements and practices;
•delays resulting from difficulty in obtaining export licenses for certain technology;
•different purchase patterns as compared to the developed world;
•operating in locations with a higher incidence of corruption and fraudulent business practices, particularly in emerging
economies;
•compliance with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other anti-corruption laws;
•difficulties in staffing and managing foreign sales and development operations;
•local competition;
•longer collection cycles for accounts receivable;
•U.S. and foreign tax law changes and the complexities of tax reporting;
•laws regarding the free flow of data across international borders and management of and access to data and public networks;
•possible future limitations upon foreign-owned businesses;
•increased financial accounting and reporting burdens and complexities;
19
Table of Contents
•inadequate local infrastructure;
•greater difficulty in protecting intellectual property;
•software piracy; and
•other factors beyond our control, including popular uprisings, terrorism, war (including the significant military action against
Ukraine launched by Russia and any related political or economic responses and counter-responses or otherwise by various
global actors or the general effect on the global economy), natural disasters, and diseases and pandemics, such as COVID-19.
Some of our business partners also have international operations and are subject to the risks described above.
The application of the Trade and Cooperation Agreement between the European Union, the European Atomic Energy
Community, and the United Kingdom signed in December 2020 (the “TCA”), which took effect January 1, 2021, could have adverse
tax, tax treaty, banking, operational, legal, regulatory, or other impacts on our businesses in the region. The withdrawal could also,
among other potential outcomes, create currency volatility; disrupt the free movement of goods, services, and people between the
United Kingdom and the European Union; and significantly disrupt trade between the United Kingdom and the European Union and
other parties. Uncertainty around these and related issues could lead to adverse effects on the United Kingdom economy, the European
Union economies, and the other economies in which we operate.
In addition, in recent years, the United States has instituted or proposed changes to foreign trade policy, including the
negotiation or termination of trade agreements, the imposition of tariffs on products imported from certain countries, economic
sanctions on individuals, corporations, or countries, and other government regulations affecting trade between the United States and
other countries in which we do business. More recently, the United States and other global actors have imposed sanctions as a result of
the significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia. New or increased tariffs and other changes in U.S. trade policy,
including sanctions, could trigger retaliatory actions by affected countries, including Russia, and certain foreign governments,
including the Chinese government, have instituted or considered imposing trade sanctions on certain U.S.-manufactured goods. The
escalation of protectionist or retaliatory trade measures in either the United States or any other countries in which we do business, such
as announcing sanctions, a change in tariff structures, export compliance, or other trade policies, may increase the cost of, or otherwise
interfere with, the conduct of our business. Broad-based sanctions against Russia, should they be implemented, could have a material
adverse effect on our operations and business outlook.
Furthermore, in response to the Russian invasion of Ukraine, effective early March 2022 we have suspended all new business in
Russia. Our revenue in fiscal 2022 generated in Russia was less than 2% of total revenue. We continue to evaluate our business
operations there, including whether and how to support existing customers.
Even if we are able to successfully manage the risks of international operations, our business may be adversely affected if our
business partners are not able to successfully manage these risks.
We may not be able to predict subscription renewal rates and their impact on our future revenue and operating results.
Our customers are not obligated to renew their subscriptions for our offerings, and they may elect not to renew, upgrade, or
expand their subscriptions. We cannot assure renewal rates or the mix of subscriptions renewals. Customer renewal rates may decline
or fluctuate due to a number of factors, including offering pricing; competitive offerings; customer satisfaction; and reductions in
customer spending levels, customer activity, or number of users due to economic downturns, including as a result of the current
COVID-19 pandemic, or financial markets uncertainty. If our customers do not renew their subscriptions or if they renew on less
favorable terms, our revenues may decline.
Existing and increased competition and rapidly evolving technological changes may reduce our revenue and profits.
The software industry has limited barriers to entry, and the availability of computing devices with continually expanding
performance at progressively lower prices contributes to the ease of market entry. The industry has undergone a transition from
developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to subscriptions and cloud-enabled technologies. This shift further
lowers barriers to entry and poses a disruptive challenge to established software companies. The markets in which we operate are
characterized by vigorous competition, both by entrants with innovative technologies and by consolidation of companies with
complementary offerings and technologies. Some of our competitors have greater financial, technical, sales and marketing, and other
resources. Furthermore, a reduction in the number and availability of compatible third-party applications or our inability to rapidly
adapt to technological and customer preference changes, including those related to cloud computing, mobile devices, and new
computing platforms, may adversely affect the sale of our solutions. Because of these and other
20
Table of Contents
factors, competitive conditions in the industry are likely to intensify in the future. Increased competition could result in price
reductions, reduced net revenue and profit margins, and loss of market share, any of which would likely harm our business.
Our financial results, key metrics, and other operating metrics fluctuate within each quarter and from quarter to quarter, making our
future revenue and financial results difficult to predict.
Our quarterly financial results, key metrics, and other operating metrics have fluctuated in the past and will continue to do so in
the future. These fluctuations could cause our stock price to change significantly or experience declines. We also provide investors
with quarterly and annual financial forward-looking guidance that could prove to be inaccurate as a result of these fluctuations. In
addition to the other risks described in these risk factors, some of the factors that could cause our financial results, key metrics, and
other operating metrics to fluctuate include:
•general market, economic, business, and political conditions in Europe, APAC, and emerging economies, including from an
economic downturn or recession in the United States or other countries;
•failure to produce sufficient revenue, billings, subscription, profitability, and cash flow growth, including as a result of the
COVID-19 pandemic;
•failure to accurately predict the impact of acquired businesses or to identify and realize the anticipated benefits of
acquisitions, and successfully integrate such acquired businesses and technologies;
•potential goodwill impairment charges related to prior acquisitions;
•failure to manage spend;
•changes in billings linearity;
•changes in subscription mix, pricing pressure, or changes in subscription pricing;
•weak or negative growth in one or more of the industries we serve, including AEC, manufacturing, and digital media and
entertainment markets;
•the success of new business or sales initiatives;
•security breaches, related reputational harm, and potential financial penalties to customers and government entities;
•restructuring or other accounting charges and unexpected costs or other operating expenses;
•timing of additional investments in our technologies or deployment of our services;
•changes in revenue recognition or other accounting guidelines employed by us and/or established by the Financial
Accounting Standards Board, Securities and Exchange Commission, or other rulemaking bodies;
•fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and the effectiveness of our hedging activity;
•dependence on and timing of large transactions;
•adjustments arising from ongoing or future tax examinations;
•the ability of governments around the world to adopt fiscal policies, meet their financial and debt obligations, and finance
infrastructure projects;
•failure to expand our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT customer base to related design products and services;
•our ability to rapidly adapt to technological and customer preference changes, including those related to cloud computing,
mobile devices, and new computing platforms;
•timing of the introduction of new products by us or our competitors;
•the financial and business condition of our reseller and distribution channels;
•perceived or actual technical or other problems with a product or combination of subscriptions;
•unexpected or negative outcomes of matters and expenses relating to litigation or regulatory inquiries;
•increases in cloud functionality-related expenses;
•timing of releases and retirements of offerings;
•changes in tax laws or tax or accounting rules and regulations, such as increased use of fair value measures;
21
Table of Contents
•changes in sales compensation practices;
•failure to effectively implement and maintain our copyright legalization programs, especially in developing countries;
•renegotiation or termination of royalty or intellectual property arrangements;
•interruptions or terminations in the business of our consultants or third-party developers;
•timing and degree of expected investments in growth and efficiency opportunities;
•failure to achieve continued success in technology advancements;
•catastrophic events, natural disasters, or public health events, such as pandemics and epidemics, including COVID-19;
•regulatory compliance costs; and
•failure to appropriately estimate the scope of services under consulting arrangements.
We have also experienced fluctuations in financial results in interim periods in certain geographic regions due to seasonality or
regional economic or political conditions. In particular, our financial results in Europe during our third quarter are usually affected by
a slower summer period, and our APAC operations typically experience seasonal slowing in our third and fourth quarters. War,
including the significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia and any related political or economic responses and
counter-responses or otherwise by various global actors or the general effect on the global economy, could also affect our business.
Our operating expenses are based in part on our expectations for future revenue and are relatively fixed in the short term.
Accordingly, any revenue shortfall below expectations has had, and in the future could have, an immediate and significant adverse
effect on our profitability. Greater than anticipated expenses or a failure to maintain rigorous cost controls would also negatively affect
profitability.
We derive a substantial portion of our net revenue from a small number of solutions, including our AutoCAD-based software products
and collections, and if these offerings are not successful, our revenue would be adversely affected.
We derive a substantial portion of our net revenue from sales of subscriptions of a limited number of our offerings, including
AutoCAD software, solutions based on AutoCAD, which include our collections that serve specific markets, and products that are
interoperable with AutoCAD. Any factor adversely affecting sales of these subscriptions, including the product release cycle, market
acceptance, product competition, performance and reliability, reputation, price competition, economic and market conditions, and the
availability of third-party applications, would likely harm our financial results. During both fiscal 2022 and 2021, combined revenue
from our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT family products, not including collections having AutoCAD or AutoCAD LT as a component,
represented 29% of our total net revenue.
From time to time we realign or introduce new business and sales initiatives; if we fail to successfully execute and manage these
initiatives, our results of operations could be negatively impacted.
As part of our effort to accommodate our customers’ needs and demands and the rapid evolution of technology, from time to
time we evolve our business and sales initiatives, such as realigning our development and marketing organizations, offering software
as a service, and realigning our internal resources in an effort to improve efficiency. We may take such actions without clear
indications that they will prove successful and, at times, we have been met with short-term challenges in the execution of such
initiatives. Market acceptance of any new business or sales initiative is dependent on our ability to match our customers’ needs at the
right time and price. Often, we have limited prior experience and operating history in these new areas of emphasis. If any of our
assumptions about expenses, revenue, or revenue recognition principles from these initiatives proves incorrect, or our attempts to
improve efficiency are not successful, our actual results may vary materially from those anticipated, and our financial results will be
negatively impacted.
Net revenue, billings, earnings, cash flow, or subscriptions shortfalls or volatility of the market generally may cause the market price
of our stock to decline.
The market price for our common stock has experienced significant fluctuations and may continue to fluctuate significantly. The
market price for our common stock may be affected by a number of factors, including the other risks described in these risk factors
and the following:
22
Table of Contents
•shortfalls in our expected financial results, including net revenue, billings, earnings, and cash flow or key performance
metrics, such as subscriptions, including as a result of the current COVID-19 pandemic, and how those results compare to
securities analyst expectations, including whether those results fail to meet, exceed, or significantly exceed securities analyst
expectations;
•quarterly variations in our or our competitors’ results of operations;
•general socioeconomic, political, or market conditions, including from an economic downturn or recession in the United
States or in other countries;
•changes in forward-looking estimates of future results, how those estimates compare to securities analyst expectations, or
changes in recommendations or confusion on the part of analysts and investors about the short- and long-term impact to our
business;
•uncertainty about certain governments’ abilities to repay debt or effect fiscal policy;
•announcements of new offerings or enhancements by us or our competitors;
•unusual events such as significant acquisitions, divestitures, regulatory actions, and litigation;
•changes in laws, rules, or regulations applicable to our business;
•outstanding debt service obligations; and
•other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance, such as instability affecting the economy or the
operating performance of our competitors.
Significant changes in the price of our common stock could expose us to costly and time-consuming litigation. Historically, after
periods of volatility in the market price of a company's securities, a company becomes more susceptible to securities class action
litigation. This type of litigation is often expensive and diverts management’s attention and resources.
As a result of our strategy of partnering with other companies for product development, our product delivery schedules could be
adversely affected if we experience difficulties with our product development partners.
We partner with certain independent firms and contractors to perform some of our product development activities. We believe
our partnering strategy allows us to achieve efficiencies in developing new products and maintaining and enhancing existing product
offerings. This strategy creates a dependency on independent developers. Independent developers, including those who currently
develop solutions for us in the United States and throughout the world, may not be able or willing to provide development support to
us in the future. In addition, use of development resources through consulting relationships, particularly in non-U.S. jurisdictions with
developing legal systems, may be adversely impacted by, and expose us to risks relating to, evolving employment, export, and
intellectual property laws. These risks could, among other things, expose our intellectual property to misappropriation and result in
disruptions to product delivery schedules.
Social and ethical issues relating to the use of artificial intelligence in our offerings may result in reputational harm or liability.
Social and ethical issues relating to the use of new and evolving technologies such as artificial intelligence (“AI”) in our
offerings, may result in reputational harm and liability, and may cause us to incur additional research and development costs to resolve
such issues. We are increasingly building AI into many of our offerings. As with many innovations, AI presents risks and challenges
that could affect its adoption, and therefore our business. AI presents emerging ethical issues and if we enable or offer solutions that
draw controversy due to their perceived or actual impact on society, we may experience brand or reputational harm, competitive harm,
or legal liability. Potential government regulation in the space of AI ethics may also increase the burden and cost of research and
development in this area, subjecting us to brand or reputational harm, competitive harm, or legal liability. Failure to address AI ethics
issues by us or others in our industry could undermine public confidence in AI and slow adoption of AI in our products and services.
Risks Relating to Our Operations
Security incidents may compromise the integrity of our or our customers’ systems, solutions, offerings, services, applications, data, or
intellectual property, harm our reputation, damage our competitiveness, create additional liability, and adversely impact our financial
results.
As we digitize Autodesk and use cloud- and web-based technologies to leverage customer data to deliver the total customer
experience, we are exposed to increased security risks and the potential for unauthorized access to, or improper use of,
23
Table of Contents
our and our customers’ information. Like other software offerings and systems, ours are vulnerable to security incidents, including
those from acquired companies. Also, our ability to mitigate the security incident risk may be impacted by our limited control over our
customers or third-party technology providers and vendors, or the processing of data by third-party technology providers and vendors,
which may not allow us to maintain the integrity or security of such transmissions or processing. We devote significant resources in an
effort to maintain the security and integrity of our systems, offerings, services, and applications (online, mobile, and desktop),
including by enhancing security features, conducting penetration tests, code hardening, releasing security vulnerability updates, and
accelerating our incident response time. We also provide annual information security training to our employees. Despite these efforts,
we may not prevent security incidents, and we may face delays or other difficulties in identifying, responding to, or remediating
security incidents.
Hackers regularly have targeted our systems, offerings, services, and applications, and we expect them to do so in the future. To
date, such identified security events have not been material or significant to us or our customers, including to our reputation or
business operations, or had a material financial impact, but there can be no assurance that future cyberattacks will not be material or
significant. Security incidents could disrupt the proper functioning of our systems, solutions, offerings, applications, or services; cause
errors in the output of our customers’ work; allow unauthorized access to or unauthorized use, disclosure, modification, loss, or
destruction of, sensitive data or intellectual property, including proprietary or confidential information of ours or our customers; or
cause other destructive outcomes. The risk of a security incident, particularly through cyber-attack or cyber intrusion, including by
computer hackers, foreign governments, and cyber terrorists, has increased as the number, intensity, and sophistication of attempted
attacks and intrusions from around the world have increased. These threats include identity theft, unauthorized access, DNS attacks,
wireless network attacks, viruses and worms, malware, bugs, vulnerabilities, advanced persistent threats (APT), application-centric
attacks, peer-to-peer attacks, social engineering, phishing, credential stuffing, malicious file uploads, backdoor trojans, supply chain
attacks, ransomware attacks, and distributed denial of service (DDoS) attacks. In addition, third parties may attempt to fraudulently
induce our employees, vendors, partners, customers, or users to disclose information to gain access to our data or our customers’ or
users’ data and there is the risk of employee, contractor, or vendor error or malfeasance. These existing risks are compounded given
the COVID-19 pandemic and the resulting shift to work-from-home arrangements for a large population of employees and contractors,
as well as employees and contractors of our third-party technology providers and vendors, and the risks could also be elevated in
connection with the Russian invasion of Ukraine. Despite our significant efforts to create security barriers to such threats, we cannot
entirely mitigate these risks, and there is no guarantee that inadvertent or unauthorized use or disclosure of such information will not
occur or that third parties will not gain unauthorized access to such information.
Many governments have enacted laws requiring companies to provide notice of security incidents involving certain types of
personal data and personal information. We are also contractually required to notify certain customers of certain security incidents. If
any of the foregoing security incidents were to occur or to be perceived to have occurred, our reputation may suffer, our competitive
position may be diminished, customers may stop paying for our solutions and services, we could be required to expend significant
capital and other resources to evaluate and alleviate the security incident and to try to prevent further or additional incidents, and we
could face regulatory inquiry, lawsuits, and potential liability. We could incur significant costs and liabilities, including due to
litigation, indemnity obligations, damages for contract breach, penalties for violation of applicable laws or regulations, and costs for
remediation and other incentives offered to customers or other business partners in an effort to maintain business relationships after a
security incident, and our financial performance could be negatively impacted.
We cannot assure you that any limitations of liability provisions in our contracts would be enforceable or adequate or would
otherwise protect us from any liabilities or damages with respect to any particular claim relating to a security incident. We also cannot
be sure that our existing insurance coverage will continue to be available on acceptable terms or will be available in sufficient amounts
to cover one or more large claims related to a security incident, or that the insurer will not deny coverage as to any future claim. The
successful assertion of one or more large claims against us that exceed available insurance coverage, or the occurrence of changes in
our insurance policies, including premium increases or the imposition of large deductible or co-insurance requirements, could have a
material adverse effect on our business, including our financial condition, operating results, and reputation.
Our use of third-party open source software could negatively affect our ability to sell subscriptions to access our products and
subject us to possible litigation and greater security risks.
We use third-party open source software. From time to time, companies that use third-party open source software have faced
claims challenging the use of such open source software and compliance with the open source software license terms. Accordingly, we
may be subject to suits by parties claiming ownership of what we believe to be open source software or claiming non-compliance with
the applicable open source licensing terms. Some open source software licenses require end-
24
Table of Contents
users, who distribute or make available across a network software and services that include open source software, to make publicly
available or to license all or part of such software (which in some circumstances could include valuable proprietary code, such as
modifications or derivative works created, based upon, incorporating, or using the open source software) under the terms of the
particular open source license. While we employ practices designed to monitor our compliance with the licenses of third-party open
source software and protect our valuable proprietary source code, we may inadvertently use third-party open source software in a
manner that exposes us to claims of non-compliance with the terms of the applicable license, including claims of intellectual property
rights infringement or for breach of contract. Furthermore, there exists today an increasing number of types of open source software
licenses, almost none of which have been tested in courts of law to provide clarity on their proper legal interpretation. If we were to
receive a claim of non-compliance with the terms of any of these open source licenses, we may be required to publicly release certain
portions of our proprietary source code. We could also be required to expend substantial time and resources to re-engineer some or all
of our software. Any of the foregoing could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of operations, and
prospects.
In addition, the use of third-party open source software typically exposes us to greater risks than the use of third-party
commercial software because open source licensors generally do not provide warranties or controls on the functionality or origin of
the software. Use of open source software may also present additional security risks because the public availability of such software
may make it easier for hackers and other third parties to determine how to compromise our platform. Any of the foregoing could
materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of operations, and prospects and could help our competitors
develop products and services that are similar to or better than ours.
We rely on third parties to provide us with a number of operational and technical services; third-party security incidents could result
in the loss of our or our customers’ data, expose us to liability, harm our reputation, damage our competitiveness, and adversely
impact our financial results.
We rely on third parties, such as Amazon Web Services, to provide us with operational and technical services. These third parties
may have access to our systems, provide hosting services, or otherwise process data about us or our customers, employees, or partners.
Our ability to monitor such third parties’ security measures is limited. There have been and may continue to be significant supply
chain attacks, and we cannot guarantee that our or our such third parties’ systems have not been breached or that they do not contain
exploitable defects, bugs, or vulnerabilities that could result in an incident, breach, or other disruption to, our or these third parties’
systems. Any security incident involving such third parties could compromise the integrity or availability of, or result in the theft of,
our and our customers’ data. In addition, our operations or the operations of our customers or partners could be negatively affected in
the event of a security incident and could be subject to the loss or theft of confidential or proprietary information, including source
code. Unauthorized access to data and other confidential or proprietary information may be obtained through break-ins, network
breaches by unauthorized parties, employee theft or misuse, or other misconduct. If any of the foregoing were to occur or to be
perceived to occur, our reputation may suffer, our competitive position may be diminished, customers may buy fewer of our offerings
and services, we could face lawsuits, regulatory investigation, fines, and potential liability, and our financial results could be
negatively impacted.
Delays in service from third-party service providers could expose us to liability, harm our reputation, damage our competitiveness,
and adversely impact our financial results.
From time to time, we may rely on a single or limited number of suppliers, or upon suppliers in a single country, for the
provision of services and materials that we use in the operation of our business and production of our solutions. Inability of such third
parties to satisfy our requirements could disrupt our operations or make it more difficult for us to implement our strategy. If any of
these situations were to occur, our reputation could be harmed, we could be subject to third-party liability, including under data
protection and privacy laws in certain jurisdictions, and our financial results could be negatively impacted.
We are investing in resources to update and improve our information technology systems to digitize Autodesk and support our
customers. Should our investments not succeed, or if delays or other issues with new or existing information technology systems
disrupt our operations, our business could be harmed.
We rely on our network and data center infrastructure, technology systems, and websites for our development, marketing,
operational, support, sales, accounting, and financial reporting activities. We continually invest resources to update and improve these
systems to meet the evolving requirements of our business and customers. In particular, our transition to cloud-based products and a
subscription-only business model involves considerable investment in the development of technologies, as well as back-office systems
for technical, financial, compliance, and sales resources. Such improvements are often complex, costly, and time consuming. In
addition, such improvements can be challenging to integrate with our existing technology systems, or may uncover problems with
those systems. Unsuccessful implementation of hardware or software updates and improvements
25
Table of Contents
could result in disruption in our business operations, loss of customers, loss of revenue, errors in our accounting and financial
reporting, or damage to our reputation, all of which could harm our business.
Our software is highly complex and may contain undetected errors, defects, or vulnerabilities, each of which could harm our business
and financial performance.
The software solutions that we offer are complex and, despite extensive testing and quality control, may contain errors, defects,
or vulnerabilities. Some errors, defects, or vulnerabilities in our software solutions may only be discovered after they have been
released. Any errors, defects, or vulnerabilities could result in the need for corrective releases to our software solutions, damage to our
reputation, loss of revenue, an increase in subscription cancellations, or lack of market acceptance of our offerings, any of which
would likely harm our business and financial performance.
If we do not maintain good relationships with the members of our distribution channel, or if our distribution channel suffers financial
losses, becomes financially unstable or insolvent, or is not provided the right mix of incentives to sell our subscriptions, our ability to
generate revenue will be adversely affected.
We sell our software products both directly to end users and through a network of distributors and resellers. For fiscal 2022 and
2021, approximately 65% and 69%, respectively, of our revenue was derived from indirect channel sales through distributors and
resellers, and we expect that the majority of our revenue will continue to be derived from indirect channel sales in the near future. Our
ability to effectively distribute our solutions depends in part upon the financial and business condition of our distributor and reseller
network. Computer software distributors and resellers typically are not highly capitalized, and have previously experienced difficulties
during times of economic contraction as well as during the past several years. We have processes to ensure that we assess the
creditworthiness of distributors and resellers prior to our sales to them. In the past we have taken steps to support them, and may take
additional steps in the future, such as extending credit terms and adjusting our incentives. These steps, if taken, could harm our
financial results. If our distributors and resellers were to become insolvent, they would not be able to maintain their business and sales
or provide customer support services, which would negatively impact our business and revenue.
We rely significantly upon major distributors and resellers in both the U.S. and international regions, including the distributors
Tech Data and Ingram Micro. Tech Data accounted for 36% and 37% of our total net revenue for fiscal 2022 and 2021, respectively,
and Ingram Micro accounted for 9% and 10% of our total net revenue for fiscal 2022 and 2021, respectively. Should any of our
agreements with Tech Data or Ingram Micro be terminated, we believe the resellers and end users who currently purchase our products
through Tech Data or Ingram Micro would be able to continue to do so under substantially the same terms from one of our many other
distributors without substantial disruption to our revenue. Consequently, we believe our business is not substantially dependent on
either Tech Data or Ingram Micro. However, if either distributor were to experience a significant business disruption or if our
relationship with either were to significantly deteriorate, it is possible that our ability to sell to end users would, at least temporarily, be
negatively impacted. This could, in turn, negatively impact our financial results. For example, in June 2020, an affiliate of funds
managed by affiliates of Apollo Global Management, a global alternative investment manager, acquired Tech Data, and in July 2021,
Platinum Equity, a global investment firm, acquired Ingram Micro from HNA Technology Co., Ltd. If there is any reseller or end user
uncertainty caused by either acquisition, our ability to sell to these resellers and end users could, at least temporarily, be negatively
impacted.
Over time, we have modified and will continue to modify aspects of our relationship with our distributors and resellers, such as
their incentive programs, pricing to them, and our distribution model to motivate and reward them for aligning their businesses with
our strategy and business objectives. Changes in these relationships and underlying programs could negatively impact their business
and harm our business. Further, our distributors and resellers may lose confidence in our business, move to competitive products, or
not have the skills or ability to support customers. The loss of or a significant reduction in business with those distributors or resellers
could harm our business. In particular, if one or more of such distributors or resellers were unable to meet their obligations with
respect to accounts payable to us, we could be forced to write off such accounts and may be required to delay the recognition of
revenue on future sales to these customers. These events could have a material adverse effect on our financial results.
We rely on software from third parties, and a failure to properly manage our use of third-party software could result in increased costs
or loss of revenue.
Many of our products are designed to include software licensed from third parties. Such third-party software includes software
licensed from commercial suppliers and under public open source licenses. While we have internal processes to
26
Table of Contents
manage our use of such third-party software, if such processes are inadequate, we may be subject to copyright infringement or other
third-party claims. If we are non-compliant with a license for commercial software, we may be required to pay penalties or undergo
costly audits pursuant to the license agreement. In the case of open-source software licensed under certain “copyleft” licenses, the
license itself, or a court-imposed remedy for non-compliant use of the open source software, may require that proprietary portions of
our own software be publicly disclosed or licensed. This could result in a loss of intellectual property rights, increased costs, re-
engineering of our software, damage to our reputation, or loss of revenue.
In addition to risks related to license requirements, usage of open source software can lead to greater risks than use of third-party
commercial software, as open source licensors generally do not provide warranties, support, indemnities, assurances of title or controls
on origin of the software, or other contractual protections regarding infringement claims or the quality of the code. Likewise, some
open source projects have known security and other vulnerabilities and architectural instabilities, or are otherwise subject to security
attacks due to their wide availability, and are provided on an “as-is” basis.
Our business could be adversely affected if we are unable to attract and retain key personnel.
Our success and ability to invest and grow depend largely on our ability to attract and retain highly skilled technical,
professional, managerial, sales, and marketing personnel. Historically, competition for these key personnel has been intense. The loss
of services of any of our key personnel, including key personnel joining our company through acquisitions, inability to retain and
attract qualified employees in the future, or delays in hiring required personnel, particularly engineering and sales personnel, could
make it difficult to meet key objectives, such as timely and effective product introductions and financial goals.
We rely on third-party technologies and if we are unable to use or integrate these technologies, our solutions and service development
may be delayed and our financial results negatively impacted.
We rely on certain software that we license from third parties, including software that is integrated with internally developed
software and used in our offerings to perform key functions. These third-party software licenses may not continue to be available on
commercially reasonable terms, and the software may not be appropriately supported, maintained, or enhanced by the licensors. The
loss of licenses to, or inability to support, maintain, and enhance any such software could result in increased costs or delays until
equivalent software can be developed, identified, licensed, and integrated, which would likely harm our business.
Disruptions in licensing relationships and with third-party developers could adversely impact our business.
We license certain key technologies from third parties. Licenses may be restricted in the term or the use of such technology in
ways that negatively affect our business. Similarly, we may not be able to obtain or renew license agreements for key technology on
favorable terms, if at all, and any failure to do so could harm our business. Our business strategy has historically depended in part on
our relationships with third-party developers who provide products that expand the functionality of our design software. Some
developers may elect to support other products or may experience disruption in product development and delivery cycles or financial
pressure during periods of economic downturn. In particular markets, such disruptions have in the past, and would likely in the future,
negatively impact these third-party developers and end users, which could harm our business.
Technology created by outsourced product development, whether outsourced to third parties or developed externally and
transferred to us through business or technology acquisitions, involves additional risks such as effective integration into existing
products, adequate transfer of technology know-how, and ownership and protection of transferred intellectual property.
Risks Relating to Laws and Regulations
Increasing regulatory focus on privacy, data protection, and information security issues and new and expanding laws may impact our
business and expose us to increased liability.
Our strategy to digitize Autodesk involves increasing our use of cloud- and web-based technologies and applications to leverage
customer data to improve our offerings for the benefit of our customers. To accomplish this strategy, we must collect and otherwise
process customer data, which may include personal data and personal information of users from different jurisdictions globally. We
also collect and otherwise process personal data and personal information of our employees and contractors. As a result, federal, state,
and global laws relating to privacy, data protection, and information security apply to Autodesk’s personal data and personal
information processing activities. The scope of these laws and regulations is rapidly
27
Table of Contents
evolving, subject to differing interpretations, may be inconsistent among jurisdictions, or conflict with other rules and is likely to
remain uncertain for the foreseeable future. We also expect that there will continue to be new laws, regulations, and industry standards
concerning privacy, data protection, and information security proposed and enacted in various jurisdictions. Globally, laws such as the
General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (“GDPR”) in the European Union (“EU”) and the Personal Information Protection
Law (“PIPL”) in China have been enacted. In addition, new and emerging state laws in the United States governing privacy, data
protection, and information security, such as the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), the California Privacy Rights Act
(“CPRA”), the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“VCDPA”), and the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”) have been enacted. These
laws and regulations, as well as industry self-regulatory codes, create new compliance obligations and substantially expand the scope
of potential liability and provide greater penalties for non-compliance. For example, the GDPR provides for penalties of up to €20
million or 4% of a company’s annual global revenue, whichever is greater, the PIPL provides for penalties of up to 50 million
renminbi or 5% of a company's annual revenue and disgorgement of all illegal gains, whichever is greater, and the CCPA provides for
penalties of up to $7,500 per violation. These laws, regulations and codes may also impact our innovation and business drivers in
developing new and emerging technologies (e.g., artificial intelligence and machine learning). These requirements, among others, may
impact demand for our offerings and force us to bear the burden of expanded obligations in our contracts.
In addition, there is continued instability of international personal data transfer legal mechanisms that are complex, uncertain,
and subject to active litigation and enforcement actions in a number of jurisdictions around the world. For example, on June 4, 2021,
the European Commission published a new set of modular standard contractual clause (“SCCs”), providing for an 18-month
implementation period, which became effective on June 29, 2021, and imposes on companies obligations relating to personal data
transfers, including the obligation to conduct a transfer impact assessment and, depending on a party’s role in the transfer, to
implement additional security measures and to update internal privacy practices. If we elect to rely on the new SCCs for personal data
transfers, we may be required to expend significant time and resources to update our contractual arrangements and to comply with new
obligations. If we are unable to implement a valid mechanism for personal data transfers from the EU, we will face increased exposure
to regulatory actions, substantial fines and injunctions against processing personal data from the EU.
In addition, the United Kingdom’s (“UK”) exit from the EU, and ongoing developments in the UK, have created uncertainty with
regard to data protection regulation in the UK. Data processing in the UK is now governed by the UK General Data Protection
Regulation and supplemented by other domestic data protection laws, such as the UK Data Protection Act 2018, which authorizes
fines of up to £17.5 million or 4% of annual global revenue, whichever is higher. We are also exposed to potentially divergent
enforcement actions for certain violations. Furthermore, the new SCCs apply only to the transfer of personal data outside the EU and
not the UK. Although the European Commission adopted an adequacy decision for the UK on June 28, 2021, allowing the continued
flow of personal data from the EU to the UK, this decision will be regularly reviewed going forward and may be revoked if the UK
diverges from its current adequate data protection laws following its exit from the EU. On February 2, 2022, the UK’s Information
Commissioner’s Office issued new standard contractual clauses to support personal data transfers out of the UK (“UK SCCs”). If
approved by the UK Parliament, the UK SCCs will become effective March 21, 2022, and we may, in addition to other impacts,
experience additional costs associated with increased compliance burdens and be required to engage in new contract negotiations with
third parties that aid in processing personal data on our behalf or localize certain personal data.
Several other countries, including China, Australia, New Zealand, Brazil, and Japan, have also established specific legal
requirements for cross-border data transfers. There is also an increasing trend towards data localization policies. For example, in 2015,
Russia introduced data localization laws. In 2021, China introduced localization requirements for certain data. There are also other
countries, such as India, that are considering data localization requirements. If this trend continues, and countries implement more
restrictive regulations for cross-border personal data transfers (or do not permit personal data to leave the country of origin), our
business, financial condition, and results of operations in those jurisdictions could be impacted.
In addition, the new state laws – the CPRA and the VCDPA – that become effective on January 1, 2023, and the CPA that
becomes effective on July 1, 2023, introduce additional obligations such as data minimization and storage limitations, granting
additional rights to consumers such as correction of personal information and additional opt-out rights. The CPRA also creates a new
agency to implement and enforce the law. These new state laws will require us to modify our data processing practices and policies
and may cause us to incur substantial costs and expenses in order to comply. Laws in all 50 states, and some of our contracts, require
us to provide notice under certain circumstances to customers whose personal information has been disclosed as a result of a data
breach. Also, if third parties we work with, such as suppliers, violate applicable data protection laws or regulations, such violations
may also put our users’ information at risk and could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, results of
operations, and prospects. Additionally, in addition to government activity, privacy advocacy
28
Table of Contents
groups and technology and other industries are considering various new, additional or different self-regulatory standards that may
place additional burdens on us. Evolving legislation and the interplay of federal and state laws may be subject to varying
interpretations by courts and government agencies, creating complex compliance issues and have and may cause variation in
requirements, increase restrictions and potential legal risk and impact strategies and the availability of previously useful data,
potentially exposing us to additional expense, adverse publicity, and liability.
In the EU and the UK, regulators are increasingly focusing on compliance with requirements in the online behavioral advertising
ecosystem, and current national laws that implement the ePrivacy Directive are highly likely to be replaced by an EU regulation
known as the ePrivacy Regulation, which is expected to significantly increase fines for non-compliance. While the text of the ePrivacy
Regulation is under development, recent European case law and regulators’ recent guidance are driving increased attention to cookies
and tracking technologies. This could lead to substantial costs, require significant system changes, limit the effectiveness of our
marketing activities, divert the attention of our technology personnel, adversely affect our margins, increase costs, and subject us to
additional liabilities. Regulation of cookies and similar technologies, and any decline of cookies or similar online tracking
technologies as a means to identify and potentially target users, may lead to broader restrictions and impairments on our marketing and
personalization activities and may negatively impact our efforts to understand our customers.
Governments, regulators, plaintiffs’ attorneys, privacy advocates have increased their focus on how companies collect, process,
use, store, share, and transmit personal data and personal information. Any perception of our practices, products, offerings, or services
as a violation of individual privacy or data protection rights may subject us to public criticism, lawsuits, reputational harm, or
investigations or claims by regulators, industry groups or other third parties, all of which could disrupt or adversely impact our
business and expose us to increased liability. Moreover, because the interpretation and application of many laws and regulations
relating to privacy, data protection, and information security are uncertain, it is possible that these laws and regulations may be
interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent with our existing data management practices or the features of our products,
offerings, and services. We could be required to fundamentally change our business activities and practices or modify our offerings
and services, any of which could require significant additional expense and adversely affect our business, including impacting our
ability to innovate, delaying our development roadmap and adversely affecting our relationships with customers and our ability to
compete. If we are obligated to fundamentally change our business activities and practices or modify our products, offerings, or
services, we may be unable to make such changes and modifications in a commercially reasonable manner, or at all, and our ability to
develop new products, offerings, and services could be limited.
We are subject to governmental export and import controls that could impair our ability to compete in international markets or subject
us to liability if we violate the controls.
 
Our offerings are subject to export controls and economic sanctions laws and regulations that prohibit the delivery of certain
solutions and services without the required export authorizations or export to locations, governments, and persons targeted by
applicable sanctions. While we have processes to prevent our offerings from being exported in violation of these laws, including
obtaining authorizations as appropriate and screening against U.S. government and international lists of restricted and prohibited
persons, we cannot guarantee that these processes will prevent all violations of export control and sanctions laws.
 
If our channel partners fail to obtain appropriate import, export, or re-export licenses or permits, we may also be adversely
affected, through reputational harm as well as other negative consequences including government investigations and penalties. We
presently incorporate export control and sanctions compliance requirements in our channel partner agreements. Complying with
export control and sanctions regulations for a particular sale may be time-consuming and may result in the delay or loss of sales
opportunities. Violations of applicable sanctions or export control laws can result in fines or penalties.
For additional risks regarding sanctions and trade protectionism, please see the risk factor entitled “We are dependent on
international revenue and operations . . .” earlier in this section.
If we are not able to adequately protect our proprietary rights, our business could be harmed.
We rely on a combination of patent, copyright, and trademark laws, trade secret protections, confidentiality procedures, and
contractual provisions to protect our proprietary rights. However, the steps we take to protect our intellectual property rights may be
inadequate. While we have patent applications pending in the United States and throughout the world, we may be unable to obtain
patent protection for the technology covered in our patent applications. In addition, any patents issued to us in the future may not
provide us with competitive advantages or may be successfully challenged by third parties. Furthermore,
29
Table of Contents
legal standards relating to the validity, enforceability, and scope of protection of intellectual property rights are uncertain. Despite our
efforts to protect our proprietary rights, unauthorized parties from time to time have copied or reverse engineered aspects of our
software or have obtained and used information that we regard as proprietary. Policing unauthorized use of our software is time-
consuming and costly. We are unable to measure the extent to which unauthorized use of our software exists and we expect that
unauthorized use of software will remain a persistent problem, particularly in emerging economies.
Additionally, we actively protect the secrecy of our confidential information and trade secrets, including our source code. If
unauthorized disclosure of our source code occurs, we could potentially lose future trade secret protection for that source code.
Unauthorized disclosure of our source code could make it easier for third parties to compete with our offerings by copying
functionality, which could adversely affect our financial performance and our reputation. We also seek to protect our confidential
information and trade secrets through the use of non-disclosure agreements with our employees, customers, contractors, vendors, and
partners. However, it is possible that our confidential information and trade secrets may be disclosed or published without our
authorization. If this were to occur, it may be difficult and/or costly for us to enforce our rights, and our financial performance and
reputation could be negatively impacted.
We may face intellectual property infringement claims that could be costly to defend and result in the loss of significant rights.
Our competitors, as well as a number of other entities and individuals, may own or claim to own intellectual property relating to
our business. Third parties may claim that we are infringing upon or misappropriating their intellectual property rights, and we may be
found to be infringing upon such rights, even if we are unaware of the intellectual property rights claimed against us. As more
software patents are granted worldwide, the number of offerings and competitors in our industries grows, and the functionality of
products in different industries overlaps, we expect that software developers will be increasingly subject to infringement claims.
Additionally, certain patent assertion entities have become more aggressive in threatening and pursuing litigation in attempts to obtain
fees for licensing the right to use patents.
Any claims or threats of infringement or misappropriation, whether with or without merit, have been and could in the future be
time-consuming to defend, result in costly litigation and diversion of resources, cause product delays, require us to change our
products or business practices, prevent us from offering our software and services, or require us to enter into royalty or licensing
agreements. In addition, such royalty or license agreements, if required, may not be available on acceptable terms, if at all, which
would likely harm our business. We may also be obligated to indemnify our customers or business partners or pay substantial
settlement costs, including royalty payments, in connection with any such claim or litigation and to obtain licenses, modify
applications, or refund fees, which could be costly. Furthermore, from time to time we may introduce or acquire new products,
including in areas where we historically have not competed, which could increase our exposure to patent and other intellectual
property claims.
Contracting with government entities exposes us to additional risks inherent in the government procurement process.
We provide products and services, directly and indirectly, to a variety of government entities. Risks associated with licensing and
selling products and services to government entities include extended sales and collection cycles, varying governmental budgeting
processes, and adherence to complex procurement regulations and other government-specific contractual requirements. We may be
subject to audits and investigations relating to our government contracts and any violations could result in civil and criminal penalties
and administrative sanctions, including termination of contracts, payment of fines, and suspension or debarment from future
government business, as well as harm to our reputation and financial results.
Risks Relating to Financial Developments
We are exposed to fluctuations in currency exchange rates that could negatively impact our financial results and cash flows.
Because we conduct a substantial portion of our business outside the United States, we face exposure to adverse movements in
foreign currency exchange rates, which could have a material adverse impact on our financial results and cash flows. These exposures
may change over time as business practices evolve and economic conditions change. We use derivative instruments to manage a
portion of our cash flow, revenue and expense exposure to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. As part of our risk
management strategy, we use foreign currency contracts to manage a portion of our exposures of underlying assets, liabilities, and
other obligations, which exist as part of our ongoing business operations. These foreign currency instruments may have maturities that
extend for one to 18 months in the future and provide us with some protection against currency exposures. However, our attempts to
hedge against these risks may not be completely successful, resulting in an adverse impact on our financial results.
30
Table of Contents
The fluctuations of currencies in which we conduct business can both increase and decrease our overall revenue and expenses for
any given period. Although our foreign currency cash flow hedge program extends beyond the current quarter in order to reduce our
exposure to foreign currency volatility, we do not attempt to completely mitigate this risk, and in any case, will incur transaction fees
in adopting such hedging programs. Such volatility, even when it increases our revenues or decreases our expenses, impacts our ability
to accurately predict our future results and earnings.
In addition, global events, including the sudden and unexpected effects of the COVID-19 pandemic as well as geopolitical
developments, may contribute to volatility in foreign exchange markets, which we may not be able to effectively manage, and our
financial results could be adversely impacted. Additionally, countries in which we operate may be classified as highly inflationary
economies, requiring special accounting and financial reporting treatment for such operations, or such countries’ currencies may be
devalued, or both, which may adversely impact our business operations and financial results.
Our debt service obligations may adversely affect our financial condition and cash flows from operations.
We have $2.65 billion of principal debt, consisting of notes due at various times from December 2022 to December 2031, as
described in Part 2, Item 8. We also entered into a credit agreement that provides for an unsecured revolving loan facility in the
aggregate principal amount of $1.5 billion, with an option to be increased up to $2.0 billion, as described in Part 2, Item 8.
Maintenance of our indebtedness, contractual restrictions, and additional issuances of indebtedness could:
•cause us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flows from operations towards debt service obligations and principal
repayments;
•increase our vulnerability to adverse changes in general economic, industry, and competitive conditions;
•limit our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in our business and our industry;
•impair our ability to obtain future financing for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions, general corporate, or other
purposes; and
•due to limitations within the debt instruments, restrict our ability to grant liens on property, enter into certain mergers, dispose
of all or substantially all of the assets of Autodesk and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, materially change our business, and
incur subsidiary indebtedness, subject to customary exceptions.
We are required to comply with the covenants set forth in our credit agreement. If we breach any of the covenants and do not
obtain a waiver from the note holders or lenders, then, subject to applicable cure periods, we would not be able to incur additional
indebtedness under the credit agreement described in Part 2, Item 8, and any outstanding indebtedness under the credit agreement may
be declared immediately due and payable. In addition, changes by any rating agency to our credit rating may negatively impact the
value and liquidity of our securities. Under certain circumstances, if our credit ratings are downgraded or other negative action is
taken, the interest rate payable by us under our credit agreement could increase. Downgrades in our credit ratings could also restrict
our ability to obtain additional financing in the future and could affect the terms of any such financing.
Our investment portfolio consists of a variety of investment vehicles that are subject to interest rate trends, market volatility, and other
economic factors. If general economic conditions decline, this could cause the credit ratings of our investments to deteriorate and
illiquidity in the financial marketplace, and we may experience a decline in interest income and an inability to sell our investments,
leading to impairment in the value of our investments.
It is our policy to invest our cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities in highly liquid instruments with, and in the
custody of, financial institutions with high credit ratings and to limit the amounts invested with any one institution, type of security, or
issuer. However, we are subject to general economic conditions, interest rate trends, and volatility in the financial marketplace that can
affect the income that we receive from our investments, the net realizable value of our investments (including our cash, cash
equivalents, and marketable securities), and our ability to sell them. Any one of these factors could reduce our investment income or
result in material charges, which in turn could impact our overall net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per share.
From time to time we make direct investments in privately held companies. Investments in privately held companies are
considered inherently risky. The technologies and products these companies have under development are typically in the early stages
and may never materialize, which could result in a loss of all or a substantial part of our initial investment in these companies. The
evaluation of privately held companies is based on information that we request from these companies, which is
31
Table of Contents
not subject to the same disclosure regulations as U.S. publicly traded companies and, as such, the basis for these evaluations is subject
to the timing and accuracy of the data received from these companies.
A loss on any of our investments may cause us to record an other-than-temporary impairment charge. The effect of this charge
could impact our overall net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per share. In any of these scenarios, our liquidity may be negatively
impacted, which in turn may prohibit us from making investments in our business, taking advantage of opportunities, and potentially
meeting our financial obligations as they come due.
Changes in tax rules and regulations, and uncertainties in interpretation and application, could materially affect our tax obligations
and effective tax rate.
We are a U.S.-based multinational company subject to tax in multiple U.S. and foreign tax jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate is
primarily based on our geographic mix of earnings; statutory rates; intercompany arrangements, including the manner we develop,
value, and license our intellectual property; and enacted tax rules. Significant judgment is required in determining our effective tax
rate and in evaluating our tax positions on a worldwide basis. While we believe our tax positions, including intercompany transfer
pricing policies, are consistent with the tax laws in the jurisdictions in which we conduct our business, it is possible that these
positions may be challenged by tax authorities and may have a significant impact on our effective tax rate and cash taxes.
Tax laws in the United States and in foreign tax jurisdictions are dynamic and subject to change as new laws are passed and new
interpretations of the law are issued or applied. For example, the U.S. government enacted significant tax law changes in December
2017, the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (“TCJA”), which impacted our tax obligations and effective tax rate beginning in our fiscal 2018
tax year, and significant tax legislation was included in the March 2020 CARES Act and subsequent Consolidated Appropriations Act
in December 2020. Due to the complexity and varying interpretations of the TCJA and the CARES Act, the U.S. Department of
Treasury and other standard-setting bodies have been issuing and will continue to issue regulations and interpretative guidance that
could significantly impact how we will apply the law and the ultimate effect on our results of operations from both the TCJA and the
CARES Act, including for our prior tax years. In addition, increases in corporate tax rates, could increase our effective tax rate, cash
taxes and have an adverse effect on our results from operations.
Increasingly, tax authorities are reviewing existing corporate tax regulatory and legal regimes. Many countries in the European
Union as well as other countries and organizations such as the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development are actively
considering new taxing regimes and changes to existing tax laws. If U.S. or foreign tax authorities change applicable tax laws or
successfully challenge how or where our profits are currently recognized, our overall taxes could increase, and our business, financial
condition, or results of operations may be adversely impacted.
If we were required to record an impairment charge related to the value of our long-lived assets or an additional valuation allowance
against our deferred tax assets, our results of operations would be adversely affected.
Our long-lived assets are tested for impairment if indicators of impairment exist. If impairment testing shows that the carrying
value of our long-lived assets exceeds their estimated fair values, we would be required to record a non-cash impairment charge,
which would decrease the carrying value of our long-lived assets, adversely affecting our results of operations. Our deferred tax assets
include net operating loss, amortizable tax assets, and tax credit carryforwards that can be used to offset taxable income and reduce
income taxes payable in future periods. Each quarter, we assess the need for a valuation allowance, considering both positive and
negative evidence to determine whether all or a portion of the deferred tax assets are more likely than not to be realized. We continue
to have a full valuation allowance against certain U.S. and foreign deferred tax assets. Changes in the amount of the U.S. and foreign
jurisdictions valuation allowance could also result in a material non-cash expense or benefit in the period in which the valuation
allowance is adjusted, and our results of operations could be materially affected. We will continue to perform these tests on our
worldwide deferred tax assets, and any future adjustments to the realizability of our deferred tax assets may have a material effect on
our financial condition and results of operations.
General Risk Factors
Our business may be significantly disrupted upon the occurrence of a catastrophic event.
Our business is highly automated and relies extensively on the availability of our network and data center infrastructure, our
internal technology systems, and our websites. We also rely on hosted computer services from third parties for services that we
provide to our customers and computer operations for our internal use. The failure of our systems or hosted computer
32
Table of Contents
services due to a catastrophic event, such as an earthquake, fire, flood, tsunami, weather event, telecommunications failure, power
failure, cyber attack, terrorism or war (including the significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia and any related
political or economic responses and counter-responses or otherwise by various global actors or the general effect on the global
economy), or business interruption from epidemics or pandemics, or the fear of such events, could adversely impact our business,
financial results, and financial condition. For example, our corporate headquarters and executive offices are located near major seismic
faults in the San Francisco Bay Area and face annual periods of wildfire danger, which increase the probability of power outages and
may impact employees’ abilities to commute to work or to work from home. We have developed disaster recovery plans and maintain
backup systems in order to reduce the potential impact of a catastrophic event; however, there can be no assurance that these plans and
systems would enable us to return to normal business operations. In addition, any such event could negatively impact a country or
region in which we sell our products. This could in turn decrease that country’s or region’s demand for our products, negatively
impacting our financial results.
We are subject to legal proceedings and regulatory inquiries, and we may be named in additional legal proceedings or become
involved in regulatory inquiries in the future, all of which are costly, distracting to our core business, and could result in an
unfavorable outcome or a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows, or the trading
prices for our securities.
We are involved in legal proceedings and receive inquiries from regulatory agencies. As the global economy has changed and
our business has evolved, we have seen an increase in litigation activity and regulatory inquiries. Like many other technology
companies, the number and frequency of inquiries from U.S. and foreign regulatory agencies we have received regarding our business
and our business practices, as well as the business practices of others in our industry, have increased in recent years. In the event we
are involved in significant disputes or are the subject of a formal action by a regulatory agency, we could be exposed to costly and
time-consuming legal proceedings that could result in any number of outcomes. Any claims or regulatory actions initiated by or
against us, whether successful or not, could result in high defense costs, damage awards, injunctive relief, increased costs of business,
fines or orders to change certain business practices, significant dedication of management time, diversion of operational resources, or
otherwise harm our business. In any such event, our financial results, results of operations, cash flows, or trading prices for our
securities could be negatively impacted.
Changes in existing financial accounting standards or practices, or taxation rules or practices may adversely affect our results of
operations.
Changes in existing accounting or taxation rules or practices, new accounting pronouncements or taxation rules, or varying
interpretations of current accounting pronouncements or taxation practices could have a significant adverse effect on our results of
operations or the way we conduct our business. Further, such changes could potentially affect our reporting of transactions completed
before such changes are effective.
We are required to evaluate our internal control over financial reporting under Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and any
adverse results from such evaluation could result in a loss of investor confidence in our financial reports and have an adverse effect on
our stock price.
Pursuant to Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, we are required to furnish a report by our management on our
internal control over financial reporting, including an assessment of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as
of the end of our fiscal year. This assessment must include a statement as to whether or not our internal control over financial reporting
is effective and disclosure of any material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting identified by management. If our
management or independent registered public accounting firm identifies one or more material weaknesses in our internal control over
financial reporting, we are unable to assert that our internal control over financial reporting is effective, or our independent registered
public accounting firm is unable to express an opinion that our internal controls are effective, investors could lose confidence in the
accuracy and completeness of our financial reports, which could have an adverse effect on our business and stock price.
In preparing our financial statements we make certain assumptions, judgments, and estimates that affect amounts reported in our
consolidated financial statements which, if not accurate, may significantly impact our financial results.
We make assumptions, judgments, and estimates for a number of items, including revenue recognition for product subscriptions
and enterprise business arrangements (“EBAs”), the determination of the fair value of acquired assets and liabilities, goodwill,
financial instruments including strategic investments, long-lived assets, and intangible assets, the realizability of deferred tax assets,
and the fair value of stock awards. We also make assumptions, judgments, and estimates in determining the accruals for uncertain tax
positions, variable compensation, partner incentive programs, product returns
33
Table of Contents
reserves, allowances for credit losses, asset retirement obligations, legal contingencies, and operating lease liabilities. These
assumptions, judgments, and estimates are drawn from historical experience and various other factors that we believe are reasonable
under the circumstances as of the date of the consolidated financial statements. Actual results could differ materially from our
estimates, and such differences could significantly impact our financial results.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
We lease approximately 1,830,000 square feet of office space in 101 locations in the United States and internationally through
our foreign subsidiaries. Our executive offices are in leased office space in San Francisco, California, and our corporate headquarters
are in leased office space in San Rafael, California. Our San Rafael facilities consist of approximately 116,000 square feet under leases
that expire in December 2024. Our San Francisco facilities consist of approximately 284,000 square feet under leases that have
expiration dates ranging from December 2022 to June 2026. We and our foreign subsidiaries lease additional space in various
locations throughout the world for local sales, product development, and technical support personnel.
All facilities are in good condition. The COVID-19 pandemic has spurred changes in the way we work as we move to a more
hybrid workforce resulting in an evaluation of our office space needs. Accordingly, we are reducing the square footage of our facilities
portfolio by approximately 20 percent worldwide and incurred impairments to assets associated with our operating leases for real
estate in the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, and expect to incur impairments over the next several quarters. See Part II, Item 7,
“Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” and Note 9, “Leases,” in the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements for more information. We believe that our existing facilities and offices are adequate to meet our
requirements for the foreseeable future.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are involved in a variety of claims, suits, investigations, inquiries, and proceedings in the normal course of business
activities including claims of alleged infringement of intellectual property rights, commercial, employment, tax, prosecution of
unauthorized use, business practices, and other matters. In our opinion, resolution of pending matters is not expected to have a
material adverse impact on our consolidated results of operations, cash flows, or financial position. Given the unpredictable nature of
legal proceedings, there is a reasonable possibility that an unfavorable resolution of one or more such proceedings could in the future
materially affect our results of operations, cash flows, or financial position in a particular period, however, based on the information
known by us as of the date of this filing and the rules and regulations applicable to the preparation of our financial statements, any
such amount is either immaterial or it is not possible to provide an estimated amount of any such potential loss.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
    Not applicable.
34
Table of Contents
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
MARKET INFORMATION FOR COMMON STOCK
Our common stock is traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the symbol ADSK.
DIVIDEND POLICY
We anticipate that, for the foreseeable future, we will not pay any cash or stock dividends.
STOCKHOLDERS
As of January 31, 2022, the number of common stockholders of record was 316. Because many of our shares of common stock
are held by brokers or other institutions on behalf of stockholders, we are unable to estimate the total number of stockholders
represented by the record holders.
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Autodesk’s stock repurchase program provides Autodesk with the ability to offset the dilution from the issuance of stock under
our employee stock plans and reduce shares outstanding over time, and has the effect of returning excess cash generated from our
business to stockholders. Under the share repurchase program, Autodesk may repurchase shares from time to time in open market
transactions, privately negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase programs, tender offers, or by other means. The share
repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will depend on factors such as cash
generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, remaining shares available in the authorized
pool, cash requirements for acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price, and legal and regulatory requirements.
The following table provides information about the repurchase of common stock in open-market transactions during the quarter
ended January 31, 2022:
(Shares in millions)Total Number of
Shares PurchasedAverage Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number of Shares Purchased
as Part of Publicly Announced
Plans or Programs(1)Maximum Number of Shares that
May Yet Be Purchased Under the
Plans or Programs(2)
November 1 - November 30 0.3 $ 279.82 0.3 10.1 
December 1 - December 31 1.3 272.30 1.3 8.8 
January 1 - January 31 0.7 251.00 0.7 8.1 
Total 2.3 $ 267.22 2.3 
____________________ 
(1) Represents shares purchased in open-market transactions under the stock repurchase program approved by the Board of Directors.
(2) These amounts correspond to the plan publicly announced and approved by the Board of Directors in September 2016 that authorizes the
repurchase of 30.0 million shares. The plan does not have a fixed expiration date.
SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES
In connection with acquisitions completed in the fourth fiscal quarter of 2022, we issued and entered into agreements to issue up
to an estimated 52,000 shares of our common stock (based on the volume weighted average closing price of our common stock as of
January 31, 2022) as part of the consideration for the acquisition, contingent upon the achievement of certain events expected in fiscal
years 2023, 2024 and 2025. The exact number of shares will be determined and issued following these events. The issuance of shares
of our common stock in these acquisitions will not be registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act").
Such shares will be issued in private placements exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act in reliance on the
exemptions set forth in Section 4(a)(2) of the Securities Act and Rule 506 under Regulation D.
35
Table of Contents
COMPANY STOCK PERFORMANCE
The following graph shows a five-year comparison of cumulative total return (equal to dividends plus stock appreciation) for
our common stock, the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index, and the Dow Jones U.S. Software Index. The following graph and related
information will not be deemed to be “soliciting material” or to be “filed” with the SEC, nor will such information be incorporated by
reference into any filing pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, except to the extent that we
specifically incorporate it by reference into such filing.
Comparison of Five Year Cumulative Total Stockholder Return (1)
___________________ 
(1) Assumes $100 invested on January 31, 2017, in Autodesk’ s stock, the Standard & Poor ’s 500 Stock Index, and the Dow Jones U.S. Software
Index, with reinvestment of all dividends. Total stockholder returns for prior periods are not an indication of future investment returns.
36
Table of Contents
ITEM 6. [RESERVED]
37
Table of Contents
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read in conjunction with
our consolidated financial statements and related notes appearing in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. This
discussion contains forward-looking statements based upon current expectations that involve risks and uncertainties. Our actual
results may differ materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking statements as a result of several factors, including those
set forth above in Part I, Item 1A, "Risk Factors," and elsewhere in this report. See “Forward-Looking Information” immediately
preceding Part I.
STRATEGY
Autodesk is changing how the world is designed and made. Our technology spans architecture, engineering, construction,
product design, manufacturing, media and entertainment, empowering innovators everywhere to solve challenges big and small. From
greener buildings to smarter products to more mesmerizing blockbusters, Autodesk technology helps our customers to design and
make a better world for all.
Our strategy is to build enduring relationships with customers, delivering innovative technology that provides valuable
automation and insight into their design and make process. To drive execution of our strategy, we are focused on three strategic
priorities: delivering on the promise of subscription, digitizing the company, and reimagining construction, manufacturing, and
production.
We equip and inspire our users with the tailored tools, services, and access they need for success today and tomorrow. At every
step, we help users harness the power of data to build upon their ideas and explore new ways of imagining, collaborating, and creating
to achieve better outcomes for their customers, for society, and for the world. And because creativity can’t flourish in silos, we connect
what matters - from steps in a project to collaborators on a unified platform.
Autodesk was founded during the platform transition from mainframe computers and engineering workstations to personal
computers. We have developed and sustained a compelling value proposition based upon software for the personal computer. Just as
the transition from mainframes to personal computers transformed the industry, the software industry has undergone a transition from
developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to subscriptions and cloud-enabled technologies.
Product Evolution
We offer subscriptions for individual products and Industry Collections, enterprise business arrangements (“EBAs”), and cloud
service offerings (collectively referred to as “subscription plan”). Subscription plans are designed to give our customers more
flexibility with how they use our offerings and to attract a broader range of customers, such as project-based users and small
businesses.
Our subscription plans currently represent a hybrid of desktop software and cloud functionality, which provides a device-
independent, collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders. Our cloud offerings, for example, BIM 360, Fusion
360, ShotGrid, AutoCAD web app, and AutoCAD mobile app, provide tools, including mobile and collaboration capabilities, to
streamline design, collaboration, building and manufacturing, and data management processes. We believe that customer adoption of
these latest offerings will continue to grow as customers across a range of industries begin to take advantage of the scalable computing
power and flexibility provided through these services.
Industry Collections provide our customers with access to a broader selection of Autodesk solutions and services, simplifying the
customers’ ability to benefit from a complete set of tools for their industry.
To support our strategic priority of re-imagining Architecture, Engineering, and Construction (“AEC”), we are strengthening the
foundation of our AEC solutions with both organic and inorganic investments. In fiscal 2022, we acquired Storm UK Holdco Limited,
the parent of Innovyze, Inc. (“Innovyze”), which provides water infrastructure software. Combining Innovyze’s hydraulic modeling,
simulation, asset performance management and operational analytics solutions with Autodesk’s design and analysis solutions
(including Autodesk Civil 3D, Autodesk InfraWorks, and the Autodesk Construction Cloud) enables us to deliver end-to-end, cloud-
based solutions for our water infrastructure customers that drive efficiency and sustainability. Other acquisitions in fiscal 2022 include
a cloud-based estimating solution that enables construction teams to create estimates, perform digital takeoffs, generate detailed
reports and proposals and manage bid-day processes. In fiscal 2021, we acquired Spacemaker which uses cloud-based, artificial
intelligence (AI), and generative design to help architects,
38
Table of Contents
urban designers, and real estate developers make faster and more informed early-stage design decisions which can help maximize the
long-term sustainability and return from property investments. Other acquisitions in fiscal 2021 included solutions that use artificial
intelligence and machine learning to extract and process data from project plans and specifications allowing general contractors,
subcontractors, and owners to automate workflows such as submittals and project closeout.
In manufacturing, our strategy is to combine organic and acquired software in existing and adjacent verticals to create end-to-
end, cloud-based solutions for our customers that drive efficiency and sustainability. We continue to attract both global manufacturing
leaders and disruptive startups with our generative design and cloud-based Fusion 360 that converges the process of design with
manufacturing. A fiscal 2021 acquisition included a leading provider of post-processing and machine simulation solutions. In fiscal
2022, we acquired Upchain, an instant-on, cloud-based data management technology that allows product design and manufacturing
customers to collaborate in the cloud across their value chains and bring products to market faster.
Our strategy includes improving our product functionality and expanding our product offerings through internal development as
well as through the acquisition of products, technology, and businesses. Acquisitions often increase the speed at which we can deliver
product functionality to our customers; however, they entail cost and integration challenges and may, in certain instances, negatively
impact our operating margins. We continually review these factors in making decisions regarding acquisitions. We currently anticipate
that we will continue to acquire products, technology, and businesses as compelling opportunities become available.
Global Reach
We sell our products and services globally, through a combination of indirect and direct channels. Our indirect channels include
value added resellers, direct market resellers, distributors, computer manufacturers, and other software developers. Our direct channels
include internal sales resources dedicated to selling in our largest accounts, our highly specialized solutions, and business transacted
through our online Autodesk branded store. See Note 2, "Revenue Recognition" in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
for further detail on the results of our indirect and direct channel sales for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020.
We anticipate that our channel mix will continue to change as we scale our online Autodesk branded store business and our
largest accounts shift towards direct-only business models. However, we expect our indirect channel will continue to transact and
support the majority of our customers and revenue. We employ a variety of incentive programs and promotions to align our direct and
indirect channels with our business strategies. In addition, we have a worldwide user group organization and we have created online
user communities dedicated to the exchange of information related to the use of our products.
One of our key strategies is to maintain an open-architecture design of our software products to facilitate third-party
development of complementary products and industry-specific software solutions. This approach enables customers and third parties
to customize solutions for a wide variety of highly specific uses. We offer several programs that provide strategic investment funding,
technological platforms, user communities, technical support, forums, and events to developers who develop add-on applications for
our products. For example, we have established the Autodesk Forge developer platform to support innovators that build solutions to
facilitate the development of a single connected ecosystem for the future of how things are designed, made, and used as well as
support ideas that push the boundaries of 3D printing.
In addition to the competitive advantages afforded by our technology, our large global network of distributors, resellers, third-
party developers, customers, educators, educational institutions, learning partners, and students is a key competitive advantage which
has been cultivated over an extensive period. This network of partners and relationships provides us with a broad and deep reach into
volume markets around the world. Our distributor and reseller network is extensive and provides our customers with the resources to
purchase, deploy, learn, and support our solutions quickly and easily. We have a significant number of registered third-party
developers who create products that work well with our solutions and extend them for a variety of specialized applications.
Impact at Autodesk
Autodesk is committed to advancing a more sustainable, resilient, and equitable world. We don’t believe in waiting for progress,
we believe in making it. We take action as a business and to support our employees, customers, and communities in our collective
opportunity to design and make a better world for all.
We focus our efforts to advance positive outcomes across three primary areas: energy and materials, health and resilience, and
work and prosperity. These impact opportunity areas are derived from the UN Sustainable Development Goals (“SDGs”)
39
Table of Contents
and have been focused through a multi-pronged process to align the top needs of our stakeholders, the important issues of our
business, and the areas we are best placed to accelerate positive impact at scale.
These opportunities manifest as outcomes through how our customers leverage our technology to design and make net-zero
carbon buildings, resilient infrastructure, more sustainable products, and a thriving workforce. We realize these opportunities in our
business through our 100% renewable and net-zero greenhouse gas operations and inclusive culture. We advance these opportunities
with industry innovators through collaboration, grants, software donations, and training.
The Autodesk Foundation (the “Foundation”), a privately funded 501(c)(3) charity organization established and solely funded by
us, leads our philanthropic efforts. The purpose of the Foundation is twofold: to support employees to make a better world by
matching employees’ volunteer time and/or donations to nonprofit organizations; and to support organizations and individuals using
design to drive positive social and environmental impact. On our behalf, the Foundation also administers a discounted software
donation program to nonprofit organizations, social and environmental entrepreneurs, and others who are developing design solutions
that will shape a more sustainable future.
Additional information about our environmental, social, and governance program are available in our annual impact report on
our website at www.autodesk.com. Information contained on or accessible through our website is not part of or incorporated by
reference into this report.
Assumptions Behind Our Strategy
Our strategy depends upon a number of assumptions, including: making our technology available to mainstream markets;
leveraging our large global network of distributors, resellers, third-party developers, customers, educators, educational institutions,
learning partners, and students; improving the performance and functionality of our products; and adequately protecting our
intellectual property. If the outcome of any of these assumptions differs from our expectations, we may not be able to implement our
strategy, which could potentially adversely affect our business. For further discussion regarding these and related risks, see Part I, Item
1A, “Risk Factors.”
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Our Consolidated Financial Statements are prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. In
preparing our Consolidated Financial Statements, we make assumptions, judgments, and estimates that can have a significant impact
on amounts reported in our Consolidated Financial Statements. We evaluate our estimates and assumptions on an ongoing basis. We
base our assumptions, judgments, and estimates on historical experience and various other factors that we believe to be reasonable
under the circumstances. Actual results could differ materially from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions.
Our significant accounting policies are described in Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. An accounting policy is deemed to be critical if it requires an accounting
estimate to be made based on assumptions about matters that are highly uncertain at the time the estimate is made, if different
estimates reasonably could have been used, or if changes in the estimate that are reasonably possible could materially impact the
financial statements. We believe that of all our significant accounting policies, the following accounting policies and specific estimates
involve a greater degree of judgment and complexity. Accordingly, these are the accounting policies we believe are the most critical to
aid in fully understanding and evaluating our financial condition and results of operations.
Revenue Recognition - Judgments with Multiple Performance Obligations. Our contracts with customers may include promises
to transfer multiple products and services to a customer. A performance obligation is a promise in a contract with a customer to
transfer products or services that are distinct. Determining whether products and services are distinct performance obligations that
should be accounted for separately or combined as a single performance obligation may require significant judgment that requires us
to assess the nature of the promise and value delivered to the customer and the interaction of the desktop applications and cloud
functionalities.
For our product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible enterprise business arrangements, the functional nature of the
promise, as well as the customers’ value expectations, led us to conclude desktop applications and cloud functionalities are not distinct
in the context of the contract and should be accounted for as a single performance obligation. There is a high degree of interaction of
the desktop applications and cloud functionalities, which is not available with the desktop applications alone or in conjunction with
third-party cloud service providers. Furthermore, customers are not able to use the desktop applications for its intended purpose
without our cloud functionalities.
40
Table of Contents
For contracts with more than one performance obligation, the transaction price is allocated among the performance obligations
in an amount that depicts the relative standalone selling price (“SSP”) of each obligation. Judgment is required to determine the SSP
for each distinct performance obligation. We use a range of amounts to estimate SSP when we sell each of the products and services
separately and need to determine whether there is a discount that should be allocated based on the relative SSP of the various products
and services. 
In instances where SSP is not directly observable, such as when we do not sell the product or service separately, we determine
the SSP using information that includes market conditions and other observable inputs. We typically have more than one SSP for
individual products and services due to the stratification of those products and services by customer and circumstance. In these
instances, we use relevant information such as the sales channel to determine the SSP.
Strategic Investments. Strategic investment debt and equity securities are valued using significant unobservable inputs or data in
an inactive market and the valuation requires our judgment due to the absence of market prices and inherent lack of liquidity. The
carrying value is adjusted for our strategic investment equity securities if there are observable price changes in a same or similar
security from the same issuer or if there are identified events or changes in circumstances that may indicate impairment, as discussed
below. The determination of whether an orderly transaction is for a same or similar investment requires significant management
judgment including the nature of rights and obligations of the investments, the extent to which differences in those rights and
obligations would affect the fair values of those investments, and the impact of any differences based on the stage of operational
development of the investee.
These assumptions are inherently subjective and involve significant management judgment. Whenever possible, we use
observable market data and rely on unobservable inputs only when observable market data is not available when determining fair
value.
We assess our strategic investment debt and equity securities portfolio quarterly for impairment. Strategic investment equity
securities are assessed based on available information such as current cash positions, earnings and cash flow forecasts, recent
operational performance, and any other readily available market data. For any available-for-sale debt securities, if Autodesk does not
intend to sell and it is not more likely than not that Autodesk will be required to sell the available-for-sale debt security prior to
recovery of its amortized cost basis, Autodesk will determine whether a decline in fair value below the amortized cost basis is due to
credit-related factors. The credit loss is measured as the amount by which the debt security’s amortized cost basis exceeds the estimate
of the present value of cash flows expected to be collected, up to the difference between the amortized cost basis and the fair value.
Impairment will be assessed at the individual security level. Credit-related impairment is recognized as an allowance on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets with a corresponding adjustment to “Interest and other expense, net” on the Company’s Consolidated
Statements of Operations. Any impairment that is not credit-related is recognized in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
For our quarterly impairment assessment of privately held debt and equity securities, the analysis encompasses an assessment of
the severity and duration of the impairment and qualitative and quantitative analysis of other key factors including: the investee’s
financial metrics, the investee’s products and technologies meeting or exceeding predefined milestones, market acceptance of the
product or technology, other competitive products or technology in the market, general market conditions, management and
governance structure of the investee, the investee’s liquidity, debt ratios, and the rate at which the investee is using its cash.
Business Combinations. The assets acquired and liabilities assumed in a business combination are recorded based on their
estimated fair values at the acquisition date, with the exception of contract assets and contract liabilities (i.e., deferred revenue) which
are recognized and measured on the acquisition date in accordance with Autodesk’s “Revenue Recognition” policy in Note 1
“Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies”. Any residual purchase price is recorded as goodwill. Accounting for
business combinations requires us to make significant estimates and assumptions, especially at the acquisition date with respect to
intangible assets and deferred revenue obligations.
Although we believe the assumptions and estimates we have made are reasonable, they are based in part on historical experience
and information obtained from the management of the acquired companies and are inherently uncertain and unpredictable.
Unanticipated events and circumstances may occur which may affect the accuracy or validity of such assumptions, estimates, or actual
results. Examples of critical estimates used in valuing certain of the intangible assets and in determining the assets’ useful lives for the
assets we have acquired or may acquire in the future include but are not limited to:
•future expected cash flows from subscriptions and maintenance agreements, sales, and acquired developed technologies;
41
Table of Contents
•the acquired company's trade name and patents, as well as assumptions about the period of time the acquired trade name and
patents will continue to be used in our product portfolio;
•expected growth in revenue from the acquired company’s existing customer relationships;
•expected costs to develop the in-process research and development into commercially viable products and estimated cash
flows from the projects when completed;
•uncertain tax positions and tax related valuation allowances assumed; and
•discount rates used to determine the present value of estimated future cash flows.
Realizability of Long-Lived Assets. We assess the realizability of our long-lived assets and related intangible assets, other than
goodwill, quarterly, or sooner should events or changes in circumstances indicate the carrying values of such assets may not be
recoverable. We consider the following factors important in determining when to perform an impairment review: significant under-
performance of a business or product line relative to budget, shifts in business strategies which affect the continued uses of the assets,
significant negative industry or economic trends, and the results of past impairment reviews. When such events or changes in
circumstances occur, we assess recoverability of these assets. 
We assess recoverability of these assets by comparing the carrying amounts to the future undiscounted cash flows the assets are
expected to generate. If impairment indicators were present based on our undiscounted cash flow models, which include assumptions
regarding projected cash flows, we would perform a discounted cash flow analysis to assess impairments on long-lived assets.
The key assumptions that we use in our discounted cash flow model include the amount and timing of estimated future cash
flows to be generated by the asset group over an extended period of time and a rate of return that considers the relative risk of
achieving the cash flows and the time value of money. Significant judgment is required to estimate the amount and timing of future
cash flows and the relative risk of achieving those cash flows. We also make judgments about the remaining useful lives of acquired
intangible assets and other long-lived assets that have finite lives.
Variances in these assumptions could have a significant impact on our conclusion as to whether an asset is impaired or the
amount of any impairment charge. Impairment charges, if any, result in situations where any fair values of these assets are less than
their carrying values.
Income Taxes. We account for income taxes under the asset and liability approach. Under this method, deferred tax assets,
including those related to tax loss carryforwards and credits, and deferred tax liabilities are determined based on the differences
between the financial statement and tax bases of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the
differences are expected to reverse. We recognize the tax benefit for an uncertain tax position when it meets the more likely than not
threshold for recognition. We recognize potential accrued interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits as income tax
expense. 
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce deferred tax assets when management cannot conclude that it is more likely than not
that the deferred tax asset will be recovered. The valuation allowance is determined by assessing both positive and negative evidence
to determine whether it is more likely than not that deferred tax assets are recoverable; such assessment is required on a jurisdiction-
by-jurisdiction basis. Significant judgment is required in determining whether the valuation allowance should be recorded against
deferred tax assets. In assessing the need for or release of a valuation allowance, we consider all available evidence including past
operating results and estimates of future taxable income.
As we continually strive to optimize our overall business model, tax planning strategies may become feasible and prudent
whereby management may determine that it is more likely than not that the Netherlands, Canada, Australia, California, Michigan and
U.S. capital loss deferred tax assets will be realized. Each quarter we will continue to evaluate the positive and negative evidence of
our ability to utilize our global deferred tax assets.
Loss Contingencies. As described in Part I, Item 3, “Legal Proceedings” and Part II, Item 8, Note 10, “Commitments and
Contingencies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, we are periodically involved in various legal claims and
proceedings. We routinely review the status of each significant matter and assess our potential financial exposure. If the potential loss
from any matter is considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated, we record a liability for the estimated loss.
Significant judgment is required to determine both the likelihood of there being, and the estimated amount of, a loss related to such
matters. Due to inherent uncertainties related to these matters, we base our loss accruals on the best information available at the time.
Until the final resolution of such matters, there may be an exposure to loss in excess of the
42
Table of Contents
amount recorded. As additional information becomes available, we reassess our potential liability and may revise our estimates. Such
revisions could have a material impact on future quarterly or annual results of operations.
RECENTLY ISSUED ACCOUNTING STANDARDS
See Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements for a full description of recent accounting pronouncements, including the expected dates of adoption and estimated effects
on results of operations and financial condition.
OVERVIEW OF FISCAL 2022
•Total net revenue was $4.39 billion during fiscal 2022, an increase of 16% compared to the prior fiscal year.
•Recurring revenue as a percentage of net revenue was 96% for the fiscal year ending January 31, 2022, compared to 97% for
the same period in the prior fiscal year.
•Net revenue retention rate (“NR3”) was within the range of 100% and 110% as of both January 31, 2022 and 2021.
•Deferred revenue was $3.79 billion, an increase of 13% compared to the prior fiscal year.
•Remaining performance obligations (short-term and long-term deferred revenue plus unbilled deferred revenue) (“RPO”) was
$4.74 billion, an increase of 12% compared to the fourth quarter in the prior fiscal year.
•Current remaining performance obligations were $3.14 billion, an increase of 15% compared to the prior fiscal year.
Revenue Analysis
During fiscal 2022, net revenue increased 16%, as compared to the prior fiscal year, primarily due to a 19% increase in
subscription revenue, partially offset by a 58% decrease in maintenance revenue.
Further discussion of the drivers of these results are discussed below under the heading “Results of Operations.”
We rely significantly upon major distributors and resellers in both the United States and international regions, including Tech
Data Corporation and its global affiliates (collectively, “Tech Data”) and Ingram Micro Inc. (“Ingram Micro”). Total sales to Tech
Data accounted for 36%, 37% and 35% of Autodesk’s total net revenue during fiscal 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Ingram Micro
accounted for 9% of Autodesk's total net revenue during fiscal 2022 and 10% of Autodesk's total net revenue during both fiscal 2021
and 2020. Our customers through Tech Data and Ingram Micro are the resellers and end users who purchase our software
subscriptions and services. Should any of our agreements with Tech Data or Ingram Micro be terminated for any reason, we believe
the resellers and end users who currently purchase our products through Tech Data or Ingram Micro would be able to continue to do so
under substantially the same terms from one of our many other distributors without substantial disruption to our revenue.
Consequently, we believe our business is not substantially dependent on Tech Data or Ingram Micro.
Recurring Revenue and Net Revenue Retention Rate
In order to help better understand our financial performance we use several key performance metrics, including recurring
revenue and NR3. These metrics are key performance metrics and should be viewed independently of revenue and deferred revenue as
these metrics are not intended to be combined with those items. We use these metrics to monitor the strength of our recurring business.
We believe these metrics are useful to investors because they can help in monitoring the long-term health of our business. Our
determination and presentation of these metrics may differ from that of other companies. The presentation of these metrics is meant to
be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for or in isolation from, our financial measures prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Please refer to the “Glossary of Terms” for the definitions of these metrics in Part I, Item 1 Business.
43
Table of Contents
The following table outlines our recurring revenue metric for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2022Change compared to
prior fiscal year end Fiscal Year
Ended January
31, 2021Change compared to
prior fiscal year endFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2020 $ %    $ %    
Recurring Revenue  (in millions)  (1) $4,232.7 $ 570.5 16 %$ 3,662.2 $ 523.7 17 %$3,138.5 
As a percentage of net revenue 96 % N/A N/A 97 % N/A N/A 96 %
 ________________
(1)     The acquisition of a business may cause variability in the comparison of recurring revenue in this table above and recurring revenue derived
from the revenue reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
NR3 was within the range of 100% and 110% as of both January 31, 2022 and 2021.
Foreign Currency Analysis
We generate a significant amount of our revenue in the United States, Japan, Germany, the United Kingdom, and Finland.
The following table shows the impact of foreign exchange rate changes on our net revenue and total spend:
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2022
Percent
change compared to
prior fiscal year (as
reported)Constant currency
percent
change compared to
prior fiscal year (1)Positive/negative/neutral
impact from foreign
exchange rate changes
Net revenue 16 % 14 % Positive
Total spend 19 % 18 % Negative
 ________________
(1) Please refer to the “Glossary of Terms” in Part I, Item 1 Business for the definitions of our constant currency growth rates.
Changes in the value of the U.S. dollar may have a significant effect on net revenue, total spend, and income from operations in
future periods. We use foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate effect on a portion of the net revenue of certain
anticipated transactions but do not attempt to completely mitigate the impact of fluctuations of such foreign currency against the U.S.
dollar.
Remaining Performance Obligations
RPO represents deferred revenue and contractually stated or committed orders under early renewal and multi-year billing plans
for subscription, services, license, and maintenance for which the associated deferred revenue has not yet been recognized. Unbilled
deferred revenue is not included as a receivable or deferred revenue on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. See Part II, Item 8, Note 2,
“Revenue Recognition” for more details on Autodesk's performance obligations.
(in millions) January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021
Deferred revenue $ 3,789.8 $ 3,360.2 
Unbilled deferred revenue 949.2 880.5 
RPO $ 4,739.0 $ 4,240.7 
 
RPO consisted of the following:
(in millions) January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021
Current RPO $ 3,140.5 $ 2,738.0 
Non-current RPO 1,598.5 1,502.7 
RPO $ 4,739.0 $ 4,240.7 
44
Table of Contents
We expect that the amount of RPO will change from quarter to quarter for several reasons, including the specific timing,
duration, and size of customer subscription and support agreements, varying billing cycles of such agreements, the specific timing of
customer renewals, and foreign currency fluctuations. Historically, we have had increased EBA sales activity in our fourth fiscal
quarter and this seasonality may affect the relative value of our billings, RPO, and collections in the fourth and first fiscal quarters.
Balance Sheet and Cash Flow Items
At January 31, 2022, we had $1.81 billion in cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities. Our cash flow from operations
increased to $1.53 billion for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, from $1.44 billion for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2021. We
repurchased 4.0 million shares of our common stock for $1.09 billion during fiscal 2022. Comparatively, we repurchased 2.6 million
shares of our common stock for $549.4 million during fiscal 2021. Further discussion regarding the balance sheet and cash flow
activities are discussed below under the heading “Liquidity and Capital Resources.”
45
Table of Contents
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Impacts of COVID-19 to Autodesk’s Business
We are continuing to conduct business during the COVID-19 pandemic with substantial modifications to employee travel,
employee work locations, and virtualization, postponement or cancellation of certain sales and marketing events, among other
modifications. We will continue to invest in critical areas such as research and development, construction, and digitizing the company
to ensure our future success as we come out of the pandemic. We have observed other companies, as well as many governments
continuing to take precautionary measures to address COVID-19, and they may take further actions that alter their normal business
operations. While government authorities in some geographies are removing or adding COVID-19 related business operations
restrictions, we continue to actively monitor the situation and may take further actions that alter our business operations as may be
required by federal, state, or local authorities, or that we determine are in the best interests of our employees, customers, partners,
suppliers, and stockholders, including in response to outbreaks and variants. 
Additionally, the COVID-19 pandemic has spurred changes in the way we work as we move to a more hybrid workforce
resulting in an evaluation of our office space needs. Accordingly, we are reducing our facilities portfolio worldwide and incurred
impairment and accelerated depreciation charges of $103.7 million to assets associated with our operating leases for real estate during
the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, and expect to incur additional impairments over the next several quarters which we currently
estimate could result in impairment charges that would range up to approximately $25.0 million depending on the then-current market
conditions. See Note 9, “Leases,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for more information. Optimizing our facilities
costs will allow us to better deploy capital to further our strategy and drive growth. However, there is no guarantee that we will realize
any anticipated benefits to our business, including any cost savings or operational efficiencies, or that our impairment charges would
be limited to that amount.
We believe our investment in cloud products and a subscription business model, backed by a strong balance sheet, give us a
robust foundation to successfully navigate the economic challenges of COVID-19. However, supply chain disruption and resulting
inflationary pressures, a global labor shortage, and the ebb and flow of COVID-19, including in specific geographies, are currently
impacting the pace of our recovery and our outlook. The extent of the impact on our business in fiscal 2023 and beyond will depend
on several factors, including the full duration and the extent of the pandemic, including as a result of outbreaks and variants; actions
taken by governments, businesses, and consumers in response to the pandemic; speed and timing of economic recovery, including in
specific geographies; speed of continued rollout of COVID-19 vaccines, lifting of restrictions on movement, and normalization of full-
time return to work and social events; our billings and renewal rates, including new business close rates, rate of multi-year contracts,
pace of closing larger transactions, and new unit volume growth; and effect of the pandemic on margins and cash flow. All of these
factors continue to evolve and remain uncertain at this time, and some of these factors are not within our control. Further discussion of
the potential impacts of COVID-19 on our business can be found in Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors.”
Net Revenue by Income Statement Presentation
Subscription revenue consists of our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible EBAs. Revenue
from these arrangements is predominately recognized ratably over the contract term commencing with the date our service is made
available to customers and when all other revenue recognition criteria have been satisfied.
Maintenance revenue consists of renewal fees for existing maintenance plan agreements that were initially purchased with a
perpetual software license. Under our maintenance plan, customers are eligible to receive unspecified upgrades, when and if available,
and technical support. We recognize maintenance revenue ratably over the term of the agreements, which is generally one year.
Other revenue consists of revenue from consulting, training, and other products and services, and is recognized as the products
are delivered and services are performed.
46
Table of Contents
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2021 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $     %      
Net revenue:
Subscription $4,156.4 $ 677.5 19 %$3,478.9 Increase due to growth across
subscription types, led by subscription
renewal revenue as a result of growth
in the subscription base. Also
contributing to the growth was an
increase in revenue from EBA
offerings.
Maintenance 76.3 (107.0) (58)% 183.3 
    Total subscription and maintenance revenue 4,232.7 570.5 16 % 3,662.2 
Other 153.7 25.5 20 % 128.2 
$4,386.4 $ 596.0 16 %$3,790.4 
 
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2020 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $ %      
Net revenue:
Subscription $3,478.9 $ 727.0 26 %$2,751.9 Increase due to growth across
subscription types, led by product
subscription renewal revenue. Also
contributing to the growth was an
increase in revenue from EBA
offerings.
Maintenance 183.3 (203.3) (53)% 386.6 
    Total subscription and maintenance revenue 3,662.2 523.7 17 % 3,138.5 
Other 128.2 (7.6) (6)% 135.8 
$3,790.4 $ 516.1 16 %$3,274.3 
47
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Product Family
Our product offerings are focused in four primary product families: Architecture, Engineering and Construction (“AEC”),
AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT, Manufacturing (“MFG”), and Media and Entertainment (“M&E”).
 
Fiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2021 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $     %      
Net revenue by product family:
AEC $1,959.9 $ 311.3 19 %$1,648.6 Increase due to growth in revenue from AEC
collections, EBAs, Innovyze and Revit.
AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT 1,253.0 153.6 14 % 1,099.4 Increase due to growth in revenue from both
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T.
MFG 876.0 77.4 10 % 798.6 Increase due to growth in revenue from
Fusion360, EBAs, and MFG Collections.
M&E 258.9 39.5 18 % 219.4 Increase due to growth in revenue from EBAs,
Maya, and M&E Collections.
Other 38.6 14.2 58 % 24.4 
$4,386.4 $ 596.0 16 %$3,790.4 
 
Fiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2020 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $ %      
Net revenue by product family:
AEC $1,648.6 $271.5 20 %$1,377.1 Increase due to growth in revenue from AEC
collections, EBAs, BIM360 and PlanGrid.
AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT 1,099.4 151.2 16 % 948.2 Increase due to growth in revenue from both
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T.
MFG 798.6 72.5 10 % 726.1 Increase due to growth in revenue from MFG
Collections, EBAs, and Fusion360.
M&E 219.4 20.2 10 % 199.2 Increase due to growth in revenue from EBAs,
M&E Collections, Maya, and 3DS Max.
Other 24.4 0.7 3 % 23.7 
$3,790.4 $516.1 16 %$3,274.3 
48
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Geographic Area
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearConstant
currency
change
compared to
prior fiscal
yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearConstant
currency
change
compared to
prior fiscal
yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2020
(in millions, except
percentages) $      %      % $      %      %
Net revenue:
Americas
U.S. $1,456.5 $174.7 14 % *$1,281.8 $172.9 16 % *$1,108.9 
Other Americas 308.6 48.0 18 % * 260.6 33.7 15 % * 226.9 
Total Americas 1,765.1 222.7 14 % 14 % 1,542.4 206.6 15 % 16 % 1,335.8 
EMEA 1,700.4 227.8 15 % 12 % 1,472.6 169.1 13 % 15 % 1,303.5 
APAC 920.9 145.5 19 % 17 % 775.4 140.4 22 % 22 % 635.0 
Total net revenue $4,386.4 $596.0 16 % 14 %$3,790.4 $516.1 16 % 17 %$3,274.3 
Emer ging economies $ 546.4 $ 83.2 18 % 17 %$ 463.2 $67.0 17 % 17 %$ 396.2 
____________________
* Constant currency data not provided at this level.
We believe that international revenue will continue to comprise a majority of our net revenue. Unfavorable economic conditions
in the countries that contribute a significant portion of our net revenue, including in emerging economies such as Brazil, Russia, India,
and China, and including as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic or in connection with the
significant military action against Ukraine launched by Russia (or any related political or economic responses and counter-responses
or otherwise by various global actors or the general effect on the global economy), may have an adverse effect on our business in those
countries and our overall financial performance. Changes in the value of the U.S. dollar relative to other currencies have significantly
affected, and could continue to significantly affect, our financial results for a given period even though we hedge a portion of our
current and projected revenue. Increases to the levels of political and economic unpredictability or protectionism in the global market
may impact our future financial results.
49
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Sales Channel
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2021 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $     %      
Net revenue by sales channel:
Indirect $2,849.4 $ 249.4 10 %$2,600.0 Increase due to growth in subscription
revenue.
Direct 1,537.0 346.6 29 % 1,190.4 Increase due to an increase in EBAs and our
online Autodesk branded store.
Total net revenue $4,386.4 $ 596.0 16 %$3,790.4 
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2020 Management Comments (in millions, except percentages) $ %      
Net revenue by sales channel:
Indirect $2,600.0 $ 317.8 14 %$2,282.2 Increase due to growth in subscription
revenue of fset by lower maintenance plan
subscriptions.
Direct 1,190.4 198.3 20 % 992.1 Increase due to growth in EBAs and our
online Autodesk branded store.
Total net revenue $3,790.4 $ 516.1 16 %$3,274.3 
50
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Product Type
Fiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2021 (In millions, except percentages) $    %    Management Comments
Net Revenue by Product Type:
Design $ 3,868.8 $ 503 15 %$ 3,365.8 Increase is due to growth in AEC &
MFG collections, AutoCAD Family ,
AutoCAD L T, and EBA  offerings.
Make 363.9 67.5 23 % 296.4 Increase primarily due to growth in
revenue from BIM Family , PlanGrid, and
Fusion products.
Other 153.7 25.5 20 % 128.2 
Total Net Revenue $ 4,386.4 $ 596 16 %$ 3,790.4 
Fiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2020 (In millions, except percentages) $    %    Management Comments
Net Revenue by Product Type:
Design $ 3,365.8 $ 445.7 15 %$ 2,920.1 Increase is due to growth in AEC &
MFG collections, AutoCAD Family ,
AutoCAD L T, and EBA  offerings.
Make 296.4 78.0 36 % 218.4 Increase primarily due to growth in
revenue from BIM Family , PlanGrid, and
Fusion products.
Other 128.2 (7.6) (6)% 135.8 
Total Net Revenue $ 3,790.4 $ 516.1 16 %$ 3,274.3 
Cost of Revenue and Operating Expenses
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue includes the labor costs of providing product support to our subscription and
maintenance customers, SaaS vendor costs and allocated IT costs, facilities costs, professional services fees related to operating our
network and cloud infrastructure, royalties, depreciation expense and operating lease payments associated with computer equipment,
data center costs, salaries, related expenses of network operations, stock-based compensation expense, and gains and losses on our
operating expense cash flow hedges.
Cost of other revenue includes labor costs associated with product setup, costs of consulting and training services contracts, and
collaborative project management services contracts. Cost of other revenue also includes stock-based compensation expense, overhead
charges, allocated IT and facilities costs, professional services fees, and gains and losses on our operating expense cash flow hedges.
Cost of revenue, at least over the near term, is affected by labor costs, hosting costs for our cloud offerings, the volume and mix
of product sales, fluctuations in consulting costs, amortization of developed technology, new customer support offerings, royalty rates
for licensed technology embedded in our products, stock-based compensation expense, and gains and losses on our operating expense
cash flow hedges.
Marketing and sales expenses include salaries, bonuses, benefits, and stock-based compensation expense for our marketing and
sales employees, the expense of travel, entertainment, and training for such personnel, sales and dealer commissions, and the costs of
programs aimed at increasing revenue, such as advertising, trade shows and expositions, and various sales and promotional programs.
Marketing and sales expenses also include SaaS vendor costs and allocated IT costs, payment processing fees, the cost of supplies and
equipment, gains and losses on our operating expense cash flow hedges, facilities costs, and labor costs associated with sales and order
management.
Research and development expenses, which are expensed as incurred, consist primarily of salaries, bonuses, benefits, and stock-
based compensation expense for research and development employees, the expense of travel, entertainment, and training
51
Table of Contents
for such personnel, professional services such as fees paid to software development firms and independent contractors, SaaS vendor
costs and allocated IT costs, gains and losses on our operating expense cash flow hedges, and facilities costs.
General and administrative expenses include salaries, bonuses, benefits, and stock-based compensation expense for our CEO,
finance, human resources, and legal employees, as well as professional fees for legal and accounting services, SaaS vendor costs and
net IT costs, certain foreign business taxes, gains and losses on our operating expense cash flow hedges, expense of travel,
entertainment, and training, facilities costs, acquisition-related costs, and the cost of supplies and equipment.
Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2022Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2021 Management Comments 
(In millions, except percentages) $     %      
Cost of revenue:
Subscription and
maintenance$ 299.1 $ 57.0 24 %$ 242.1 Increase primarily due to an increase in cloud hosting
costs and employee-related costs driven by higher
headcount as well as an increase in stock-based
compensation expense.
Other 66.6 2.5 4 % 64.1 Increase primarily due to an increase in stock-based
compensation expense.
 Amortization of developed
technologies52.8 21.9 71 % 30.9 Increase due to growth in amortization expense from
acquired developed technologies as a result of our
acquisitions in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2021 and in
fiscal 2022.
           Total cost of revenue $ 418.5 $ 81.4 24 %$ 337.1 
Operating expenses:
Marketing and sales $1,623.1 $ 182.8 13 %$1,440.3 Increase primarily due to an increase in employee-
related costs driven by higher headcount, an increase in
stock-based compensation expense, an increase in
advertisement and promotion costs due to new company
branding campaign, as well as an increase in cloud
hosting costs and professional fees.
Research and development 1,114.8 182.3 20 % 932.5 Increase primarily due to an increase in stock-based
compensation expense, an increase in employee-related
costs driven by higher headcount, as well as an increase
in professional fees.
General and administrative 571.7 157.8 38 % 413.9 Increase primarily due to lease-related asset impairment
and other char ges in fiscal 2022, an increase in stock-
based compensation expense, an increase in employee
related costs driven by higher headcount, as well as an
increase in cloud hosting costs.
Amortization of purchased
intangibles40.7 3.2 9 % 37.5 Increase due to growth in amortization expense from
acquired intangibles as a result of our acquisitions in the
fourth quarter of fiscal 2021 and in fiscal 2022.
           Total operating expenses $3,350.3 $ 526.1 19 %$2,824.2 
52
Table of Contents
Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2021Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2020 Management comments 
(In millions, except percentages) $      %      
Cost of revenue:
Subscription and
maintenance
$ 242.1 $ 18.2 8 %$ 223.9 Increase primarily due to an increase in cloud hosting
costs as well as an increase in stock-based
compensation expense.
Other
64.1 (2.4) (4)% 66.5 Decrease primarily due to lower travel and
entertainment expense partially of fset by an increase in
employee-related costs driven by higher headcount.
 Amortization of developed
technologies
30.9 (3.6) (10)% 34.5 Decrease primarily due to previously acquired
developed technologies continuing to become fully
amortized partially of fset by amortization from recently
acquired developed technologies.
           Total cost of revenue $ 337.1 $ 12.2 4 %$ 324.9 
Operating expenses:
Marketing and sales
$1,440.3 $ 130.0 10 %$1,310.3 Increase primarily due to increased employee-related
costs driven by higher headcount, an increase in stock-
based compensation expense, as well as an increase in
SaaS vendor costs and allocated IT  costs partially of fset
by a decrease in travel and entertainment expenses.
Research and development
932.5 81.4 10 % 851.1 Increase primarily due to increased employee-related
costs driven by higher headcount, an increase in stock-
based compensation expense, as well as an increase in
SaaS vendor costs and allocated IT  costs partially of fset
by a decrease in travel and entertainment expenses.
General and administrative
413.9 8.3 2 % 405.6 Increase primarily due to increase in employee related
costs driven by higher headcount, as well as an increase
in net SaaS vendor costs partially of fset by a decrease in
stock-based compensation expense.
Amortization of purchased
intangibles
37.5 (1.4) (4)% 38.9 Decrease as previously acquired purchased intangibles
continue to become fully amortized partially of fset by
amortization from recently acquired purchased
intangibles.
Restructuring and other exit
costs, net — (0.5) (100) % 0.5 
           Total operating expenses $2,824.2 $ 217.8 8 %$2,606.4 
The following table highlights our expectation for the absolute dollar change and percent of revenue change for fiscal 2023 as
compared to fiscal 2022:
Absolute dollar impact Percent of net revenue impact
Cost of revenue Increase Flat
Marketing and sales Decrease Decrease
Research and development Increase Decrease
General and administrative Increase Increase
Amortization of purchased intangibles Flat Flat
53
Table of Contents
Interest and Other Expense, Net
The following table sets forth the components of interest and other expense, net:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
 (in millions)
Interest and investment expense, net $ (65.0) $ (51.1) $ (54.0)
Gain on foreign currency 0.4 3.5 3.9 
Gain (loss) on strategic investments 4.0 (41.7) (3.3)
Other income 7.7 6.9 5.2 
Interest and other expense, net $ (52.9) $ (82.4) $ (48.2)
Interest and other expense, net, decreased by $29.5 million during fiscal 2022, as compared to fiscal 2021. The decrease was
primarily due to gains on dispositions, mark-to-market gains, and a decrease in impairments of strategic investment equity securities in
the current period as compared to the prior period offset in part by an increase in interest expense as a result of the issuance of debt in
fiscal 2022 and a decrease in mark-to market gains on debt and equity securities held in a rabbi trust under non-qualified deferred
compensation plans.
Interest and other expense, net, increased by $34.2 million during fiscal 2021, as compared to fiscal 2020. The increase was
primarily due to an increase in impairments and negative measurement alternative adjustments on our strategic investment equity
securities and a decrease in interest income offset by a decrease in interest expense as result of the payment in full of our term loan,
and an increase in mark-to-market gains on marketable securities.
Interest expense and investment income fluctuates based on average cash, marketable securities and debt balances, average
maturities, and interest rates.
Gains and losses on foreign currency are primarily due to the impact of re-measuring foreign currency transactions and net
monetary assets into the functional currency of the corresponding entity. The amount of the gain or loss on foreign currency is driven
by the volume of foreign currency transactions and the foreign currency exchange rates for the year.
Provision for Income Taxes
We account for income taxes and the related accounts under the liability method. Deferred tax liabilities and assets are
determined based on the difference between the financial statement and tax bases of assets and liabilities, using enacted rates expected
to be in effect during the year in which the basis differences reverse. Furthermore, on January 22, 2018, the FASB released guidance
on the accounting for tax on the global intangible low-taxed income (“GILTI”) provisions of the TCJA. The GILTI provisions impose
a tax on foreign income in excess of a deemed return on tangible assets of foreign corporations. The Company has elected to recognize
any potential GILTI obligations as an expense in the period it is incurred.
Income tax expense was $67.7 million and tax benefit was $661.5 million for fiscal 2022 and 2021, relative to pre-tax income of
$564.7 million and $546.7 million, respectively, for the same periods. The tax expense for fiscal 2022 consists primarily of the U.S.
and foreign tax expense, including withholding tax, offset by shared-based compensation deductions, India withholding tax refunds
and generation of federal tax credits. Tax benefit for fiscal 2021 consisted primarily of the U.S. valuation allowance release, U.S.
foreign derived intangible income permanent benefit, share-based compensation deductions and generation of federal tax credits,
offset by foreign tax expense, including withholding tax.
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce deferred tax assets when management cannot conclude that it is more likely than not
that the net deferred tax asset will be recovered. The valuation allowance is determined by assessing both positive and negative
evidence to determine whether it is more likely than not that deferred tax assets are recoverable; such assessment is required on a
jurisdiction-by-jurisdiction basis. Significant judgment is required in determining whether the valuation allowance should be recorded
against deferred tax assets. In assessing the need for a valuation allowance, we consider all available evidence including past operating
results and estimates of future taxable income.
In fiscal 2016, we considered cumulative losses in the United States from our business model transition as a significant source
of negative evidence. Considering this negative evidence, we determined that it was more likely than not that we would
54
Table of Contents
not realize the U.S. deferred tax assets and recorded a full valuation allowance against our deferred tax assets. Similarly, in fiscal 2018
we recorded a valuation allowance against our Singapore deferred tax assets due to significant negative evidence in the form of
cumulative losses. Foreign operations in the Netherlands and Canada that generated interest expense, future creditable research in
excess of earnings, respectively, also resulted in the historic recording of a full valuation under the more likely than not realizability
criteria.
We released our Singapore valuation allowance in fiscal 2020 due to positive evidence in the form of cumulative earnings,
resulting in a $42.0 million non-cash benefit to earnings. In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2021, we released the valuation allowance
against our deferred tax assets in the U.S., resulting in a $679.0 million non-cash benefit to earnings. We released the U.S. valuation
allowance in fiscal 2021 due to the following positive evidence:
•Recent history of worldwide pre-tax earnings, including cumulative earnings on a worldwide basis as of fiscal 2021
•Recent history of U.S. taxable income
•Forecast of worldwide and U.S. pre-tax earnings, including a forecast of cumulative earnings in the U.S. jurisdiction
•Forecast of U.S. taxable income
•Reversal of deferred tax liabilities
We have retained a valuation allowance against California and Michigan deferred tax assets as well as deferred tax assets that
will convert into a capital loss upon reversal as we do not have sufficient income of the appropriate character to benefit these deferred
tax assets.
As we continually strive to optimize our overall business model, tax planning strategies may become feasible whereby
management may determine, based on all available evidence, both positive and negative, that it is more likely than not that the
Netherlands, Canada, Australia, California, Michigan, and U.S. capital loss deferred tax assets will be realized.
As of January 31, 2022, we had $206.7 million of gross unrecognized tax benefits, of which $33.6 million would reduce our
valuation allowance, if recognized. The remaining $173.1 million would impact the effective tax rate. It is possible that the amount of
unrecognized tax benefits will change in the next 12 months for an audit settlement of approximately $7.8 million.
Our future effective annual tax rate may be materially impacted by the amount of benefits and charges from tax amounts
associated with our foreign earnings that are taxed at rates different from the federal statutory rate, changes in valuation allowances,
level of profit before tax, accounting for uncertain tax positions, business combinations, closure of statute of limitations or settlement
of tax audits, and changes in tax laws. A significant amount of our earnings is generated by our European and Asia Pacific subsidiaries.
Our future effective tax rates may be adversely affected to the extent earnings are lower than anticipated in countries where we have
lower statutory tax rates. 
55
Table of Contents
OTHER FINANCIAL INFORMATION
In addition to our results determined under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) discussed above, we
believe the following non-GAAP measures are useful to investors in evaluating our operating performance. For the fiscal years ended
January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, our gross profit, income from operations, operating margin, net income, and diluted net income per
share on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis were as follows (in millions except for operating margin and per share data):
Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
(Unaudited)
Gross profit $ 3,967.9 $ 3,453.3 $ 2,949.4 
Non-GAAP  gross profit $ 4,054.3 $ 3,508.5 $ 3,004.0 
Income from operations $ 617.6 $ 629.1 $ 343.0 
Non-GAAP  income from operations $ 1,397.4 $ 1,111.9 $ 802.6 
Operating mar gin 14 % 17 % 10 %
Non-GAAP  operating mar gin 32 % 29 % 25 %
Net income $ 497.0 $ 1,208.2 $ 214.5 
Non-GAAP  net income $ 1,126.1 $ 899.8 $ 621.2 
Diluted net income per share $ 2.24 $ 5.44 $ 0.96 
Non-GAAP  diluted net income per share $ 5.07 $ 4.05 $ 2.79 
 
For our internal budgeting and resource allocation process and as a means to provide consistency in period-to-period
comparisons, we use non-GAAP measures to supplement our consolidated financial statements presented on a GAAP basis. These
non-GAAP measures do not include certain items that may have a material impact upon our reported financial results. We also use
non-GAAP measures in making operating decisions because we believe those measures provide meaningful supplemental information
regarding our earning potential and performance for management by excluding certain benefits, credits, expenses, and charges that
may not be indicative of our core business operating results. For the reasons set forth below, we believe these non-GAAP financial
measures are useful to investors both because (1) they allow for greater transparency with respect to key metrics used by management
in its financial and operational decision-making and (2) they are used by our institutional investors and the analyst community to
analyze the health of our business. This allows investors and others to better understand and evaluate our operating results and future
prospects in the same manner as management, compare financial results across accounting periods and to those of peer companies, and
to better understand the long-term performance of our core business. We also use some of these measures for purposes of determining
company-wide incentive compensation.
There are limitations in using non-GAAP financial measures because non-GAAP financial measures are not prepared in
accordance with GAAP and may be different from non-GAAP financial measures used by other companies. The non-GAAP financial
measures included above are limited in value because they exclude certain items that may have a material impact upon our reported
financial results. In addition, they are subject to inherent limitations as they reflect the exercise of judgments by management about
which charges are excluded from the non-GAAP financial measures. We compensate for these limitations by analyzing current and
future results on a GAAP basis as well as a non-GAAP basis and also by providing GAAP measures in our public disclosures. The
presentation of non-GAAP financial information is meant to be considered in addition to, not as a substitute for or in isolation from,
the directly comparable financial measures prepared in accordance with GAAP. We urge investors to review the reconciliation of our
non-GAAP financial measures to the comparable GAAP financial measures included below, and not to rely on any single financial
measure to evaluate our business.
56
Table of Contents
RECONCILIATION OF GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES TO NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
(In millions except for operating margin, and per share data):
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
(Unaudited)
Gross profit $ 3,967.9 $ 3,453.3 $ 2,949.4 
Stock-based compensation expense 34.5 23.6 19.6 
Acquisition-related costs 0.7 0.7 0.5 
Amortization of developed technologies 51.2 30.9 34.5 
Non-GAAP  gross profit $ 4,054.3 $ 3,508.5 $ 3,004.0 
Income from operations $ 617.6 $ 629.1 $ 343.0 
Stock-based compensation expense 558.5 399.8 362.4 
Amortization of developed technologies 51.2 30.9 34.5 
Amortization of purchased intangibles 40.4 37.5 38.9 
Acquisition-related costs 26.0 14.6 23.3 
Lease-related asset impairments and other char ges 103.7 — — 
Restructuring and other exit costs, net — — 0.5 
Non-GAAP  income from operations $ 1,397.4 $ 1,111.9 $ 802.6 
Operating mar gin 14 % 17 % 10 %
Stock-based compensation expense 13 % 11 % 11 %
Amortization of developed technologies 1 % 1 % 1 %
Amortization of purchased intangibles 1 % 1 % 1 %
Acquisition-related costs 1 % — % 1 %
Lease-related asset impairments and other char ges 2 % — % — %
Non-GAAP  operating mar gin (1) 32 % 29 % 25 %
Net income $ 497.0 $ 1,208.2 $ 214.5 
Stock-based compensation expense 558.5 399.8 362.4 
Amortization of developed technologies 51.2 30.9 34.5 
Amortization of purchased intangibles 40.4 37.5 38.9 
Acquisition-related costs 26.0 14.6 23.3 
Lease-related asset impairments and other char ges 103.7 — — 
57
Table of Contents
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
(Unaudited)
Restructuring and other exit costs, net — — 0.5 
(Gain) loss on strategic investments (4.0) 41.7 3.2 
Release of valuation allowance on deferred tax assets — (679.0) (40.4)
Discrete tax benefit provision items (72.3) (43.9) 2.1 
Income tax ef fect of non-GAAP  adjustments (74.4) (110.0) (17.8)
Non-GAAP  net income $ 1,126.1 $ 899.8 $ 621.2 
Diluted net income per share $ 2.24 $ 5.44 $ 0.96 
Stock-based compensation expense 2.52 1.80 1.63 
Amortization of developed technologies 0.23 0.14 0.16 
Amortization of purchased intangibles 0.18 0.17 0.17 
Acquisition-related costs 0.12 0.07 0.11 
Lease-related asset impairments and other char ges 0.47 — — 
(Gain) loss on strategic investments (0.02) 0.19 0.01 
Release of valuation allowance on deferred tax assets — (3.06) (0.18)
Discrete tax (benefit) provision items (0.33) (0.20) 0.01 
Income tax ef fect of non-GAAP  adjustments (0.34) (0.50) (0.08)
Non-GAAP  diluted net income per share $ 5.07 $ 4.05 $ 2.79 
_______________
(1) Totals may not sum due to rounding.
Our non-GAAP financial measures may exclude the following:
Stock-based compensation expenses. We exclude stock-based compensation expenses from non-GAAP measures primarily
because they are non-cash expenses and management finds it useful to exclude certain non-cash charges to assess the appropriate level
of various operating expenses to assist in budgeting, planning, and forecasting future periods. Moreover, because of varying available
valuation methodologies, subjective assumptions, and the variety of award types that companies can use under FASB ASC Topic 718,
we believe excluding stock-based compensation expenses allows investors to make meaningful comparisons between our recurring
core business operating results and those of other companies.
Amortization of developed technologies and purchased intangibles. We incur amortization of acquisition-related developed
technology and purchased intangibles in connection with acquisitions of certain businesses and technologies. Amortization of
developed technologies and purchased intangibles is inconsistent in amount and frequency and is significantly affected by both the
timing and size of our acquisitions. Management finds it useful to exclude these variable charges from our cost of revenues to assist in
budgeting, planning, and forecasting future periods. Investors should note that the use of intangible assets contributed to our revenues
earned during the periods presented and will contribute to our future period revenues as well. Amortization of developed technologies
and purchased intangible assets will recur in future periods.
CEO transition costs. We exclude amounts paid to the Company’s former CEOs upon departure under the terms of their
transition agreements, including severance payments, acceleration of restricted stock units, and continued vesting of performance
stock units, and legal fees incurred with the transition. Also excluded from our non-GAAP measures are recruiting costs related to the
search for a new CEO. These costs represent non-recurring expenses and are not indicative of our ongoing operating expenses. We
further believe that excluding the CEO transition costs from our non-GAAP results is useful to investors in that it allows for period-
over-period comparability.
Goodwill impairment. This is a non-cash charge to write down goodwill to fair value when there is an indication that the asset
has been impaired. As explained above, management finds it useful to exclude certain non-cash charges to assess the appropriate level
of various operating expenses to assist in budgeting, planning, and forecasting future periods.
58
Table of Contents
Restructuring and other exit costs, net. These expenses are associated with realigning our business strategies based on current
economic conditions. In connection with these restructuring actions or other exit actions, we recognize costs related to termination
benefits for former employees whose positions were eliminated, the closure of facilities, and cancellation of certain contracts. We
exclude these charges because these expenses are not reflective of ongoing business and operating results. We believe it is useful for
investors to understand the effects of these items on our total operating expenses.
Lease-related asset impairments and other charges.  These charges are associated with the optimization of our facilities costs
related to leases for facilities that we have recently vacated as a result of our one-time move to a more hybrid remote workforce. In
connection with these facility leases, we recognize costs related to the impairment or abandonment of operating lease right-of-use
assets, computer equipment, furniture, and leasehold improvements, and other costs. We exclude these charges because these expenses
are not reflective of ongoing business and operating results. We believe it is useful for investors to understand the effects of these
items on our total operating expenses.
Acquisition-related costs. We exclude certain acquisition-related costs, including due diligence costs, professional fees in
connection with an acquisition, certain financing costs, and certain integration-related expenses. These expenses are unpredictable, and
depend on factors that may be outside of our control and unrelated to the continuing operations of the acquired business or our
Company. In addition, the size and complexity of an acquisition, which often drives the magnitude of acquisition-related costs, may
not be indicative of such future costs. We believe excluding acquisition-related costs facilitates the comparison of our financial results
to the Company's historical operating results and to other companies in our industry.
Loss (gain) on strategic investments and dispositions. We exclude gains and losses related to our strategic investments and
dispositions of strategic investments, purchased intangibles, and businesses from our non-GAAP measures primarily because
management finds it useful to exclude these variable gains and losses on these investments and dispositions in assessing our financial
results. Included in these amounts are non-cash unrealized gains and losses, dividends received, realized gains and losses on the sales
or losses on the impairment of these investments, and gain and loss on dispositions. We believe excluding these items is useful to
investors because they do not correlate to the underlying performance of our business and these losses or gains were incurred in
connection with strategic investments and dispositions which do not occur regularly.
Discrete tax provision items. We exclude the GAAP tax provision, including discrete items, from the non-GAAP measure of net
income (loss), and include a non-GAAP tax provision based upon the projected annual non-GAAP effective tax rate. Discrete tax
items include income tax expenses or benefits that do not relate to ordinary income from continuing operations in the current fiscal
year, unusual or infrequently occurring items, or the tax impact of certain stock-based compensation. Examples of discrete tax items
include, but are not limited to, certain changes in judgment and changes in estimates of tax matters related to prior fiscal years, certain
costs related to business combinations, certain changes in the realizability of deferred tax assets, or changes in tax law. Management
believes this approach assists investors in understanding the tax provision and the effective tax rate related to ongoing operations. We
believe the exclusion of these discrete tax items provides investors with useful supplemental information about our operational
performance.
Establishment (release) of a valuation allowance on certain net deferred tax assets. This is a non-cash charge to record or to
release a valuation allowance on certain deferred tax assets. As explained above, management finds it useful to exclude certain non-
cash charges to assess the appropriate level of various cash expenses to assist in budgeting, planning, and forecasting future periods.
Income tax effects on the difference between GAAP and non-GAAP costs and expenses. The income tax effects that are excluded
from the non-GAAP measures relate to the tax impact on the difference between GAAP and non-GAAP expenses, primarily due to
stock-based compensation, amortization of purchased intangibles, and restructuring charges and other exit costs (benefits) for GAAP
and non-GAAP measures.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Our primary source of cash is from the sale of our software and related services. Our primary use of cash is payment of our
operating costs, which consist primarily of employee-related expenses, such as compensation and benefits, as well as general
operating expenses for marketing, facilities, and overhead costs. Long-term cash requirements for items other than normal operating
expenses are anticipated for the following: the acquisition of businesses, software products, or technologies complementary to our
business; repayment of debt; common stock repurchases; and capital expenditures, including the purchase and implementation of
internal-use software applications.
59
Table of Contents
At January 31, 2022, our principal sources of liquidity were cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities totaling $1.81
billion and net accounts receivable of $716.1 million.
In September 2021, Autodesk entered into an amended and restated credit agreement (“Credit Agreement”) by and among
Autodesk, the lenders party thereto, and Citibank, N.A., as agent, that provides for a revolving credit facility in the aggregate principal
amount of $1.5 billion with an option to be increased up to $2.0 billion which increased from an aggregate principal amount of $650.0
million, with an option to be increased up to $1.0 billion, under our previous credit agreement. The revolving credit facility is
available for working capital or other business needs. The maturity date on the Credit Agreement is September 30, 2026. At
January 31, 2022, Autodesk had no outstanding borrowings under the Credit Agreement. Additionally, as of March 14, 2022, we have
no amounts outstanding under the Credit Agreement. See Part II, Item 8, Note 8, “Borrowing Arrangements,” in the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on our covenant requirements. If we are unable to remain in compliance with
the covenants under the Credit Agreement, we may not be able to draw on our revolving credit facility.
As of January 31, 2022, we had $2.65 billion aggregate principal amount of notes outstanding. See Part II, Item 8, Note 8,
“Borrowing Arrangements,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion.
Our cash and cash equivalents are held by diversified financial institutions globally. Our primary commercial banking
relationship is with Citigroup and its global affiliates. In addition, Citibank N.A., an affiliate of Citigroup, is one of the lead lenders
and agent in the syndicate of our $1.5 billion revolving credit facility.
Our cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities balances are concentrated in a few locations around the world, with
substantial amounts held outside of the United States. As of January 31, 2022, approximately 66% of our total cash or cash equivalents
and marketable securities are located in foreign jurisdictions and that percentage will fluctuate subject to business needs. There are
several factors that can impact our ability to utilize foreign cash balances, such as foreign exchange restrictions, foreign regulatory
restrictions, or adverse tax costs. The Tax Act included a mandatory one-time tax on accumulated earnings of foreign subsidiaries and
generally eliminated U.S. taxes on foreign subsidiary distributions in future periods. As a result, earnings in foreign jurisdictions are
generally available for distribution to the United States with little to no incremental U.S. taxes. We regularly review our capital
structure and consider a variety of potential financing alternatives and planning strategies to ensure we have the proper liquidity
available in the locations in which it is needed. We expect to meet our liquidity needs through or in combination of current cash
balances, ongoing cash flows, and external borrowings.
Cash from operations could also be affected by various risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to the risks detailed in
Part I, Item 1A titled “Risk Factors.” We currently expect to have sufficient liquidity to manage through the COVID-19 pandemic but
we will continue to monitor the impact of potential disruptions beyond our control. Based on our current business plan and revenue
prospects, we believe that our existing cash and cash equivalents, our anticipated cash flows from operations, and our available
revolving credit facility will be sufficient to meet our working capital and operating resource expenditure requirements for at least the
next 12 months from the date of this Annual Report.
Our revenue, earnings, cash flows, receivables, and payables are subject to fluctuations due to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates, for which we have put in place foreign currency contracts as part of our risk management strategy. See Part II, Item
7A, “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk” for further discussion.
Fiscal year ended January 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net cash provided by operating activities $1,531.3 $1,437.2 $1,415.1 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,594.6) (403.9) (57.3)
Net cash used in financing activities (168.6) (1,046.8) (466.8)
Net cash provided by operating activities of $1,531.3 million for fiscal 2022, primarily consisted of $497.0 million of our net
income adjusted for $817.0 million non-cash items such as stock-based compensation expense, depreciation, amortization, and
accretion expense, lease-related asset impairment charges, and deferred income tax. The increase in cash provided by working capital
was primarily due to a net increase in deferred revenue of $419.4 million driven by an increase in product subscriptions and EBA
offerings and a decrease in maintenance subscriptions offset in part by an increase in prepaid expenses and other assets of
$133.5 million primarily due to the timing of payments for operating expenses.
60
Table of Contents
Net cash provided by operating activities of $1,437.2 million for fiscal 2021, primarily consisted of $1,208.2 million of our net
income adjusted for $217.6 million non-cash items such as deferred income tax including the release of our deferred tax valuation
allowance, stock-based compensation expense, and depreciation, amortization, and accretion expense. The increase in cash provided
by working capital was primarily due to: a net increase in deferred revenue of $344.4 million driven by an increase in product
subscriptions and EBA offerings and a decrease in maintenance subscriptions; and an increase in accounts payable and other liabilities
of $129.6 million primarily due to the timing of payments for operating expenses and accruals for employee related costs.
Net cash used in investing activities was $1,594.6 million for fiscal 2022 and was primarily due to business combinations, net of
cash acquired, and purchases of marketable securities.
Net cash used in investing activities was $403.9 million for fiscal 2021 and was primarily due to business combinations, net of
cash acquired, capital expenditures, purchases of strategic investments, and purchases of marketable securities. These cash outflows
were partially offset by maturities of marketable securities.
Net cash used in financing activities was $168.6 million in fiscal 2022 and was primarily due to repurchases of our common
stock offset by proceeds from the issuance of debt and common stock.
Net cash used in financing activities was $1,046.8 million in fiscal 2021 and was primarily due to repurchases of our common
stock and repayment of debt. These cash outflows were partially offset by proceeds from the issuance of common stock.
61
Table of Contents
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
The following table summarizes our significant financial contractual obligations at January 31, 2022, and the effect such
obligations are expected to have on our liquidity and cash flows in future periods.
(in millions) TotalFiscal year
2023Fiscal years
2024-2025Fiscal years
2026-2027 Thereafter Management Comments
Notes payable $3,150.0 $430.0 $ 137.8 $ 416.4 $ 2,165.8 Notes payable consist of the notes issued in
December 2012, June 2015, June 2017, January
2020, and October 2021 including interest. See
Part II, Item 8, Note 8, “Borrowing
Arrangements,” in the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements for further discussion.
Operating leases 467.4 95.8 153.5 94.0 124.1 Operating lease obligations consist primarily of
obligations for real estate, vehicles, and certain
equipment. See Part II, Item 8, Note 9, “Leases,”
in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
for further discussion.
Purchase obligations 317.6 109.4 195.5 9.2 3.5 Purchase obligations are contractual obligations
for purchase of goods or services and are defined
as agreements that are enforceable and legally
binding to Autodesk and that specify all
significant terms, including: fixed or minimum
quantities to be purchased; fixed, minimum, or
variable price provisions; and the approximate
timing of the transaction. Purchase obligations
relate primarily to acquisition of cloud services,
marketing, and commitments related to our
investment agreements with limited liability
partnership funds.
Deferred compensation
obligations89.5 7.1 15.6 14.1 52.7 Deferred compensation obligations relate to
amounts held in a rabbi trust under our non-
qualified deferred compensation plan. See Part II,
Item 8, Note 7, “Deferred Compensation,” in our
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for
further information regarding this plan.
Pension obligations 35.2 2.9 5.8 6.6 19.9 Pension obligations relate to our obligations for
pension plans outside of the United States. See
Part II, Item 8, Note 15, “Retirement Benefit
Plans,” in our Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements for further information regarding
these obligations.
Asset retirement obligations 12.0 4.3 4.0 0.8 2.9 Asset retirement obligations represent the
estimated costs to bring certain of fice buildings
that we lease back to their original condition after
the termination of the lease.
Total (1) $4,071.7 $649.5 $ 512.2 $ 541.1 $ 2,368.9 
____________________ 
(1) This table generally excludes amounts already recorded on the balance sheet as current liabilities, certain purchase obligations as discussed
below , long term deferred revenue, and amounts related to income tax accruals for uncertain tax positions, since we cannot predict with
reasonable reliability the timing of cash settlements to the respective taxing authorities (see Part II, Item 8, Note 5, “Income Taxes” in the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements).
Purchase orders or contracts for the purchase of supplies and other goods and services are not included in the table above. We
are not able to determine the aggregate amount of such purchase orders that represent contractual obligations, as purchase orders may
represent authorizations to purchase rather than binding agreements. Our purchase orders are based on our current procurement or
development needs and are fulfilled by our vendors within short time horizons. We do not have significant agreements for the
purchase of supplies or other goods specifying minimum quantities or set prices that exceed our expected requirements for three
months. In addition, we have certain software royalty commitments associated with the shipment and licensing of certain products.
The expected timing of payment of the obligations discussed above is estimated based on current information. Timing of
payments and actual amounts paid may be different depending on the time of receipt of goods or services or changes to agreed-upon
amounts for some obligations.
62
Table of Contents
We provide indemnifications of varying scopes and certain guarantees, including limited product warranties. Historically, costs
related to these warranties and indemnifications have not been significant, but because potential future costs are highly variable, we
are unable to estimate the maximum potential impact of these guarantees on our future results of operations.
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Autodesk’s stock repurchase program provides Autodesk with the ability to offset the dilution from the issuance of stock under
our employee stock plans and reduce shares outstanding over time and has the effect of returning excess cash generated from our
business to stockholders. Under the share repurchase program, Autodesk may repurchase shares from time to time in open market
transactions, privately negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase programs, tender offers, or by other means. The share
repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will depend on factors such as cash
generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, remaining shares available in the authorized
pool, cash requirements for acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price, and legal and regulatory requirements.
During the three and 12 months ended January 31, 2022, we repurchased 2.3 million and 4.0 million shares of our common
stock, respectively. At January 31, 2022, 8.1 million shares remained available for repurchase under the repurchase program approved
by the Board of Directors. This program does not have a fixed expiration date. See Part II, Item 8, Note 11, “Stock Repurchase
Program,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion.
63
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
FOREIGN CURRENCY EXCHANGE RISK
Our revenue, earnings, cash flows, receivables, and payables are subject to fluctuations due to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates. Our risk management strategy utilizes foreign currency contracts to manage our exposure to foreign currency volatility
that exists as part of our ongoing business operations. We utilize cash flow hedge contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on a
portion of the net revenue or operating expense of certain anticipated transactions. In addition, we use balance sheet hedge contracts to
reduce the exchange rate risk associated primarily with foreign currency denominated receivables and payables. As of January 31,
2022 and 2021, we had open cash flow and balance sheet hedge contracts with future settlements generally within one to 12 months.
Contracts were primarily denominated in euros, Japanese yen, British pounds, Canadian dollars, Australian dollars, Singapore dollars,
Swiss francs, Swedish krona, and Czech koruna. We do not enter into foreign exchange derivative instruments for trading or
speculative purposes.
Our option and foreign exchange forward contracts outstanding as of the respective period-ends are summarized in U.S. dollar
equivalents as follows (in millions):
January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021
Notional Amount Fair Value Notional Amount Fair Value
Forward Contracts:
Purchased $ 852.3 $ (10.3)$ 686.0 $ 3.6 
Sold 1,611.9 7.0 1,172.1 2.2 
Option Contracts:
Purchased 1,272.6 18.3 1,044.4 5.2 
Sold 1,321.8 (7.6) 1,092.1 (18.6)
We use foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on the net revenue and operating expenses of certain
anticipated transactions. A sensitivity analysis performed on our hedging portfolio as of January 31, 2022, indicated that a hypothetical
10% appreciation of the U.S. dollar from its value at January 31, 2022 and 2021, would increase the fair value of our foreign currency
contracts by $217.8 million and $118.6 million, respectively. A hypothetical 10% depreciation of the dollar from its value at
January 31, 2022 and 2021, would decrease the fair value of our foreign currency contracts by $138.1 million and $149.2 million,
respectively.
INTEREST RATE RISK
Interest rate movements affect both the interest income we earn on our short-term investments and the market value of certain
longer term securities. At January 31, 2022, we had $708.2 million of cash equivalents and marketable securities, including $235.7
million classified as short-term marketable securities. If interest rates were to move up by 50 or 100 basis points over a 12-month
period, the market value change of these securities would not have a material impact on our results of operations.
OTHER MARKET RISK
From time to time we make direct investments in privately held companies. Privately held company investments generally are
considered inherently risky. The technologies and products these companies have under development are typically in the early stages
and may never materialize, which could result in a loss of all or a substantial part of our initial investment in these companies. The
evaluation of privately held companies is based on information that we request from these companies, which is not subject to the same
disclosure regulations as U.S. publicly traded companies, and as such, the basis for these evaluations is subject to the timing and
accuracy of the data received from these companies. See Part II, Item 8, Note 3, “Financial Instruments” in the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements for further discussion regarding these strategic investments.
For information about exposure to counter-party credit-related losses, see Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of
Significant Accounting Policies - Concentration of Credit Risk."
64
Table of Contents
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In millions, except per share data)
 
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net revenue:
Subscription $ 4,156.4  $ 3,478.9  $ 2,751.9  
Maintenance 76.3 183.3  386.6  
Total subscription and maintenance revenue 4,232.7  3,662.2  3,138.5  
Other 153.7  128.2  135.8  
Total net revenue 4,386.4  3,790.4  3,274.3  
Cost of revenue:
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue 299.1  242.1  223.9  
Cost of other revenue 66.6 64.1 66.5 
Amortization of developed technologies 52.8 30.9 34.5 
Total cost of revenue 418.5  337.1  324.9  
Gross profit 3,967.9  3,453.3  2,949.4  
Operating expenses:
Marketing and sales 1,623.1  1,440.3  1,310.3  
Research and development 1,114.8 932.5  851.1  
General and administrative 571.7  413.9  405.6  
Amortization of purchased intangibles 40.7 37.5 38.9 
Restructuring and other exit costs, net — — 0.5 
Total operating expenses 3,350.3  2,824.2  2,606.4  
Income from operations 617.6  629.1  343.0  
Interest and other expense, net (52.9) (82.4) (48.2)
Income before income taxes 564.7  546.7  294.8  
 (Provision) benefit for income taxes (67.7) 661.5  (80.3)
Net income $ 497.0  $ 1,208.2  $ 214.5  
Basic net income per share $ 2.26 $ 5.51 $ 0.98 
Diluted net income per share $ 2.24 $ 5.44 $ 0.96 
Weighted average shares used in computing basic net income per share 219.7  219.4  219.7  
Weighted average shares used in computing diluted net income per share 222.0  222.1  222.5  
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
65
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In millions)
Fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net income $ 497.0  $1,208.2  $ 214.5  
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of reclassifications:
Net gain (loss) on derivative instruments (net of tax ef fect of $( 8.3), $5.0, and $( 1.1)) 48.3 (32.5) (6.6)
Change in net unrealized gain on available-for -sale securities (net of tax ef fect of zero, $0.1, and $( 0.4)) 11.8 1.7 1.4 
Change in defined benefit pension items (net of tax ef fect of $( 0.7), $(0.3), and $ 1.6) 4.7 1.5 (6.5)
Net change in cumulative foreign currency translation (loss) gain (net of tax ef fect of $ 0.3, $(0.6), and
$0.1) (62.9) 63.7 (13.6)
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 1.9 34.4 (25.3)
Total comprehensive income $ 498.9  $1,242.6  $ 189.2  
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
66
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except per share data)
 
January 31,
2022January 31,
2021
ASSETS
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,528.4  $ 1,772.2  
Marketable securities 235.7  4.0 
Accounts receivable, net 716.1  643.1  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 283.6  206.2  
Total current assets 2,763.8  2,625.5  
Long-term marketable securities 45.4 — 
Computer equipment, software, furniture, and leasehold improvements, net 162.5  192.8  
Operating lease right-of-use assets 304.5  416.7  
Intangible assets, net 493.8  199.3  
Goodwill 3,603.8  2,706.5  
Deferred income taxes, net 740.7  763.1  
Long-term other assets 492.3  375.9  
Total assets $ 8,606.8  $ 7,279.8  
LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 120.8  $ 122.5  
Accrued compensation 341.3  322.6  
Accrued income taxes 29.7 42.6 
Deferred revenue 2,863.3  2,500.9  
Operating lease liabilities 86.6 71.4 
Current portion of long-term notes payable, net 349.7  — 
Other accrued liabilities 218.0  194.7  
Total current liabilities 4,009.4  3,254.7  
Long-term deferred revenue 926.5  859.3  
Long-term operating lease liabilities 345.8  396.0  
Long-term income taxes payable 19.8 15.9 
Long-term deferred income taxes 29.4 11.4 
Long-term notes payable, net 2,277.9  1,637.2  
Long-term other liabilities 148.9  139.8  
Commitments and contingencies
Stockholders’  equity:
Preferred stock, $ 0.01 par value; shares authorized 2.0; none  issued or outstanding at January 31, 2022
and 2021 — — 
Common stock and additional paid-in capital, $ 0.01 par value; shares authorized 750.0 ; 218.2  and
219.6  issued and outstanding at January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively 2,923.1  2,578.9  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (124.0 ) (125.9 )
Accumulated deficit (1,950.0 ) (1,487.5 )
Total stockholders’  equity 849.1  965.5  
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $ 8,606.8  $ 7,279.8  
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
67
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Operating activities:
Net income $ 497.0  $ 1,208.2  $ 214.5  
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation, amortization, and accretion 148.1  123.8  127.3  
Stock-based compensation expense 555.4  398.4  362.4  
Deferred income taxes (7.8) (778.6 ) 10.3 
Lease-related asset impairments 103.7  — — 
Restructuring and other exit costs, net — — 0.5 
     Other operating activities 17.6 38.8 (11.9)
Changes in operating assets and liabilities, net of business combinations:
Accounts receivable (66.2) 12.6 (178.5 )
Prepaid expenses and other assets (133.5 ) (56.4) 58.5 
Accounts payable and other liabilities 9.9 129.6  (90.8)
Deferred revenue 419.4  344.4  916.7  
Accrued income taxes (12.3) 16.4 6.1 
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,531.3  1,437.2  1,415.1  
Investing activities:
Purchases of marketable securities (311.1) (21.0) (19.9)
Sales of marketable securities 12.0 — 22.4 
Maturities of marketable securities 25.8 17.0 5.0 
Purchases of developed technologies (10.5) (4.8) — 
Business combinations, net of cash acquired (1,250.3 ) (246.2 ) — 
Capital expenditures (56.0) (91.1) (53.2)
Other investing activities (4.5) (57.8) (11.6)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,594.6 ) (403.9 ) (57.3)
Financing activities:
Proceeds from issuance of common stock, net of issuance costs 113.7 114.1 93.7 
Taxes paid related to net share settlement of equity awards (193.5 ) (156.7 ) (112.5)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,078.5 ) (551.7 ) (442.5 )
Proceeds from debt, net of discount 997.0  — 498.9  
Repayments of debt — (450.0 ) (500.0 )
Other financing activities (7.3) (2.5) (4.4)
Net cash used in financing activities (168.6 ) (1,046.8 ) (466.8 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents (11.9) 11.0 (2.3)
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents (243.8 ) (2.5) 888.7  
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of fiscal year 1,772.2  1,774.7  886.0  
Cash and cash equivalents at end of fiscal year $ 1,528.4  $ 1,772.2  $ 1,774.7  
Supplemental cash flow disclosure:
Cash paid for interest $ 57.5 $ 62.7 $ 67.8 
Cash paid for income taxes, net of tax refunds $ 165.2  $ 92.8 $ 60.3 
Non-cash investing and financing activities:
Fair value of common stock issued to settle liability-classified restricted stock units $ 2.7 $ 28.7 $ 23.5 
Fair value of common stock issued related to business combination (See Note 6) $ 6.1 $ 37.9 $ — 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
68
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ (DEFICIT) EQUITY
(In millions)
 Common stock and additional
paid-in capitalAccumulated
other
comprehensive
(loss) incomeAccumulated
deficitTotal
stockholders'
(deficit) equity Shares Amount
Balances, January 31, 2019 219.4  $ 2,071.5  $ (135.0 )$ (2,147.4 )$ (210.9 )
Common stock issued under stock plans 2.7 (18.6) — — (18.6)
Stock-based compensation expense — 332.7  — — 332.7  
Settlement of liability-classified restricted stock units — 23.5 — — 23.5 
Pre-combination expense related to equity awards assumed — 1.2 — — 1.2 
Cumulative ef fect of adoption of accounting standards — — — (0.7) (0.7)
Net income — — — 214.5  214.5  
Other comprehensive loss — — (25.3) — (25.3)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (2.7) (93.3) — (362.2 ) (455.5 )
Balances, January 31, 2020 219.4  2,317.0  (160.3 ) (2,295.8 ) (139.1 )
Common stock issued under stock plans 2.7 (41.2) — — (41.2)
Stock-based compensation expense — 385.6  — — 385.6  
Settlement of liability-classified restricted stock units — 28.7 — — 28.7 
Post-combination expense related to equity awards assumed — 0.4 — — 0.4 
Net income — — — 1,208.2  1,208.2  
Other comprehensive income — — 34.4 — 34.4 
Shares issued related to business combination 0.1 37.9 — — 37.9 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (2.6) (149.5 ) — (399.9 ) (549.4 )
Balances, January 31, 2021 219.6  2,578.9  (125.9 ) (1,487.5 ) 965.5  
Common stock issued under stock plans 2.6 (79.8) — — (79.8)
Stock-based compensation expense 544.4  — — 544.4  
Settlement of liability-classified restricted stock units 2.7 — — 2.7 
Post-combination expense related to equity awards assumed 0.1 — — 0.1 
Net income — 497.0  497.0  
Other comprehensive income 1.9 — 1.9 
Shares issued related to business combination — 6.1 — — 6.1 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (4.0) (129.3 ) — (959.5 ) (1,088.8 )
Balances, January 31, 2022 218.2  $ 2,923.1  $ (124.0 )$ (1,950.0 )$ 849.1  
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
69
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
January 31, 2022
(Tables in millions of dollars, except per share data, unless otherwise indicated)
1.     Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Business
Autodesk, Inc. (“Autodesk” or the “Company”) is a world leading design software and services company, offering customers
productive business solutions through powerful technology products and services. The Company serves customers in the architecture,
engineering, and construction; manufacturing; and digital media, consumer, and entertainment industries. The Company’s
sophisticated software products, offered through a hybrid of desktop and cloud functionality, enable its customers to experience their
ideas before they are real by allowing them to imagine, design, and create their ideas and to visualize, simulate, and analyze real-world
performance early in the design process by creating digital prototypes. These capabilities allow Autodesk’s customers to foster
innovation, optimize and improve their designs, help save time and money, improve quality, and collaborate with others. Autodesk
software products are sold globally, both directly to customers and through a network of resellers and distributors.
Principles of Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Autodesk and its wholly owned subsidiaries. All
intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) requires
management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in Autodesk’s consolidated financial statements and
notes thereto. These estimates are based on information available as of the date of the consolidated financial statements. On a regular
basis, management evaluates these estimates and assumptions. Actual results may differ materially from these estimates. In March
2020, the World Health Organization declared the outbreak of a disease caused by a novel strain of the coronavirus (COVID-19) to be
a pandemic. This pandemic has created and may continue to create significant uncertainty in the macroeconomic environment which,
in addition to other unforeseen effects of this pandemic, may adversely impact our results of operations. As the COVID-19 pandemic
continues to develop, many of our estimates could require increased judgment and carry a higher degree of variability and volatility.
As events continue to evolve our estimates may change materially in future periods.
Examples of significant estimates and assumptions made by management involve revenue recognition for product subscriptions
and enterprise business arrangements (“EBAs”), the determination of the fair value of acquired assets and liabilities, goodwill,
financial instruments including strategic investments, long-lived assets, and intangible assets, the realizability of deferred tax assets,
and the fair value of stock awards. The Company also makes assumptions, judgments, and estimates in determining the accruals for
uncertain tax positions, variable compensation, partner incentive programs, product returns reserves, allowances for credit losses, asset
retirement obligations, legal contingencies, and operating lease liabilities. 
Change in presentation and immaterial correction of an error
Autodesk changed its presentation on the Consolidated Balance Sheet for intangible assets during the fiscal year ended
January 31, 2022. These amounts were previously presented in “Developed technologies, net” and “Long-term other assets” and are
now presented as “Intangible assets, net”. Accordingly, prior period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current period
presentation. This presentation change did not impact “Total assets” on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and had no impact on the
Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations, Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income, and Consolidated Statements
of Cash Flows.
70
Table of Contents
The effects of the change on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of January 31, 2021, were as follows:
 As Reported January 31,
2021Effect of Change in
PresentationAs Adjusted January 31,
2021
Intangible assets, net $ 88.6 $ 110.7 $ 199.3  
Long-term other assets 486.6  (110.7) 375.9  
Total assets 7,279.8  — 7,279.8  
The Company also changed its presentation on the Consolidated Balance Sheets for investments in debt and equity securities
that are held in a rabbi trust under non-qualified deferred compensation plans, including correcting the classification as current and
non-current assets during fiscal year ended January 31, 2022. These amounts were previously presented as current “Marketable
securities” and are now presented as “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets. Accordingly, prior period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current period presentation. These
presentation and classification changes did not impact “Total assets” on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and had no impact on the
Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations, Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income and Consolidated Statement
of Cash Flows.
The effects of the changes on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of January 31, 2021, were as follows:
 As Reported January 31,
2021Effect of Changes in
PresentationAs Adjusted January 31,
2021
Marketable securities $ 85.0 $ (81.0)$ 4.0 
Prepaid and other current assets 198.9  7.3 206.2  
Long-term other assets 412.9  73.7 486.6  
Total current assets 2,699.2  (73.7) 2,625.5  
Total assets 7,279.8  $ — 7,279.8  
Segments
Autodesk operates in one operating segment and accordingly, all required financial segment information is included in the
consolidated financial statements. Operating segments are defined as components of an enterprise for which separate financial
information is evaluated regularly by the chief operating decision maker (“CODM”) in deciding how to allocate resources and assess
performance. Autodesk reports segment information based on the “management” approach. The management approach designates the
internal reporting used by management for making decisions, allocating resources, and assessing performance as the source of the
Company’s reportable segments. The Company's CODM allocates resources and assesses the operating performance of the Company
as a whole.
Information regarding Autodesk's long-lived assets by geographic area were as follows:
 January 31,
 2022 2021
Long-lived assets (1):
Americas
U.S. $ 322.7  $ 423.6  
Other Americas 19.8 29.5 
Total Americas 342.5  453.1  
Europe, Middle East, and Africa 92.6 109.7  
Asia Pacific 31.9 46.7 
Total long-lived assets $ 467.0  $ 609.5  
____________________
(1) Long-lived assets exclude deferred tax assets, marketable securities, goodwill, and intangible assets .
71
Table of Contents
Revenue Recognition
Autodesk’s revenue is divided into three categories: subscription revenue, maintenance revenue, and other revenue. Subscription
revenue consists of our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible EBAs.  Maintenance revenue consists
of renewal fees for existing maintenance plan agreements that were initially purchased with a perpetual software license. Under our
maintenance plan, customers are eligible to receive unspecified upgrades, when and if available, and technical support. Other revenue
consists of revenue from consulting, training, and other products and services.  Revenue is recognized when control for these offerings
is transferred to our customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration we expect to be entitled to in exchange for products and
services.
Autodesk’s contracts with customers may include promises to transfer multiple products and services to a customer. Determining
whether the products and services are considered distinct performance obligations that should be accounted for separately or as a
single performance obligation may require significant judgment. Judgment is required to determine the level of integration and
interdependency between individual components of desktop software applications and cloud functionalities. This determination
influences whether the desktop software is considered distinct and accounted for separately as a license performance obligation
recognized at the time of delivery, or not distinct and accounted for together with the cloud functionalities as a single subscription
performance obligation recognized over time.
For product subscriptions and flexible EBA subscriptions in which the desktop software and related cloud functionalities are
highly interrelated, the single performance obligation is recognized ratably over the contract term as the subscription is delivered. For
subscriptions involving distinct desktop software licenses, the license performance obligation is satisfied when delivered to our
customers. For standalone maintenance subscriptions, cloud subscriptions, and technical support services, the performance obligation
is satisfied ratably over the contract term as those services are delivered. For consulting services, the performance obligation is
satisfied over a period of time as those services are delivered.
When an arrangement includes multiple performance obligations which are concurrently delivered and have the same pattern of
transfer to the customer (the services transfer to the customer over the contract period), we account for those performance obligations
as a single performance obligation.
For contracts with more than one performance obligation, the transaction price is allocated among the performance obligations in
an amount that depicts the relative standalone selling price (“SSP”) of each obligation. Judgment is required to determine the SSP for
each distinct performance obligation. We use a range of amounts to estimate SSP when we sell each of the products and services
separately and need to determine whether there is a discount that should be allocated based on the relative SSP of the various products
and services. 
Our indirect channel model includes both a two-tiered distribution structure, where Autodesk sells to distributors that
subsequently sell to resellers, and a one-tiered structure where Autodesk sells directly to resellers. For these arrangements, transfer of
control begins at the time access to our subscriptions is made available electronically to our customer, provided all other criteria for
revenue recognition are met. Judgment is required to determine whether our distributors and resellers have the ability to honor their
commitment to pay, regardless of whether they collect payment from their customers. If we were to change this assessment, it could
cause a material increase or decrease in the amount of revenue that we report in a particular period.
Costs to Obtain a Contract with a Customer
Sales commissions earned by our internal sales personnel and our reseller partners are considered incremental and recoverable
costs of obtaining a contract with a customer. The commission costs are capitalized and included in “Prepaid expenses and other
current assets” and “Long-term other assets” on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. The deferred costs are then amortized over the
period of benefit. Autodesk determined that sales commissions earned by internal sales personnel that are related to contract renewals
are commensurate with sales commissions earned on the initial contracts, and we determined the period of benefit to be the term of the
respective customer contract. Commissions paid to our reseller partners that are related to contract renewals are not commensurate
with commissions earned on the initial contract, and we determined the estimated period of benefit by taking into consideration
customer retention data, customer contracts, our technology, and other factors. Deferred costs are periodically reviewed for
impairment. Amortization expense is included in marketing and sales expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
72
Table of Contents
Fair Value Measurement
Fair value is defined as the price that would be received from the sale of an asset or paid to transfer a liability in the principal or
most advantageous market for the asset or liability in an orderly transaction between market participants on the measurement date. In
determining the fair value of our investments, we are sometimes required to use various alternative valuation techniques. Inputs to
valuation techniques are either observable or unobservable. Observable inputs reflect market data obtained from independent sources,
while unobservable inputs reflect our market assumptions. These two types of inputs have created the following fair value hierarchy:
Level 1 - Quoted prices for identical instruments in active markets;
Level 2 - Quoted prices for similar instruments in active markets, quoted prices for identical or similar instruments in markets that are
not active, and model-derived valuations in which all significant inputs and significant value drivers are observable in active markets;
and
Level 3 - Unobservable inputs for which there is little or no market data, which require Autodesk to develop its own assumptions.
This hierarchy requires us to minimize the use of unobservable inputs and to use observable market data, if available, when
determining fair value. This is generally true for our cash and cash equivalents and the majority of our marketable securities, which we
consider to be Level 1 and Level 2 assets.
Key inputs for currency derivatives are spot rates, forward rates, interest rates, volatility, and credit default rates. The spot rate
for each currency is the same spot rate used for all balance sheet translations at the measurement date. Autodesk reviews for any
potential changes on a quarterly basis, in conjunction with our fiscal quarter-end close. It is Autodesk’s assessment that the leveling
best reflects current market activity when observing the pricing information for these assets. Autodesk’s Level 2 securities and
derivatives are valued primarily using observable inputs other than quoted prices in active markets for identical assets and liabilities.
The Company has elected to use the income approach to value derivatives using the observable Level 2 market expectations at
measurement date and standard valuation techniques to convert future amounts to a single present amount (discounted). Mid-market
pricing is used as a practical expedient and when required, rates are interpolated from commonly quoted intervals published by market
sources. See Note 3, “Financial Instruments” for information.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Autodesk considers all highly liquid investments with insignificant interest rate risk and remaining maturities of three months or
less at the date of purchase to be cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are stated at estimated fair value.
Marketable Securities and Strategic Investments
Autodesk classifies its marketable securities as either short-term or long-term generally based on each instrument’s underlying
contractual maturity date. Generally, marketable securities with remaining maturities of less than 12 months are classified as short-
term and marketable securities with remaining maturities greater than 12 months are classified as long-term. Autodesk may sell certain
of its marketable securities prior to their stated maturities for strategic purposes or in anticipation of credit deterioration.
Marketable securities are stated at fair value. Marketable securities maturing within one year that are not restricted are classified
as current assets.
Autodesk determines the appropriate classification of its marketable securities at the time of purchase and re-evaluates such
classification as of each balance sheet date. Autodesk carries all “available-for-sale securities” at fair value, with unrealized gains and
losses, net of tax, reported in stockholders’ equity (deficit) until disposition or maturity. Autodesk carries all “trading securities” at fair
value, with unrealized gains and losses, recorded in “Interest and other expense, net” in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of
Operations. The cost of securities sold is based on the specific-identification method.
The company's strategic investments consist of privately held debt and equity securities.
73
Table of Contents
Under the measurement alternative method, strategic investment equity securities are measured at cost, less any impairments,
plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes in orderly transactions for the identical or similar investment of the
same issuer in the current period. The carrying value is not adjusted for the Company’s strategic investment equity securities if there
are no observable price changes in a same or similar security from the same issuer or if there are no identified events or changes in
circumstances that may indicate impairment, as discussed below. To determine if a transaction is deemed a similar investment,
Autodesk considers the rights and obligations between the investments and the extent to which those differences would affect the fair
values of those investments with additional consideration for the stage of development of the investee company. The fair value would
then be adjusted positively or negatively based on available information such as pricing in recent rounds of financing.
The company’s strategic investment debt and equity securities (Level 3) are valued using significant unobservable inputs or data
in an inactive market and the valuation requires the Company’s judgment due to the absence of market prices and inherent lack of
liquidity. These assumptions are inherently subjective and involve significant management judgment. Whenever possible, we use
observable market data and rely on unobservable inputs only when observable market data is not available, when determining fair
value.
In determining the estimated fair value of its strategic investments, the Company utilizes the most recent data available to the
Company. In addition, the determination of whether an orderly transaction is for a same or similar investment requires significant
management judgment including: the rights and obligations of the investments, the extent to which those differences would affect the
fair values of those investments, and the impact of any differences based on the stage of operational development of the investee.
All of Autodesk’s marketable securities and strategic investments are subject to a periodic impairment review. Strategic
investments equity securities are assessed based on available information such as current cash positions, earnings, earnings and cash
flow forecasts, recent operational performance and any other readily available market data. For any available-for-sale debt securities,
if Autodesk does not intend to sell and it is not more likely than not that Autodesk will be required to sell the available-for-sale debt
security prior to recovery of its amortized cost basis, Autodesk will determine whether a decline in fair value below the amortized cost
basis is due to credit-related factors. The credit loss is measured as the amount by which the debt security’s amortized cost basis
exceeds the estimate of the present value of cash flows expected to be collected, up to the difference between the amortized cost basis
and the fair value. Impairment will be assessed at the individual security level. Credit-related impairment is recognized as an
allowance on the Consolidated Balance Sheets with a corresponding adjustment to “Interest and other expense, net” on the Company’s
Consolidated Statements of Operations. Any impairment that is not credit-related is recognized in “Accumulated other comprehensive
loss” on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Autodesk does not measure an allowance for credit losses on accrued interest receivables on available-for-sale debt securities
separately. Autodesk writes off accrued interest receivables by reversing interest income in the period deemed uncollectible in
“Interest and other expense, net” on the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations. Any accrued interest receivable on
available-for-sale debt securities is recorded in “Cash and cash equivalents,” “Prepaid expenses and other current assets,” or “Long-
term other assets” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets, as applicable.
For Autodesk’s quarterly impairment assessment of privately held debt and equity securities strategic investment portfolio, the
analysis encompasses an assessment of the severity and duration of the impairment and qualitative and quantitative analysis of other
key factors including: the investee’s financial metrics, the investee’s products and technologies meeting or exceeding predefined
milestones, market acceptance of the product or technology, other competitive products or technology in the market, general market
conditions, management and governance structure of the investee, the investee’s liquidity, debt ratios, and the rate at which the
investee is using its cash.
For additional information, see “Concentration of Credit Risk” within this Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies” and Note 3, “Financial Instruments.”
Derivative Financial Instruments
Under its risk management strategy, Autodesk uses derivative instruments to manage its short-term exposures to fluctuations in
foreign currency exchange rates that exist as part of ongoing business operations. Autodesk’s general practice is to hedge a portion of
transaction exposures primarily denominated in euros, Japanese yen, British pounds, Canadian dollars, Australian dollars, Singapore
dollars, Swiss francs, Swedish krona, and Czech koruna. These instruments generally have maturities between one and 12 months in
the future. Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts not designated as hedging
74
Table of Contents
instruments and foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges but Autodesk does not enter into derivative instrument
transactions for trading or speculative purposes.
The bank counterparties to the derivative contracts potentially expose Autodesk to credit-related losses in the event of their
nonperformance. However, to mitigate that risk, Autodesk only contracts with counterparties who meet the Company’s minimum
requirements under its counterparty risk assessment process. Autodesk monitors counterparty risk on at least a quarterly basis and will
adjust its exposure to various counterparties as necessary. Autodesk generally enters into master netting arrangements, which reduce
credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with the same counterparty. Autodesk does not have any master netting
arrangements in place with collateral features.
Autodesk accounts for these derivative instruments as either assets or liabilities on the balance sheet and carries them at fair
value. Gains and losses resulting from changes in fair value are accounted for depending on the use of the derivative and whether it is
designated and qualifies for hedge accounting. Derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting are adjusted to fair value through
earnings.
In addition to these foreign currency contracts, Autodesk holds derivative instruments issued by privately held companies, which
are not designated as hedging instruments. These derivatives consist of certain conversion options on the convertible debt securities
held by Autodesk and an option to acquire a privately held company. These derivatives are recorded at fair value as of each balance
sheet date and are recorded in “Long-term other assets.” Changes in the fair values of these instruments are recognized in “Interest and
other expense, net.”
Foreign Currency Translation and Transactions
The assets and liabilities of Autodesk’s foreign subsidiaries are translated from their respective functional currencies into U.S.
dollars at the rates in effect at the balance sheet date, and revenue and expense amounts are translated at exchange rates that
approximate those rates in effect during the period in which the underlying transactions occur. Foreign currency translation
adjustments are recorded in other comprehensive income (loss).
Gains and losses realized from foreign currency transactions, those transactions denominated in currencies other than the foreign
subsidiary’s functional currency, are included in “Interest and other expense, net.” Monetary assets and liabilities are remeasured using
foreign currency exchange rates at the end of the period, and non-monetary assets and liabilities are remeasured based on historical
exchange rates.
Foreign Currency Contracts Designated as Cash Flow Hedges
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on a portion of the net revenue or operating
expense of certain anticipated transactions. These currency collars and forward contracts are designated and documented as cash flow
hedges. The effectiveness of the cash flow hedge contracts is assessed quantitatively using regression at inception and thereafter. To
receive cash flow hedge accounting treatment, all hedging relationships are formally documented at the inception of the hedge
relationship and the hedges are expected to be highly effective in offsetting changes to future cash flows on hedged transactions. The
gains and losses on these hedges are included in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and are reclassified into earnings at the time
the forecasted revenue or expense is recognized. In the event the underlying forecasted transaction does not occur, or it becomes
probable that it will not occur, Autodesk reclassifies and discloses the gain or loss on the related cash flow hedge from “Accumulated
other comprehensive loss” to “Interest and other expense, net” in the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements at that time.
Derivative contracts and related gain (loss) are presented within “Net cash provided by operating activities” in the Company’s
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flow. See Note 3, “Financial Instruments” for additional information.
Derivatives Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts that are not designated as hedging instruments to reduce the exchange rate risk associated
primarily with foreign currency denominated receivables, payables, and cash. These forward contracts are marked-to-market at the end
of each fiscal quarter with gains and losses recognized as “Interest and other expense, net.” These derivative instruments do not
subject the Company to material balance sheet risk due to exchange rate movements because gains and losses on these derivative
instruments are intended to offset the gains or losses resulting from the revaluation and settlement of the underlying foreign currency
denominated receivables, payables, and cash.
75
Table of Contents
Accounts Receivable, Net
Accounts receivable, net, consisted of the following as of January 31:
2022 2021
Trade accounts receivable $ 779.8  $ 701.3  
Less: Allowance for credit losses (4.6) (3.8)
Product returns reserve (0.6) (0.7)
Partner programs and other obligations (58.5) (53.7)
Accounts receivable, net $ 716.1  $ 643.1  
Allowances for uncollectible trade receivables and contract assets are subject to impairment using the expected credit loss model.
Allowances for expected credit losses are measured based upon the lifetime expected credit loss which is based on historical
experience, the number of days that billings are past due, reasonable economic forecast, including revised forecast data for the current
economic environment, customer payment behavior, credit reports, and other customer-specific information. Allowances for credit
losses on trade receivables and contract assets were not material as of January 31, 2022.
As part of the indirect channel model, Autodesk has a partner incentive program that uses quarterly attainment of monetary
rewards to motivate distributors and resellers to achieve mutually agreed upon business goals in a specified time period. The majority
of these incentives are recorded as a reduction to deferred revenue in the period the transaction is billed and subsequently recognized
as a reduction to subscription or maintenance revenue over the contract period. The remainder reduces subscription or maintenance
revenue in the current period.
These incentive balances do not require significant assumptions or judgments. Depending on how the payments are made, the
reserves associated with the partner incentive program are recognized on the balance sheet as either a reduction to accounts receivable
or recorded as accounts payable.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Autodesk places its cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities in highly liquid instruments with, and in the custody of,
multiple diversified financial institutions globally with high credit ratings and limits the amounts invested with any one institution,
type of security, and issuer. Autodesk’s primary commercial banking relationship is with Citigroup Inc. and its global affiliates.
Citibank, N.A., an affiliate of Citigroup, is one of the lead lenders and an agent in the syndicate of Autodesk’s $1.5 billion revolving
credit facility.
The bank counterparties to the derivative contracts potentially expose Autodesk to credit-related losses in the event of their
nonperformance. However, to mitigate that risk, Autodesk only contracts with counterparties who meet the Company's minimum
requirements under its counterparty risk assessment process. Autodesk monitors counterparty risk on at least a quarterly basis and will
adjust its exposure to various counterparties as necessary. Autodesk generally enters into master netting arrangements, which reduce
credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with the same counterparty. However, Autodesk does not have any master
netting arrangements in place with collateral features.
Autodesk’s accounts receivable are derived from sales to a large number of resellers, distributors, and direct customers in the
Americas, EMEA, and APAC geographies. Autodesk performs ongoing evaluations of these partners’ and customers’ financial
condition and limits the amount of credit extended when deemed necessary, but generally does not require collateral from such parties.
Total sales to the Company’s largest distributor Tech Data Corporation, and its global affiliates (“Tech Data”), accounted for 36%,
37%, and 35% of Autodesk's net revenue for fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The majority of the net
revenue from sales to Tech Data is for sales made outside of the United States. In addition, Tech Data accounted for 24% and 26% of
trade accounts receivable as of January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. Ingram Micro Inc. (“Ingram Micro”), our second largest
distributor, accounted for 9% of Autodesk’s total net revenue for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022 and 10% of Autodesk’s total
net revenue for both fiscal years ended January 31, 2021 and 2020. No other customer accounted for more than 10% of Autodesk’s
total net revenue or trade accounts receivable for each of the respective periods.
76
Table of Contents
Computer Equipment, Software, Furniture, and Leasehold Improvements, Net
Computer equipment, software, and furniture are depreciated using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of
the assets, which range from three to five years. Leasehold improvements are amortized on a straight-line basis over the shorter of
their estimated useful lives or the lease term. Depreciation expense was $52.0 million in fiscal 2022, $51.4 million in fiscal 2021, and
$51.0 million in fiscal 2020. During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk recorded impairment charges to computer
equipment, software, furniture, and leasehold improvements related to certain vacated leased office facilities in connection with
Autodesk’s move to a more hybrid workforce. See Note 9, “ Leases” for further discussion. Autodesk did not recognize any
impairment losses in fiscal years ended January 31, 2021 and 2020.
Computer equipment, software, furniture, leasehold improvements, and the related accumulated depreciation at January 31 were
as follows:
2022 2021
Computer hardware, at cost $ 137.2  $ 153.3  
Computer software, at cost 55.0 57.9 
Leasehold improvements, land and buildings, at cost 350.5  335.9  
Furniture and equipment, at cost 93.4 88.4 
Computer software, hardware, leasehold improvements, furniture, and equipment, at cost 636.1  635.5  
Less: Accumulated depreciation (473.6 ) (442.7 )
Computer software, hardware, leasehold improvements, furniture, and equipment, net $ 162.5  $ 192.8  
Costs incurred for computer software developed or obtained for internal use are capitalized for application development
activities, if material, and immediately expensed for preliminary project activities and post-implementation activities. These
capitalized costs are amortized straight-line over the software’s expected useful life, which is generally three years.
Software Development Costs
Software development costs for external use incurred prior to the establishment of technological feasibility are included in
research and development expenses. Autodesk defines establishment of technological feasibility as the completion of a working
model. Software development costs incurred subsequent to the establishment of technological feasibility through the period of general
market availability of the products are capitalized and generally amortized over a three-year period, if material. Autodesk had no
material capitalized software development costs at January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021.
Cloud Computing Arrangements
Autodesk enters into certain cloud-based software hosting arrangements that are accounted for as service contracts. Costs
incurred for these arrangements are capitalized for application development activities, if material, and immediately expensed for
preliminary project activities and post-implementation activities. Autodesk amortizes the capitalized development costs straight-line
over the fixed, non-cancellable term of the associated hosting arrangement plus any reasonably certain renewal periods. The
capitalized costs are included in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” on our Consolidated
Balance Sheets. Capitalized costs were $128.4 million and $72.2 million at January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021, respectively.
Accumulated amortization was $16.7 million and $4.9 million at January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021, respectively. Amortization
expense was $11.8 million, $3.7 million, and $1.2 million at January 31, 2022, January 31, 2021, and January 31, 2020, respectively.
Leases
Autodesk determines if an arrangement is a lease at inception. Operating leases are included in “Operating lease right-of-use
assets,” “Operating lease liabilities,” and “Long-term operating lease liabilities” in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Operating lease right-of-use assets represent Autodesk’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and operating lease
liabilities represent the Company’s obligation to make lease payments arising from the lease. Operating lease right-of-use assets and
operating lease liabilities are recognized at commencement date based on the present value of lease payments over the lease term. The
operating lease right-of-use assets also include any lease payments made and are reduced by any lease incentives. Autodesk uses its
incremental borrowing rate, if the Company’s leases do not provide an implicit rate, adjusted for
77
Table of Contents
local country-specific borrowing rates as applicable, based on the information available at commencement date in determining the
present value of lease payments. Options to extend or terminate the lease are considered in determining the lease term when it is
reasonably certain that the option will be exercised. Lease expense for lease payments is recognized on a straight-line basis over the
lease term.
Autodesk has lease agreements with lease and non-lease components. Autodesk accounts for the lease and non-lease
components as a single lease component.
Business Combinations
Autodesk records the tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed in a business combination based on their
estimated fair values at the date of the respective acquisition, with the exception of contract assets and contract liabilities (i.e., deferred
revenue) which are recognized and measured on the acquisition date in accordance with Autodesk’s “Revenue Recognition” policy in
Note 1 “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies”. The fair values assigned to the identifiable intangible assets
acquired were based on estimates and assumptions determined by management. Autodesk recorded the excess of consideration
transferred over the aggregate fair values as goodwill. During the measurement period, which may be up to one year from the
acquisition date, Autodesk may record adjustments to these tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed, with the
corresponding offset to goodwill.
Intangible Assets, Net
Intangible assets include customer relationships, developed technologies, trade names and patents, and other, and the related
accumulated amortization. These assets are presented as “Intangible assets, net” in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The majority of
Autodesk’s intangible assets are amortized to expense over the estimated economic life of the product, which ranges from 1 to 15
years. Amortization expense for intangible assets was $93.5 million in fiscal 2022, $69.9 million in fiscal 2021, and $73.7 million in
fiscal 2020. See Note 1 “Change in Presentation and immaterial correction of error” for a change in the presentation on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets related to intangible assets.
Intangible assets and related accumulated amortization at January 31, 2022 were as follows:
Gross Carrying
Amount (1)Accumulated
AmortizationNet
Customer relationships $ 666.7  $ (374.5 )$ 292.2  
Developed technologies 846.6  (660.9 ) 185.7  
Trade names and patents 116.1 (100.2 ) 15.9 
Other 0.3 (0.3) — 
Total intangible assets $ 1,629.7  $ (1,135.9 )$ 493.8  
_______________ 
(1) Includes the ef fects of foreign currency translation.
Intangible assets and related accumulated amortization at January 31, 2021 were as follows:
Gross Carrying
Amount (1)Accumulated
AmortizationNet
Customer relationships $ 437.3  $ (345.1 )$ 92.2 
Developed technologies 698.4  (609.8 ) 88.6 
Trade names and patents 111.5 (93.0) 18.5 
Total intangible assets $ 1,247.2  $ (1,047.9 )$ 199.3  
_______________ 
(1) Includes the ef fects of foreign currency translation.
78
Table of Contents
The weighted average amortization period for intangible assets during fiscal 2022 was 8.67 years. Excluding in-process research
and development, expected future amortization expense for intangible assets for each of the fiscal years ended thereafter is as follows:
 Fiscal Year ended
January 31,
2023 $ 95.2 
2024 77.1 
2025 67.6 
2026 60.4 
2027 51.7 
Thereafter 141.8  
Total $ 493.8  
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
At least annually or more frequently as circumstances dictate, Autodesk reviews its long-lived assets for impairment whenever
impairment indicators exist. Autodesk continually monitors events and changes in circumstances that could indicate the carrying
amounts of its long-lived assets may not be recoverable. When such events or changes in circumstances occur, Autodesk assesses the
recoverability of these assets.  Recoverability is measured by comparison of the carrying amounts of the assets to the future
undiscounted cash flow the assets are expected to generate generally using Level 3 inputs. If the long-lived assets are impaired, the
impairment to be recognized is equal to the amount by which the carrying value of the assets exceeds its fair market value. Autodesk
recorded impairment charges on lease related right-of-use assets and other long-lived assets related to certain office leases during the
fiscal year ended January 31, 2022. See Note 9, “Leases” for further discussion. Impairment charges in fiscal years ended January 31,
2021 and 2020 were not material.
In addition to the recoverability assessments, Autodesk routinely reviews the remaining estimated useful lives of its long-lived
assets. Any reduction in the useful life assumption will result in increased depreciation and amortization expense in the quarter when
such determinations are made, as well as in subsequent quarters.
Goodwill
Goodwill consists of the excess of the consideration transferred over the fair value of net assets acquired in business
combinations. Autodesk tests goodwill for impairment annually in its fourth fiscal quarter or more often if circumstances indicate a
potential impairment may exist, or if events have affected the composition of reporting units.
When goodwill is assessed for impairment, Autodesk has the option to perform an assessment of qualitative factors of
impairment (“optional assessment”) prior to necessitating a quantitative impairment test. Should the optional assessment be used for
any given fiscal year, qualitative factors to consider include cost factors; financial performance; legal, regulatory, contractual, political,
business, or other factors; entity-specific factors; and industry and market considerations, macroeconomic conditions, and other
relevant events and factors affecting the reporting unit. If, after assessing the totality of events or circumstances, it is more likely than
not that the fair value of the reporting unit is greater than its carrying value, then performing the quantitative impairment test is
unnecessary.
The quantitative impairment test is necessary when either Autodesk does not use the optional assessment or, as a result of the
optional assessment, it is not more likely than not that the fair value of the reporting unit is greater than its carrying value. In situations
in which an entity’s reporting unit is publicly traded, the fair value of the company may be approximated by its market capitalization,
in performing the quantitative impairment test.
Goodwill impairment exists when the estimated fair value of goodwill is less than its carrying value. If impairment exists, the
carrying value of the goodwill is reduced to fair value through an impairment charge recorded in the Company’s statements of
operations. The process of evaluating the potential impairment of goodwill is subjective and requires significant judgment at many
points during the analysis. The value of Autodesk’s goodwill could also be impacted by future adverse changes such as: (i) declines in
Autodesk’s actual financial results, (ii) a sustained decline in Autodesk’s market capitalization, (iii) a significant slowdown in the
worldwide economy or the industries Autodesk serves, or (iv) changes in Autodesk’s business strategy.
79
Table of Contents
For the annual impairment test, Autodesk’s market capitalization was substantially in excess of the carrying value of the
Company as of January 31, 2022. Accordingly, Autodesk has determined there was no goodwill impairment of our reporting unit
during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022. In addition, Autodesk did not recognize any goodwill impairment losses in fiscal 2021
or 2020.
The following table summarizes the changes in the carrying amount of goodwill during the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022
and 2021:
January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021
Goodwill, beginning of the year $ 2,855.7  $ 2,594.2  
Less: accumulated impairment losses, beginning of the year (149.2 ) (149.2 )
Additions arising from acquisitions during the year 936.2  220.8  
Effect of foreign currency translation, measurement period adjustments and other (1) (38.9) 40.7 
Goodwill, end of the year $ 3,603.8  $ 2,706.5  
_______________ 
(1) Measurement period adjustments reflect revisions made to the Company's preliminary determination of estimated fair value of assets and
liabilities assumed.
Deferred Tax Assets
Deferred tax assets arise primarily from tax credits, net operating losses, and timing differences for reserves, accrued liabilities,
stock options, deferred revenue, purchased technologies, and capitalized intangibles, partially offset by U.S. deferred tax liabilities on
acquired intangibles, and valuation allowances against Netherlands, Canada, Australia, California, Michigan and U.S. capital loss
deferred tax assets. Autodesk performs a quarterly assessment of the recoverability of these net deferred tax assets and believes it will
generate sufficient future taxable income in appropriate tax jurisdictions to realize the net deferred tax assets. They are measured using
enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to reverse.
Valuation allowances are established when necessary to reduce gross deferred tax assets to the amount that is more likely than not to
be realized.
Stock-based Compensation Expense
    The following table summarizes stock-based compensation expense for fiscal 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively, as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue $ 25.4 $ 17.2 $ 13.8 
Cost of other revenue 9.1 6.4 5.8 
Marketing and sales 233.5  178.4  149.0  
Research and development 220.5  145.0  120.8  
General and administrative 70.0 52.8 73.0 
Stock-based compensation expense related to stock awards and Employee Qualified
Stock Purchase Plan ("ESPP") purchases 558.5  399.8  362.4  
Tax benefit (53.3) (42.0) (1.1)
Stock-based compensation expense related to stock awards and ESPP  purchases, net $ 505.2  $ 357.8  $ 361.3  
    
Autodesk measures stock-based compensation cost at the grant date fair value of the award, and recognizes expense ratably over
the requisite service period, which is generally the vesting period. Autodesk determines the estimated fair value of stock-based
payment awards for stock options and grants of employee stock purchases related to the employee stock purchase plan using the
Black-Scholes-Merton (“BSM”) option-pricing model. To determine the grant-date fair value of our stock-based payment awards for
restricted stock units and performance stock units, we use the quoted stock price on the date of grant unless the awards are subject to
market conditions, in which case we use the Monte Carlo simulation model. The Monte Carlo simulation model utilizes multiple input
variables to estimate the probability that market conditions will be achieved. These variables include our expected stock price
volatility over the expected term of the award, actual and projected employee stock option exercise behaviors, the risk-free interest
rate for the expected term of the award, and expected dividends. The variables
80
Table of Contents
used in these models are reviewed on a quarterly basis and adjusted as needed. Share-based compensation cost for restricted stock is
measured on the closing fair market value of our common stock on the date of grant. Autodesk uses the following assumptions to
estimate the fair value of stock-based awards:
Fiscal Year Ended Fiscal Year Ended Fiscal Year Ended
 January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021 January 31, 2020
 Performance
Stock Unit ESPPPerformance
Stock Unit ESPPPerformance
Stock Unit ESPP
Range of expected volatilities 36.9% 29.5 - 41.8% 50.7% 39.4 - 45.8% 36.3% 33.0 - 40.0%
Range of expected lives (in years) N/A 0.5 - 2.0 N/A 0.5 - 2.0 N/A 0.5 - 2.0
Expected dividends —% —% —% —% —% —%
Range of risk-free interest rates 0.1% 0.1 - 0.2% 0.3% 0.1 - 0.5% 2.5% 1.7 - 2.5%
Autodesk estimates expected volatility for stock-based awards based on the average of the following two measures: (1) a
measure of historical volatility in the trading market for the Company’s common stock, and (2) the implied volatility of traded options
on the Company’s common stock. The expected volatility for performance stock units subject to market conditions includes the
expected volatility of companies within the S&P North American Technology Software Index with a market capitalization over $2.0
billion, depending on the award type.
Autodesk estimates the expected life of stock-based awards using both exercise behavior and post-vesting termination behavior
as well as consideration of outstanding options. The range of expected lives of ESPP awards are based upon the four six-month
exercise periods within a 24-month offering period.
Autodesk did not pay cash dividends in fiscal 2022, 2021, or 2020 and does not anticipate paying any cash dividends in the
foreseeable future. Consequently, an expected dividend yield of zero is used in the BSM option pricing model and the Monte Carlo
simulation model.
The risk-free interest rate used in the BSM option pricing model and the Monte Carlo simulation model for stock-based awards
is the historical yield on U.S. Treasury securities with equivalent remaining lives.
Autodesk recognizes expense only for the stock-based awards that ultimately vest. Autodesk accounts for forfeitures of stock-
based awards as those forfeitures occur.
Advertising Expenses
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. Total advertising expenses incurred were $80.5 million in fiscal 2022, $60.4 million
in fiscal 2021, and $42.2 million in fiscal 2020.
Net Income Per Share
Basic net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding during the
period. Diluted net income per share is computed using the weighted average shares of common stock outstanding during the period
and potentially dilutive common shares, including the effect of restricted stock units, performance share awards, and stock options
using the treasury stock method.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
The funded status of Autodesk’s defined benefit pension plans is recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The funded
status is measured as the difference between the fair value of plan assets and the projected benefit obligation for the fiscal years
presented. The projected benefit obligation represents the actuarial present value of benefits expected to be paid upon retirement based
on employee services already rendered and estimated future compensation levels. The fair value of plan assets represents the current
market value of Autodesk’s cumulative company and participant contributions made to the various plans in effect.
81
Table of Contents
Net periodic benefit cost is recorded in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and includes service cost, interest cost,
expected return on plan assets, amortization of prior service costs, and gains or losses previously recognized as a component of other
comprehensive income (loss). Certain events, such as changes in the employee base, plan amendments, and changes in actuarial
assumptions may result in a change in the defined benefit obligation and the corresponding change to other comprehensive loss.
Gains and losses and prior service costs not recognized as a component of net periodic benefit cost in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations as they arise are recognized as a component of other comprehensive income (loss) in the Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income. Those gains and losses and prior service costs are subsequently amortized as a component of
net periodic benefit cost over the average remaining service lives of the plan participants using a corridor approach to determine the
portion of gain or loss subject to amortization.
The measurement of projected benefit obligations and net periodic benefit cost is based on estimates and assumptions that reflect
the terms of the plans and use participant-specific information such as compensation, age and years of services, as well as certain
assumptions, including estimates of discount rates, expected return of plan assets, rate of compensation increases, interest rates, and
mortality rates.
Accounting Standards in Fiscal 2022
With the exception of those discussed below, there have been no recent changes in accounting pronouncements issued by FASB
or adopted by the Company during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, that are applicable to the Company.
Accounting Standards Adopted
In March 2020, FASB issued ASU No. 2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform (Topic 848): Facilitation of the Effects of Reference
Rate Reform on Financial Reporting” (“ASU No. 2020-04”), which provides optional expedients and exceptions for applying GAAP
to contracts, hedging relationships, and other transactions affected by reference rate reform if certain criteria are met. The amendments
apply only to contracts, hedging relationships, and other transactions that reference LIBOR or another reference rate expected to be
discontinued because of reference rate reform. The amendments are effective for all entities as of March 12, 2020, through December
31, 2022. The expedients and exceptions provided by the amendments do not apply to contract modifications made and hedging
relationships entered into or evaluated after December 31, 2022, except for hedging relationships existing as of December 31, 2022,
that an entity has elected certain optional expedients for and that are retained through the end of the hedging relationship. Autodesk
will apply the expedients in ASU No. 2020-04 through December 31, 2022. Autodesk does not believe ASU No. 2020-04 will have a
material impact on its consolidated financial statements.
In November 2021, FASB issued ASU No. 2021-08, “Business Combinations (Topic 805), Accounting for Contract Assets and
Contract Liabilities from Contracts with Customers” (“ASU No. 2021-08”), which requires contract assets and contract liabilities (i.e.,
deferred revenue) acquired in a business combination to be recognized and measured by the acquirer on the acquisition date in
accordance with ASC 606 “Revenue from Contracts with Customers” (Topic 606). ASU No. 2021-08 allows an acquirer to assess how
the acquiree applied Topic 606 to determine what to record for acquired revenue contracts. Historically, such amounts were recognized
by the acquirer at fair value in accordance with Topic 805. The amendments are effective for Autodesk's fiscal year beginning
February 1, 2023. Early adoption is permitted, including in interim periods, for any financial statements that have not yet been issued.
Autodesk adopted ASU No. 2021-08 in the fourth fiscal quarter of 2022. ASU No. 2021-08 did not have a material impact on
Autodesk’s consolidated financial statements at adoption.
2. Revenue Recognition
Revenue Disaggregation
Autodesk recognizes revenue from the sale of (1) product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and enterprise business
agreements (“EBAs”), (2) renewal fees for existing maintenance plan agreements that were initially purchased with a perpetual
software license, and (3) consulting, training, and other goods and services. The three categories are presented as line items on
Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations.
82
Table of Contents
Information regarding the components of Autodesk’s net revenue from contracts with customers by geographic location, product
family, sales channel, and product type was as follows: 
 Fiscal Year ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Net revenue by product family:
Architecture, Engineering and Construction $1,959.9  $1,648.6  $1,377.1  
Manufacturing 876.0  798.6  726.1  
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T 1,253.0  1,099.4  948.2  
Media and Entertainment 258.9  219.4  199.2  
Other 38.6 24.4 23.7 
Total net revenue $4,386.4  $3,790.4  $3,274.3  
Net revenue by geographic area:
Americas
U.S. $1,456.5  $1,281.8  $1,108.9  
Other Americas 308.6  260.6  226.9  
Total Americas 1,765.1  1,542.4  1,335.8  
Europe, Middle East and Africa 1,700.4  1,472.6  1,303.5  
Asia Pacific 920.9  775.4  635.0  
Total net revenue $4,386.4  $3,790.4  $3,274.3  
Net revenue by sales channel:
Indirect $2,849.4  $2,600.0  $2,282.2  
Direct 1,537.0  1,190.4  992.1  
Total net revenue $4,386.4  $3,790.4  $3,274.3  
Net revenue by product type:
Design $3,868.8  $3,365.8  $2,920.1  
Make 363.9  296.4  218.4  
Other 153.7  128.2  135.8  
Total net revenue $4,386.4  $3,790.4  $3,274.3  
Payments for product subscriptions, industry collections, cloud subscriptions, and maintenance subscriptions are typically due up
front with payment terms of 30 to 45 days. Payments on EBAs are typically due in annual installments over the contract term, with
payment terms of 30 to 60 days. Autodesk does not have any material variable consideration, such as obligations for returns, refunds,
warranties, or amounts payable to customers for which significant estimation or judgment is required as of the reporting date.
Remaining performance obligations consist of total short-term, long-term, and unbilled deferred revenue. As of January 31,
2022, Autodesk had remaining performance obligations of $4.74 billion, which represents the total contract price allocated to
remaining performance obligations, which are generally recognized over the next three years. We expect to recognize $3.14 billion or
66% of our remaining performance obligations as revenue during the next 12 months. We expect to recognize the remaining $1.60
billion or 34% of our remaining performance obligations as revenue thereafter.
The amount of remaining performance obligations may be impacted by the specific timing, duration, and size of customer
subscription and support agreements, varying billing cycles of such agreements, the specific timing of customer renewals, and foreign
currency fluctuations.
83
Table of Contents
Contract Balances
We receive payments from customers based on a billing schedule as established in our contracts. Contract assets relate to
performance completed in advance of scheduled billings. Contract assets were not material as of January 31, 2022. Deferred revenue
relates to billings in advance of performance under the contract. The primary changes in our contract assets and deferred revenues are
due to our performance under the contracts and billings.
Revenue recognized during the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, that was included in the deferred revenue balances
at January 31, 2021 and 2020, was $2.50 billion and $2.24 billion, respectively. The satisfaction of performance obligations typically
lags behind payments received under revenue contracts from customers.
    
3.     Financial Instruments
The following tables summarize the Company’s financial instruments’ amortized cost, gross unrealized gains, gross unrealized
losses, and fair value by significant investment category as of January 31, 2022 and 2021.
January 31, 2022
Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
Losses Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Cash equivalents (1):
Money market funds $ 302.3  $ — $ — $302.3  $302.3  $ — $ — 
Commercial paper 54.7 — — 54.7 — 54.7 — 
U.S. government securities 25.0 — — 25.0 — 25.0 — 
Custody cash deposit 17.8 — — 17.8 17.8 — — 
Corporate debt securities 17.6 — — 17.6 — 17.6 — 
Certificates of deposit 5.7 — — 5.7 — 5.7 — 
Other (2) 4.0 — — 4.0 — 4.0 — 
Marketable securities:
Short-term
Commercial paper 102.9  — — 102.9  — 102.9  — 
Corporate debt securities 60.7 — 60.7 — 60.7 — 
Asset backed securities 26.3 — — 26.3 — 26.3 — 
Certificates of deposit 13.7 — — 13.7 — 13.7 — 
U.S. government securities 12.5 — — 12.5 — 12.5 — 
Municipal bonds 11.1 — — 11.1 — 11.1 — 
Common Stock — 4.3 — 4.3 4.3 — — 
Other (3) 4.2 — 4.2 4.2 — 
Long-term
Corporate debt securities 44.7 — (0.1) 44.6 — 44.6 — 
Other (4) 0.8 — — 0.8 — 0.8 — 
Mutual funds (5) (6) 74.2 15.6 (0.3) 89.5 89.5 — —
Strategic investments derivative asset (6) 0.1 0.4 (0.4) 0.1 — — 0.1 
Derivative contract assets (6) 1.1 17.1 (0.2) 18.0 — 18.0 
Derivative contract liabilities (7) — — (10.7) (10.7) — (10.7) — 
Total $ 779.4  $ 37.4 $ (11.7)$805.1  $413.9  $391.1  $ 0.1 
____________________ 
(1) Included in “Cash and cash equivalents” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets. These investments are classified as debt securities.
(2) Consists of sovereign bonds and municipal bonds.
(3) Consists of sovereign bonds and supranational bonds.
(4) Consists of asset backed securities.
(5) See Note 7, "Deferred Compensation" for more information.
84
Table of Contents
(6) Included in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” or “Long-term other assets” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(7) Included in “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
 
January 31, 2021
Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
Losses Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Cash equivalents (1):
Commercial paper $ 36.0 $ — $ — $ 36.0 $ — $ 36.0 $ — 
Money market funds 686.9  — — 686.9  686.9  — — 
Other (2) 4.4 — — 4.4 4.0 0.4 — 
Marketable securities:
Short-term available-for -sale
Other (3) 4.0 — 4.0 4.0 — 
Short-term trading securities
Mutual funds (4) 64.5 16.5 — 81.0 81.0 — — 
Strategic investments derivative asset (5) 0.1 0.4 (0.3) 0.2 — — 0.2 
Derivative contract assets (5) 0.4 9.8 (0.4) 9.8 — 9.8 
Derivative contract liabilities (6) — — (17.5) (17.5) — (17.5) — 
Total $ 796.3  $ 26.7 $ (18.2)$804.8  $ 771.9  $ 32.7 $ 0.2 
____________________ 
(1) Included in “Cash and cash equivalents” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets. These investments are classified as debt securities.
(2) Consists of custody cash deposits and certificates of deposit.
(3) Consists of commercial paper and municipal bonds.
(4) See Note 7, "Deferred Compensation" for more information.
(5) Included in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” or “Long-term other assets” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(6) Included in “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The following table summarizes the fair values of investments classified as marketable securities by contractual maturity date
as of January 31, 2022:
Fair Value
Due within 1 year $ 207.9  
Due in 1 year through 5 years 69.2
Total $ 277.1  
Autodesk applies fair value accounting for certain financial assets and liabilities, which consist of cash equivalents, marketable
securities, and other financial instruments, on a recurring basis. The Company defines fair value as the price that would be received
from selling an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.
As of both January 31, 2022 and 2021, Autodesk had no material unrealized losses, individually and in the aggregate, for
marketable debt securities that are in a continuous unrealized loss position for greater than 12 months. Total unrealized gains for
securities with net gains in accumulated other comprehensive income were not material for fiscal 2022.
Autodesk monitors all marketable debt securities for potential credit losses by reviewing indicators such as, but not limited to,
current credit rating, change in credit rating, credit outlook, and default risk. There were no allowances for credit losses as of both
January 31, 2022 and 2021. There were no write offs of accrued interest receivables for fiscal 2022 and 2021.
There were no realized gain or loss for the sales or redemptions of debt securities during fiscal 2022. The sales or redemptions of
debt securities in fiscal 2021 resulted in a net gain of $0.6 million. There were no realized gain or loss for the sales or redemptions of
debt securities during fiscal 2020. Realized gains and losses from the sale or redemption of marketable securities are recorded in
“Interest and other expense, net” on the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations.
85
Table of Contents
Proceeds from the sale and maturity of marketable debt securities for fiscal 2022, 2021, and 2020 were $37.8 million, $17.0
million, and $27.4 million, respectively.
Strategic investment equity securities
    
As of January 31, 2022 and 2021, Autodesk had $133.7 million and $134.1 million, respectively, in direct investments in
privately held companies. These strategic investment equity securities do not have readily determined fair values and Autodesk uses
the measurement alternative to account for the adjustment to these investments in a given quarter. If Autodesk determines that an
impairment has occurred, Autodesk writes down the investment to its fair value.
Adjustments to the carrying value of our strategic investment equity securities with no readily determined fair values measured
using the measurement alternative were as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended Cumulative Amount as of
2022 2021 2020 January 31, 2022
Upward adjustments (1) $ 7.2 $ 6.6 $ 3.2 $ 23.2 
Negative adjustments, including impairments (1) (16.6) (51.6) (4.2) (77.2)
Net adjustments $ (9.4)$ (45.0)$ (1.0)$ (54.0)
____________________ 
(1) Included in “Interest and other expense, net” on the Company’ s Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Autodesk does not consider the remaining investments to be impaired as of January 31, 2022.
During fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk recognized gains of $8.1 million on the disposition of strategic investment
equity securities. During both fiscal years ended January 31, 2021 and 2020, Autodesk recognized no gains on the dispositions of
strategic investment equity securities.
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on a portion of the net revenue or operating
expense of certain anticipated transactions. These currency collars and forward contracts are designated and documented as cash flow
hedges. The notional amounts of these contracts are presented net settled and were $1.08 billion at January 31, 2022, and $1.14 billion
at January 31, 2021. Outstanding contracts are recognized as either assets or liabilities on the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets
at fair value. The majority of the net loss of $24.2 million remaining in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” as of January 31,
2022, is expected to be recognized into earnings within the next 24 months.
86
Table of Contents
The location and amount of gain or loss recognized in income on cash flow hedges together with the total amount of income or
expense presented in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations where the effects of the hedge are recorded were as
follows for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021:
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2022
Net revenueCost of
revenue Operating expenses
Subscription
revenueMaintenance
revenueCost of
subscription
and
maintenance
revenueMarketing
and salesResearch and
developmentGeneral and
administrativeInterest and
other expense,
net
Total amounts of income and
expense line items presented
in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations in
which the ef fects of cash
flow hedges are recorded $ 4,156.4 $ 76.3 $ 299.1 $1,623.1 $ 1,114.8 $ 571.7 $ (52.9)
(Loss) gain on cash flow
hedging r elationships in
Subtopic ASC 815-20
Foreign exchange contracts
Amount of (loss) gain
reclassified from
accumulated other
comprehensive income
into income $ (10.7) $ (1.2) $ (0.5) $ (2.4) $ (1.2) $ (1.2) $ 0.1
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2021
Net revenue Cost of revenue Operating expenses
Subscription
revenueMaintenance
revenueCost of
subscription and
maintenance
revenueMarketing and
salesResearch and
developmentGeneral and
administrative
Total amounts of income and expense
line items presented in the
Consolidated Statements of
Operations in which the ef fects of
cash flow hedges are recorded $ 3,478.9 $ 183.3 $ 242.1 $ 1,440.3 $ 932.5 $ 413.9
Gain (loss) on cash flow hedging
relationships in Subtopic ASC 815-20
Foreign exchange contracts
Amount of (loss) gain reclassified
from accumulated other
comprehensive income into
income $ (0.4) $ 0.1 $ 0.6 $ 2.4 $ 0.5 $ 1.2
Interest rate locks designated as cash flow hedges
During fiscal 2022, Autodesk entered into interest rate lock arrangements to mitigate the risk of changes in interest rates prior
to completion of a debt offering. The interest rate locks hedged the cash flow risk for each of the interest payments on the planned
fixed-rate debt issue. The interest rate lock hedges were terminated in October 2021 in connection with the debt offering completed in
that month. See Note 8, “Borrowing Arrangements,” for further discussion. The aggregate fair value of the terminated interest rate
lock hedges of $4.0 million, net of tax of $0.9 million, was classified as an increase to accumulated other comprehensive income and
is amortized as a reduction to interest expense over the term of the related debt issuance. The Company had cash inflows of $4.0
million in the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, associated with the termination of the interest rate lock arrangements, included in
“Other financing activities” in our Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows.
87
Table of Contents
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts that are not designated as hedging instruments to reduce the exchange rate risk
associated primarily with foreign currency denominated receivables, payables, and cash. The notional amounts of these foreign
currency contracts are presented net settled and were $542.2 million at January 31, 2022, and $434.5 million at January 31, 2021.
Fair Value of Derivative Instruments:
The fair values of derivative instruments in Autodesk’s Consolidated Balance Sheets were as follows as of January 31, 2022,
and January 31, 2021:
 
Balance Sheet LocationFair Value at
January 31, 2022 January 31, 2021
Derivative Assets
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges Prepaid expenses and other
current assets$ 12.2 $ 4.7 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments Prepaid expenses and other
current assets and long-term
other assets5.9 5.3 
Total derivative assets $ 18.1 $ 10.0 
Derivative Liabilities
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges Other accrued liabilities $ 6.9 $ 16.5 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments Other accrued liabilities 3.8 1.0 
Total derivative liabilities $ 10.7 $ 17.5 
The effects of derivatives designated as hedging instruments on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations were as
follows for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively (amounts presented include any income tax effects):
 Foreign Currency Contracts
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Amount of gain (loss), net of tax, r ecognized in accumulated other compr ehensive loss on
derivatives (effective portion) $ 31.0 $ (28.1)$ 3.0 
Amount and location of (loss) gain r eclassified fr om accumulated other compr ehensive loss into
income (effective portion)
Net revenue $ (11.9)$ (0.3)$ 17.6 
Cost of revenue (0.5) 0.6 (0.9)
Operating expenses (4.8) 4.1 (7.1)
Interest and other expense, net 0.1 — — 
Total $ (17.1)$ 4.4 $ 9.6 
88
Table of Contents
The effects of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations were as
follows for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively (amounts presented include any income tax effects):
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Amount and location of gain (loss) r ecognized on derivatives in net income (loss)
Interest and other expense, net $ 11.2 $ (0.8)$ 6.0 
89
Table of Contents
4.     Equity Compensation
Stock Plans
As of January 31, 2022, Autodesk maintained four active stock plans for the purpose of granting equity awards to employees
and to non-employee members of Autodesk’s Board of Directors: the 2012 Employee Stock Plan (as amended, the “2012 Employee
Plan”), which is available only to employees, the Autodesk 2012 Outside Directors’ Stock Plan (“2012 Directors’ Plan”), which is
available only to non-employee directors, the PlanGrid 2012 Equity Incentive Plan (“PlanGrid 2012 Plan”), which is available to
employees who held outstanding unvested options and restricted stock units that were assumed as part of our acquisition of PlanGrid,
Inc. and the BuildingConnected, Inc. 2013 Stock Plan (“BuildingConnected 2013 Plan”), which is available to employees who held
outstanding unvested options that were assumed as part of our acquisition of BuildingConnected, Inc.
The 2012 Employee Plan was approved by Autodesk’s stockholders and became effective on January 6, 2012. Since the 2012
Stock Plan was adopted by stockholders in January 2012, Autodesk has received stockholder approval to increase the number of
shares subject to the plan by 36.1 million shares. The 2012 Employee Plan reserves up to 57.3 million shares which includes 51.3
million shares reserved under the 2012 Employee Plan, as well as up to 6.0 million shares forfeited under certain prior employee stock
plans during the life of the 2012 Employee Plan. The 2012 Employee Plan permits the grant of stock options, restricted stock units,
and restricted stock awards. Each restricted stock unit or restricted stock award granted will be counted against the shares authorized
for issuance under the 2012 Employee Plan as 1.79 shares. If a granted option, restricted stock unit, or restricted stock award expires
or becomes unexercisable for any reason, the unpurchased or forfeited shares that were granted may be returned to the 2012 Employee
Plan and may become available for future grant under the 2012 Employee Plan. As of January 31, 2022, 59.1 million shares subject to
options, restricted stock units, or restricted stock awards have been granted under the 2012 Employee Plan. Options and restricted
stock that were granted under the 2012 Employee Plan vest over periods ranging from immediately upon grant to over a three-year
period and options expire 10 years from the date of grant. The 2012 Employee Plan will expire on June 30, 2022. At January 31, 2022,
6.9 million shares were available for future issuance under the 2012 Employee Plan.
The 2012 Directors’ Plan was approved by Autodesk’s stockholders and became effective on January 6, 2012. The 2012
Directors’ Plan permits the grant of stock options, restricted stock units, and restricted stock awards to non-employee members of
Autodesk’s Board of Directors. Each restricted stock unit or restricted stock award granted will be counted against the shares
authorized for issuance under the 2012 Directors’ Plan as 2.11 shares. As of January 31, 2022, 1.0 million shares subject to restricted
stock units, and restricted stock awards have been granted under the 2012 Directors’ Plan. Restricted stock units that were granted
under the 2012 Directors’ Plan vest over one to three years from the date of grant. On March 12, 2015, the Board reduced the number
of shares reserved for issuance under the 2012 Directors' Plan by 0.9 million shares, so that 1.7 million shares are now reserved for
issuance under the 2012 Directors’ Plan. The 2012 Directors’ Plan will expire on June 30, 2022. At January 31, 2022, 0.7 million
shares were available for future issuance under the 2012 Directors’ Plan.
Pursuant to the PlanGrid acquisition on December 19, 2018, the Company assumed the unvested options and restricted stock
units under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. No further equity awards will be granted under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. As of January 31, 2022,
approximately 67 thousand shares subject to options remain outstanding under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. Options that were granted
under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan vest over a four-year period and expire 10 years from the date of grant. The PlanGrid 2012 Plan will
expire on June 18, 2022.
Pursuant to the BuildingConnected acquisition on January 23, 2019, the Company assumed the unvested options under the
BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. No further equity awards will be granted under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. As of January 31,
2022, approximately 14 thousand shares subject to options remain outstanding under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. Options that
were granted under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan vest over a four-year period and expire 10 years from the date of grant. The
BuildingConnected 2013 Plan will expire on May 6, 2023.
The following sections summarize activity under Autodesk’s stock plans.
90
Table of Contents
Restricted Stock Units:
A summary of restricted stock activity for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, was as follows:
Unreleased
Restricted Stock
Units
(in thousands)Weighted average
grant
date fair value per
share
Unvested restricted stock at January 31, 2021 4,503.9  $ 191.91  
Granted 2,294.1  288.13  
Vested (2,230.7 ) 181.97  
Canceled/Forfeited (526.7 ) 226.00  
Performance Adjustment (1) (7.9) 137.02  
Unvested restricted stock at January 31, 2022 4,032.7  $ 251.17  
_______________
(1) Based on Autodesk’ s financial results and relative total stockholder return for the fiscal 2021 performance period. The performance stock units
were attained at rates ranging from 103.0 % to 108.0 % of the tar get award.
For the restricted stock granted during fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the weighted average grant date fair
values were $288.13, $224.20, and $156.24, respectively. The fair value of the shares vested during fiscal years ended January 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020 were $619.8 million, $503.4 million, and $361.0 million, respectively.
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk granted 2.0 million restricted stock units. Restricted stock units vest
over periods ranging from immediately upon grant to a pre-determined date that is typically within three years from the date of grant.
Restricted stock units are not considered outstanding stock at the time of grant, as the holders of these units are not entitled to any of
the rights of a stockholder, including voting rights. The fair value of the restricted stock units is expensed ratably over the vesting
period.
During the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, Autodesk settled liability-classified awards of $2.7 million and
$28.7 million, respectively. The ultimate number of shares earned was based on the Autodesk closing stock price on the vesting date.
As these awards were settled in a fixed dollar amount of shares, the awards were accounted for as a liability-classified award and were
expensed using the straight-line method over the vesting period.
Autodesk recorded stock-based compensation expense related to restricted stock units of $425.1 million, $308.9 million, and
$274.5 million during fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively. As of January 31, 2022, total compensation
cost not yet recognized of $672.8 million related to non-vested awards is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of
1.6 years. At January 31, 2022, the number of restricted stock units granted but unvested was 3.6 million.
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk granted 0.2 million performance stock units for which the ultimate
number of shares earned is determined based on the achievement of performance criteria at the end of the stated service and
performance period. The performance criteria for the performance stock units vested during fiscal 2022 are based on revenue and free
cash flow goals adopted by the Compensation and Human Resource Committee and, as applicable, total stockholder return compared
against companies in the S&P North American Technology Software Index with a market capitalization over $2.0 billion (“Relative
TSR”). These performance stock units vests over the three-year period and have the following vesting schedule:
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year one, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for fiscal 2022 as well as 1-year Relative TSR (covering year one).
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year two, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for year two as well as 2-year Relative TSR (covering years one and two).
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year three, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for year three as well as 3-year Relative TSR (covering years one, two and three).
91
Table of Contents
Additionally, during fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk granted 0.1 million performance stock units, as part of a
program offering certain employees the option to receive equity in lieu of the opportunity to receive an annual cash incentive award.
The ultimate number of shares earned is determined based on the achievement of performance criteria at the end of the stated service
and performance period. The performance criteria for the performance stock units are based on revenue and Non-GAAP income from
operations targets adopted by the Compensation and Human Resource Committee. The fair value of these performance stock units is
expensed using the accelerated attribution method over the one-year vesting period.
Performance stock units are not considered outstanding stock at the time of grant, as the holders of these units are not entitled to
any of the rights of a stockholder, including voting rights. Autodesk has determined the grant-date fair value for these awards using the
stock price on the date of grant or if the awards are subject to a market condition, a Monte Carlo simulation model. The fair value of
the performance stock units is expensed using the accelerated attribution over the vesting period.
Autodesk recorded stock-based compensation expense related to performance stock units of $68.2 million, $30.7 million, and
$27.1 million during fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 respectively. As of January 31, 2022, total compensation cost
not yet recognized of $10.4 million related to unvested performance stock units, is expected to be recognized over a weighted average
period of 0.6 years. At January 31, 2022, the number of performance stock units granted but unvested was 0.4 million.
Common Stock
Autodesk agreed to issue a fixed amount of $4.9 million in common stock at a future date to certain employees in connection
with a fiscal 2021 acquisition. Issuance of the common stock is dependent on the respective employees’ continued employment
through the vesting period. The number of shares to be issued will be determined based on the closing price of Autodesk’s common
stock at the issuance date. During fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk issued 8,300 shares at an aggregate fair value of $2.7
million. Remaining shares to be issued are estimated to be 9,000 based on the closing price of Autodesk’s common stock on
January 31, 2022, the last trading day of Autodesk’s fiscal 2022 year-end. The awards are accounted for as liability-classified awards
and are recognized as compensation expense using the straight-line method over the vesting period.
Autodesk issued 73,632 shares of restricted common stock to certain employees in connection with a fiscal 2021 acquisition.
These shares of restricted common stock are subject to forfeiture by the employees if employment terminates prior to the three-year
employment period. The fair value of the restricted common stock is recorded as compensation for post-acquisition services and
recognized as expense using the straight-line method over the three-year repurchase period. See Note 6, “Acquisitions,” for further
discussion.
Autodesk issued 9,277 shares of restricted common stock to certain employees in connection with a fiscal 2022 acquisition.
These shares of restricted common stock were recorded as “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets”
on our Consolidated Balance Sheets and will be amortized to stock-based compensation expense for post-acquisition services using
the straight-line method over the two-year vesting period. See Note 6, “Acquisitions,” for further discussion.
Autodesk agreed to issue a fixed amount of $13.1 million in shares of common stock to certain employees in connection with a
fiscal 2022 acquisition. Issuance of the common stock is dependent on the respective employees’ continued employment through the
vesting period. The number of shares to be issued will be determined based on the volume weighted average closing price (“VWAP”)
of Autodesk’s common stock for the ninety consecutive trading day period ending on the release date. Shares to be issued are
estimated to be 48,000 based on the VWAP of Autodesk’s common stock for the ninety consecutive trading day period ending
January 31, 2022, the last trading day of Autodesk’s fiscal 2022 year-end. The awards are accrued as liability-classified awards and are
recognized as compensation expense using the straight-line method over the vesting period. See Note 6, “Acquisitions,” for further
discussion.
Autodesk agreed to issue a fixed amount of $10.6 million in common stock at a future date to certain employees in connection
with other fiscal 2022 acquisitions. Issuance of the common stock is dependent on the respective employees’ continued employment
through the vesting period. The number of shares to be issued will be determined based on the VWAP of Autodesk’s common stock at
the issuance date. Shares to be issued are estimated to be 39,000 based on the closing price of Autodesk’s common stock on
January 31, 2022. The awards are accounted for as liability-classified awards and are recognized as compensation expense using the
straight-line method over the vesting period. Additionally, Autodesk issued 12,782 shares of restricted common stock to certain
employees in connection with these fiscal 2022 acquisitions. These shares of restricted common stock were recorded as “Prepaid
expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” on our Consolidated
92
Table of Contents
Balance Sheets and will be amortized to stock-based compensation expense for post-acquisition services using the straight-line
method over the vesting period. See Note 6, “Acquisitions,” for further discussion.
Autodesk recorded stock-based compensation expense related to common stock shares of $16.5 million and $2.4 million during
the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan (“ESPP”)
Under Autodesk’s ESPP, which was approved by stockholders in 1998, eligible employees may purchase shares of Autodesk’s
common stock at their discretion using up to 15% of their eligible compensation, subject to certain limitations, at 85% of the lower of
Autodesk's closing price (fair market value) on the offering date or the exercise date. The offering period for ESPP awards consists of
four six-month exercise periods within a 24-month offering period.
At January 31, 2022, a total of 5.6 million shares were available for future issuance. Under the ESPP, the Company issues shares
on the first trading day following March 31 and September 30 of each fiscal year. The ESPP does not have an expiration date.
A summary of the ESPP activity for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 was as follows:
Fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Issued shares 0.9 0.9 0.9 
Average price of issued shares $ 130.13  $ 122.73  $ 102.20  
Weighted average grant date fair value of awards granted under the ESPP $ 84.21  $ 55.98  $ 47.78  
Autodesk recorded $37.1 million, $40.1 million, and $33.3 million of compensation expense associated with the ESPP in fiscal
2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table summarizes the number of outstanding options and awards granted to employees and directors, as well as
the number of securities remaining available for future issuance under these plans as of January 31, 2022:
(a) (b) (c)
Plan categoryNumber of securities to
be issued upon exercise
or vesting of outstanding
options and awards (in
millions)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding
optionsNumber of securities remaining
available for future issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities reflected in
column (a)) (in millions) (1)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders 4.1 $ 21.03  13.3 
Total 4.1 $ 21.03  13.3 
____________________ 
(1) Included in this amount are 5.6 million securities available for future issuance under Autodesk’ s ESPP .
93
Table of Contents
5.     Income Taxes
The provision for income taxes consists of the following:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Federal:
Current $ (0.5)$ 9.8 $ (2.3)
Deferred (5.4) (741.0 ) 7.6 
State:
Current 2.5 19.0 (0.4)
Deferred 0.3 (57.5) 2.1 
Foreign:
Current 82.5 87.6 69.6 
Deferred (11.7) 20.6 3.7 
Income tax provision (benefit) $ 67.7 $ (661.5 )$ 80.3 
Foreign pretax income was $559.5 million in fiscal 2022, $527.8 million in fiscal 2021, and $475.5 million in fiscal 2020.
The differences between the U.S. statutory rate and the aggregate income tax provision are as follows:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Income tax provision at U.S. Federal statutory rate $ 118.6 $ 114.8 $ 61.9 
State income tax benefit, net of the U.S. Federal benefit 2.2 (43.0) 1.8 
Foreign income taxed at rates dif ferent from the U.S. statutory rate (25.4) (11.5) (81.0)
Valuation allowance adjustment (0.2) (637.4 ) 93.9 
Transition tax and revisions due to subsequent regulations — — 9.6 
Tax ef fect of non-deductible stock-based compensation 32.3 24.8 29.2 
Stock compensation (windfall) / shortfall (43.2) (35.1) (22.5)
Research and development tax credit benefit (18.5) (15.5) (19.8)
Closure of income tax audits and changes in uncertain tax positions (0.4) 0.1 (2.1)
Tax ef fect of of ficer compensation in excess of $ 1.0 million 7.0 4.6 3.4 
Non-deductible expenses 4.5 2.3 5.4 
Global intangible low-taxed income, foreign derived intangible income 24.1 (65.0) — 
India withholding tax refund (43.8) — — 
Acquisition-related integrations 9.0 — — 
Other 1.5 (0.6) 0.5 
Income tax provision (benefit) $ 67.7 $ (661.5 )$ 80.3 
  _______________
(1) The above comparative for fiscal 2021 and fiscal 2020 have reclassified to conform to the current period presentation.
Autodesk’s fiscal 2022 tax expense is primarily driven by the U.S. and foreign tax expense, including withholding taxes on
payments made to the United States or to Singapore from foreign sources, offset by shared-based compensation deductions, India
withholding tax refunds and generation of federal tax credits.
94
Table of Contents
Significant components of Autodesk’s deferred tax assets and liabilities are as follows:
 January 31,
2022 2021
Stock-based compensation $ 55.8 $ 39.0 
Research and development tax credit carryforwards 249.7  220.4  
Foreign tax credit carryforwards 55.9 69.9 
Accrued compensation and benefits 5.7 3.4 
Other accruals not currently deductible for tax 23.0 14.1 
Purchased technology and capitalized software 88.4 48.2 
Fixed assets 24.5 8.1 
Lease liability 105.7  114.2 
Tax loss carryforwards 53.0 65.5 
Deferred revenue 389.6  501.5  
Other 23.3 40.2 
Total deferred tax assets 1,074.6  1,124.5  
Less: valuation allowance (188.3 ) (186.5 )
Net deferred tax assets 886.3  938.0  
Indefinite lived intangibles (95.4) (83.1)
Right-of-use assets (73.7) (101.6 )
Unremitted earnings of foreign subsidiaries (5.5) (1.6)
Total deferred tax liabilities (174.6 ) (186.3 )
Net deferred tax assets (liabilities) $ 711.7 $ 751.7  
Autodesk regularly assesses the need for a valuation allowance against its deferred tax assets. In making that assessment,
Autodesk evaluates whether it is more likely than not that some or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized based on all
available positive and negative evidence.
In evaluating the need for a valuation allowance, prior to fiscal 2021 Autodesk considered global cumulative losses arising from
the Company’s business model transition as a significant piece of negative evidence. During fiscal 2021 Autodesk recognized
cumulative earnings on a global basis and was profitable in the U.S. and forecasted future cumulative earnings in U.S. jurisdiction for
future periods. In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2021, Autodesk released the valuation allowance against the Company’s U.S. deferred tax
assets, due to positive evidence indicating that these deferred tax assets are more likely than not to be realized. The Company has
retained a valuation allowance against California and Michigan deferred tax assets and deferred tax assets that will convert into a
capital loss upon reversal as we do not have sufficient income of the appropriate character to benefit these deferred tax assets. The
Company continues to retain a valuation allowance of $60.5 million against foreign deferred tax assets in the Netherlands and Canada
as of January 31, 2022, as well as establishing a valuation allowance in Australia.
The valuation allowance increased by $1.8 million in fiscal 2022 primarily due to the generation of deferred tax attributes and
the establishment of a valuation allowance in Australia. The valuation allowance decreased by $696.9 million in fiscal 2021 primarily
due to the U.S. valuation allowance release of $679.0 million. The valuation allowance increased by $85.6 million in fiscal 2020,
primarily due to the generation of deferred tax attributes, net of the fiscal 2020 valuation allowance release of $42.0 million in
Singapore.
    
    We anticipate that the U.S. Department of Treasury and other standard-setting bodies will continue to interpret or issue guidance on
how provisions of the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (“TCJA”) will be applied or otherwise administered. As future guidance is issued,
we may make adjustments to amounts that we have previously recorded that may materially impact our financial statements in the
period in which the adjustments are made.
The company has elected to recognize any potential GILTI obligations as an expense in the period it is incurred.
95
Table of Contents
    As of January 31, 2022, Autodesk had $41.0 million of cumulative U.S. federal tax loss carryforwards and $585.4 million of
cumulative U.S. state tax loss carryforwards, which may be available to reduce future income tax liabilities in federal and state
jurisdictions. The pre-fiscal 2019 U.S. federal tax loss carryforward will expire beginning fiscal 2035 through fiscal 2039. U.S. federal
losses generated beginning in fiscal 2019 do not expire and are carried forward indefinitely. The U.S. state tax loss carryforward will
expire beginning fiscal 2025 through fiscal 2042.
In addition to U.S. federal and state tax loss carryforwards, the Netherlands, Norway, Singapore, and other foreign jurisdictions
incurred tax losses totaling $164.0 million, which may be available to reduce future income tax liabilities. Our Norway and Singapore
losses, of $28.7 million and $85.2 million, respectively, have an indefinite expiration period. The Netherlands losses of $41.3 million
will expire beginning in fiscal 2026 through fiscal 2028, and have a full valuation allowance against them on our balance sheet as the
Company has determined it is more likely than not that these losses will not be utilized.
As of January 31, 2022, Autodesk had $190.8 million of cumulative U.S. federal research tax credit carryforwards, $106.5
million of cumulative California state research tax credit carryforwards, and $49.2 million and $1.4 million of cumulative Canadian
federal research and Ontario minimum tax credit carryforwards, respectively, which may be available to reduce future income tax
liabilities in the respective jurisdictions. The federal research tax credit carryforwards will expire beginning fiscal 2026 through fiscal
2042, the state research tax credit carryforwards may reduce future California income tax liabilities indefinitely, and the Canadian
research tax credit carryforwards will expire beginning fiscal 2030 through fiscal 2042. Autodesk also has $119.3 million of
cumulative U.S. federal foreign tax credit carryforwards, which may be available to reduce future U.S. tax liabilities. These foreign tax
credits will expire beginning fiscal 2025 through fiscal 2032. As discussed above, the California and Canada cumulative assets have
full valuation allowance against them on our balance sheet as the Company has determined it is more likely than not that these losses
and credits will not be utilized.
Utilization of net operating losses and tax credits may be subject to an annual limitation due to ownership change limitations
provided in the Internal Revenue Code and similar state provisions. This annual limitation may result in the expiration of net operating
losses and credits before utilization. No ownership change has occurred through the balance sheet date that would result in permanent
losses of the U.S. federal and state tax attributes.
As of January 31, 2022, the Company had $206.7 million of gross unrecognized tax benefits, of which $33.6 million would
reduce our valuation allowance, if recognized. The remaining $173.1 million would impact the effective tax rate. It is possible that the
amount of unrecognized tax benefits will decrease in the next 12 months for an audit settlement of approximately $7.8 million.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of the gross unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
2022 2021 2020
Gross unrecognized tax benefits at the beginning of the fiscal year $ 198.0  $ 220.6  $ 209.0  
Increases for tax positions of prior years 9.0 12.7 2.8 
Decreases for tax positions of prior years (6.6) (41.1) (0.4)
Increases for tax positions related to the current year 6.7 6.4 11.1 
Decreases relating to settlements with taxing authorities — — — 
Reductions as a result of lapse of the statute of limitations (0.4) (0.6) (1.9)
Gross unrecognized tax benefits at the end of the fiscal year $ 206.7  $ 198.0  $ 220.6  
    
It is the Company’s continuing practice to recognize interest and/or penalties related to income tax matters in income tax
expense. Autodesk had $6.5 million, $4.5 million, and $2.3 million, net of tax benefit, accrued for interest and penalties related to
unrecognized tax benefits as of January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. There was $2.1 million, $2.2 million, and $(0.8)
million of net expense for interest and penalties related to tax matters recorded through the consolidated statements of operations for
the years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
    Autodesk’s U.S. and state income tax returns for fiscal 2002 through fiscal 2022 remain open to examination due to either net
operating loss or credit carryforward. The Internal Revenue Service notified the Company of examination of the Company’s
consolidated federal income tax returns for fiscal 2020 and 2021. This audit commenced in February, 2022.
96
Table of Contents
    Autodesk files tax returns in multiple foreign taxing jurisdictions with open tax years ranging from fiscal 2005 to 2022.
6.     Acquisitions
Fiscal 2022 Acquisitions
The results of operations for the following acquisitions are included in the accompanying Consolidated Statements of
Operations since their respective acquisition dates. Pro forma results of operations have not been presented because the effects of these
acquisitions were not material to Autodesk’s Consolidated Financial Statements.
Upchain
On May 11, 2021, Autodesk acquired 100% of the outstanding stock of Upchain Inc. (“Upchain”), a cloud-based provider of
product lifecycle management and product data management systems, for approximately $126.7 million in cash and Autodesk will
issue a fixed amount of $13.1 million in common stock at future dates to certain employees in connection with the acquisition for a
total consideration of $139.8 million. Of the total consideration transferred, $123.6 million is considered purchase consideration. Of
the remaining amount, $13.1 million is accounted for as liability-classified awards and recognized as compensation expense using the
straight-line method over the vesting period, and $3.1 million was recorded as stock-based compensation expense during the fiscal
year ended January 31, 2022. Issuance of the $13.1 million fixed value in common stock is dependent on the respective employees’
continued employment and vests 40% and 60% on the first and second anniversaries of the closing date, respectively. The number of
shares will be determined based on the VWAP of Autodesk’s common stock for the ninety consecutive trading day period ending on
the release date. The number of shares is estimated to be 48,000 based on the VWAP of Autodesk’s common stock for the ninety
consecutive trading day period ending January 31, 2022, the last trading day of the fiscal quarter. See also Note 4, “Equity
Compensation”.
Autodesk expects to integrate Upchain’s unified cloud platform in Autodesk solutions to centralize data management and process
management.
Innovyze
On March 31, 2021, Autodesk acquired all of the outstanding stock of Storm UK Holdco Limited, the parent of Innovyze, Inc.
(“Innovyze”), a global leader in water infrastructure software. Innovyze is expected to provide comprehensive water modeling
solutions that augment Autodesk’s BIM offerings in civil engineering, and is expected to extend Autodesk’s presence into operations
and maintenance of water infrastructure assets.
The acquisition-date fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $1,038.1 million, which consisted of $1,035.5 million of
cash and 9,277 shares of Autodesk’s restricted common stock at an aggregate fair value of $2.6 million. Of the total consideration
transferred, $1,035.5 million is considered purchase consideration. The remaining amount of $2.6 million was recorded in “Prepaid
expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets”. The 9,277 shares of restricted common stock are subject to forfeiture
until the second anniversary of the acquisition closing date. 50% are released from restriction on both the first and second
anniversaries subject to continued employment. See also Note 4, “Equity Compensation”.
Other Acquisitions
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk completed four additional business combinations. The acquisition-date
fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $113.3 million, which consisted of $98.8 million of cash, a fixed amount of
$10.6 million in common stock to be issued at future dates to certain employees in connection with the acquisition, 12,782 shares of
Autodesk’s restricted common stock at an aggregate fair value of $3.5 million, and $0.4 million of assumed liabilities on behalf of the
sellers. Of the total consideration transferred, $99.2 million is considered purchase consideration. The remaining amounts of
$3.5 million was recorded in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” and $10.6 million is accounted
for as liability-classified awards and recognized as compensation expense using the straight-line method over the vesting period.
97
Table of Contents
Purchase Price Allocation
The acquisitions during fiscal 2022 were accounted for as business combinations. The goodwill recorded was primarily
attributable to synergies expected to arise after the acquisition. Goodwill of $86.7 million, $323.5 million, and $69.7 million is
deductible for U.S. income tax purposes for Upchain, Innovyze, and other acquisitions, respectively. The transaction costs related to
the acquisitions were not material.
The following table summarizes the assets acquired and liabilities assumed by major class for the business combinations that
were completed during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022:
Innovyze Upchain Other Total
Developed technologies $ 93.0 $ 17.6 $ 27.0 $ 137.6  
Customer relationships 221.0  10.4 4.7 236.1  
Trade name 4.0 0.4 0.5 4.9 
Backlog 0.5 — — 0.5 
Goodwill 764.4  98.3 73.5 936.2  
Deferred revenue and long-term deferred revenue (12.3) (2.6) (3.5) (18.4)
Long-term deferred income taxes (42.4) (0.7) (2.5) (45.6)
Net tangible assets (liabilities) 7.3 0.2 (0.5) 7.0 
Total $ 1,035.5  $ 123.6  $ 99.2 $ 1,258.3  
For the business combinations, the allocation of purchase price consideration to certain assets and liabilities as well as the final
amount of purchase consideration are not yet finalized. For the items not yet finalized, Autodesk's estimates and assumptions are
subject to change within the measurement period (up to one year from the acquisition date). The primary areas of the preliminary
purchase price allocation that are not yet finalized are amounts for tax assets and liabilities, deferred revenue, and residual goodwill.
Fiscal 2021 Acquisitions
Spacemaker AS
On November 23, 2020, Autodesk acquired Spacemaker AS (“Spacemaker”). Spacemaker is a leading provider of cloud-based
artificial intelligence technology and generative design enabling architects, urban designers, and real estate developers to optimize and
maximize the potential of a building site, especially during early-stage design.
The acquisition-date fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $252.0 million, which consisted of $214.1 million of cash
and 147,264 shares of Autodesk’s common stock at an aggregate fair value of $37.9 million. Of the total consideration transferred,
$231.1 million is considered purchase consideration. Of the remaining amount, $18.9 million was recorded in “Prepaid expenses and
other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” on our Consolidated Balance Sheets and will be amortized to stock-based
compensation expense, and $2.0 million was recorded as stock-based compensation expense during the fiscal quarter ended
January 31, 2021. The 147,264 shares of common stock are held in escrow until the third anniversary of the acquisition closing date,
and 73,632 of those shares are subject to forfeiture by the employee if employment terminates during the three-year employment
period. See Note 4, “Equity Compensation ,” for further discussion.
Other Acquisitions
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2021, Autodesk also completed two other business combinations. The acquisition-date
fair value of the cash consideration transferred totaled $45.4 million.
The results of operations for Spacemaker and the other acquisitions were included in the accompanying Consolidated Statement
of Operations from the dates of the respective acquisitions. Goodwill of $193.0 million is deductible for U.S. income tax purposes.
98
Table of Contents
Fiscal 2020 Acquisitions
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2020, Autodesk did not complete any business combinations.
7.     Deferred Compensation
At January 31, 2022, Autodesk had investments in debt and equity securities that are held in a rabbi trust under non-qualified
deferred compensation plans and a corresponding deferred compensation liability totaling $89.5 million. Of this amount, $7.1 million
was classified as current and $82.4 million was classified as non-current in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Of the $81.0 million
related to investments and deferred compensation liability in a rabbi trust as of January 31, 2021, $7.3 million was classified as current
and $73.7 million was classified as non-current. The current and non-current asset portions of the investments in debt and equity
securities that are held in a rabbi trust under non-qualified deferred compensation plans are recorded in the Consolidated Balance
Sheets under “Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets,” respectively. The current and non-current
portions of the deferred compensation liability are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets under “Accrued compensation” and
“Long-term other liabilities,” respectively. See Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” for a change in
the presentation and immaterial correction of an error on the Consolidated Balance Sheets related to the investments in a rabbi trust.
Costs to obtain a contract with a customer
Sales commissions earned by our internal sales personnel and our reseller partners are considered incremental and recoverable
costs of obtaining a contract with a customer. The ending balance of assets recognized from costs to obtain a contract with a customer
was $138.5 million and $120.9 million as of January 31, 2022 and January 31, 2021, respectively. These assets are recorded in
“Prepaid expenses and other current assets” and “Long-term other assets” in the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Amortization expense
related to assets recognized from costs to obtain a contract with a customer was $117.8 million, $96.6 million, and $101.6 million
during fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively. Autodesk did not recognize any contract cost impairment
losses during the fiscal years ended January 31, 2022, 2021, or 2020.
8.     Borrowing Arrangements
In October 2021, Autodesk issued $1.0 billion aggregate principal amount of 2.4% notes due December 15, 2031 (“2021
Notes”). Net of a discount of $3.0 million and issuance costs of $9.2 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $987.8 million from
issuance of the 2021 Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the term of the 2021
Notes using the effective interest method. The 2021 Notes were designated as sustainability bonds, the net proceeds of which are used
to fund environmentally and socially responsible projects in the following areas: eco-efficient products, production technologies, and
processes, sustainable water and wastewater management, renewable energy & energy efficiency, green buildings, pollution
prevention and control, and socioeconomic advancement and empowerment.
In September 2021, the Company entered into an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (the “Credit Agreement”) by and
among the Company, the lenders party thereto and Citibank, N.A. (“Citibank”), as administrative agent, which provides for an
unsecured revolving loan facility in the aggregate principal amount of $1.5 billion, with an option to be increased up to $2.0 billion.
The Credit Agreement replaced and terminated the Company’s existing $650.0 million Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, with
an option to be increased up to $1.0 billion, dated as of December 17, 2018, among the Company, the lenders party thereto and
Citibank, N.A., as administrative agent. The revolving credit facility is available for working capital or other business needs. The
Credit Agreement contains customary covenants that could, among other things, restrict the imposition of liens on Autodesk’s assets,
and restrict Autodesk’s ability to incur additional indebtedness or make dispositions of assets if Autodesk fails to maintain compliance
with the financial covenants. The Credit Agreement requires the Company to maintain a maximum leverage ratio of Consolidated
Covenant Debt to Consolidated EBITDA (each as defined in the Credit Agreement) no greater than 3.50:1.00 during the term of the
credit facility, subject to adjustment following the consummation of certain acquisitions up to 4.00:1.00 for up to four consecutive
fiscal quarters. At January 31, 2022, Autodesk was in compliance with the Credit Agreement covenants. Revolving loans under the
Credit Agreement will bear interest, at the Company’s option, at either (i) a per annum rate equal to the Base Rate (as defined in the
Credit Agreement) plus a margin of between 0.000% and 0.375%, depending on the Company’s Public Debt Rating (as defined in the
Credit Agreement), or (ii) a per annum rate equal to the rate at which dollar deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a
margin of between 0.785% and 1.375%, depending on Company’s Public Debt Rating. The Credit Agreement includes customary
provisions to provide for the eventual replacement of LIBOR as a benchmark interest rate. The interest rates for the revolving credit
facility are subject to upward or
99
Table of Contents
downward adjustments, on an annual basis, if the Company achieves, or fails to achieve, certain sustainability-linked targets based on
two key performance indicator metrics: (i) the amount of scope 1 and 2 greenhouse gas emissions from the global operations of the
Company and its subsidiaries during a fiscal year less qualified emissions reduction instruments and (ii) the percentage of employees
of the Company and its subsidiaries identifying as female working in technical roles. The maturity date on the Credit Agreement is
September 30, 2026. At January 31, 2022, Autodesk had no outstanding borrowings under the Credit Agreement.
In January 2020, Autodesk issued $500.0 million aggregate principal amount of 2.85% notes due January 15, 2030 (“2020
Notes”). Net of a discount of $1.1 million and issuance costs of $4.8 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $494.1 million from
issuance of the 2020 Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the term of the 2020
Notes using the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2020 Notes were used for the repayment of $450.0 million 2015 Notes,
as defined below, and the remainder is available for general corporate purposes.
In June 2017, Autodesk issued $500.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.5% notes due June 15, 2027 (the “2017 Notes”).
Net of a discount of $3.1 million and issuance costs of $4.9 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $492.0 million from issuance
of the 2017 Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the term of the 2017 Notes using
the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2017 Notes have been used for the repayment of $400.0 million of debt due
December 15, 2017, and the remainder is available for general corporate purposes.
In June 2015, Autodesk issued $300.0 million aggregate principal amount of 4.375% notes due June 15, 2025 (“ 2015 Notes”).
Net of a discount of $1.1 million, and issuance costs of $2.5 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $296.4 million from issuance
of the 2015 Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the respective terms of the 2015
Notes using the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2015 Notes are available for general corporate purposes.
In December 2012, Autodesk issued $350.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.6% notes due December 15, 2022 (“2012
Notes”). Autodesk received net proceeds of $346.7 million from issuance of the 2012 Notes, net of a discount of $0.5 million and
issuance costs of $2.8 million. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the respective terms
of the 2012 Notes using the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2012 Notes are available for general corporate purposes.
The 2021, 2020 Notes, 2017 Notes, 2015 Notes and the 2012 Notes may all be redeemed at any time, subject to a make whole
premium. In addition, upon the occurrence of certain change of control triggering events, Autodesk may be required to repurchase all
the Notes, at a price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of repurchase. All Notes
contain restrictive covenants that limit Autodesk’s ability to create certain liens, to enter into certain sale and leaseback transactions
and to consolidate or merge with, or convey, transfer, or lease all or substantially all of its assets, subject to important qualifications
and exceptions.
100
Table of Contents
Based on the quoted market prices, the approximate fair value of the notes as of January 31, 2022, were as follows:
Aggregate Principal
Amount Fair value
2012 Notes $ 350.0  $ 355.
2015 Notes 300.0  320.
2017 Notes 500.0  525.
2020 Notes 500.0  503.
2021 Notes 1,000.0  956.
        
The expected future principal payments for all borrowings as of January 31, 2022, were as follows:
Fiscal year ending
2023 $ 350.0
2024 —
2025 —
2026 300.0
2027 —
Thereafter 2,000.0
Total principal outstanding $ 2,650.0
9. Leases
Autodesk has operating leases for real estate, vehicles and certain equipment. Leases have remaining lease terms of less than 1
year to 68 years, some of which include options to extend the lease with renewal terms from 1 year to 10 years and some of which
include options to terminate the leases from less than 1 year to 8 years. Options to extend the lease are included in the lease liability if
they are reasonably certain of being exercised. Options to terminate are considered in determining the lease liability if they are
reasonably certain of being exercised. Payments under our lease arrangements are primarily fixed, however, certain lease agreements
contain variable payments, which are expensed as incurred and not included in the operating lease assets and liabilities. These amounts
include payments affected by the Consumer Price Index, payments for common area maintenance that are subject to annual
reconciliation, and payments for maintenance and utilities. The Company’s leases do not contain residual value guarantees or material
restrictive covenants. Short-term leases are recognized in the Consolidated Statement of Operations on a straight-line basis over the
lease term. Short-term lease expense was not material for the periods presented. Changes in operating lease right-of-use assets and
operating lease liabilities are presented net in the “accounts payable and other liabilities” line in the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows with the exception of “Lease-related asset impairments” which is presented in “Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash
provided by operating activities”.
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2022, Autodesk vacated certain leased office facilities in connection with Autodesk’s
move to a more hybrid workforce. Autodesk recorded total impairment and accelerated depreciation charges of $103.7 million,
consisting of operating lease right-of-use assets of $74.8 million and computer equipment, software, furniture, and leasehold
improvements of $28.9 million. Autodesk assessed the asset groupings for disaggregation based on the proposed changes in use of the
facilities. For asset groups where impairment was triggered, Autodesk utilized an income approach to value the asset groups by
developing discounted cash flow models. The significant assumptions used in the discounted cash flow models for each of the asset
groups included projected sublease income over the remaining lease terms, expected downtime prior to the commencement of future
subleases, expected lease incentives offered to future tenants, and discount rates that reflected the level of risk associated with these
future cash flows. These significant assumptions are considered Level 1 and Level 2 inputs in accordance with the fair value hierarchy
described in Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies.” The operating lease right-of-use assets and other
lease-related assets charges are included in “general and administrative” in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations.
101
Table of Contents
The components of lease cost were as follows:
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2022
Cost of
subscription and
maintenance
revenueCost of other
revenueMarketing
and salesResearch and
developmentGeneral and
administrative Total
Operating lease cost $ 8.1 $ 2.3 $ 43.2 $ 30.3 $ 14.4 $ 98.3 
Variable lease cost 1.0 0.3 5.4 3.8 1.9 12.4 
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2021
Cost of
subscription and
maintenance
revenueCost of other
revenueMarketing
and salesResearch and
developmentGeneral and
administrative Total
Operating lease cost $ 7.2 $ 1.9 $ 45.0 $ 29.2 $ 18.1 $ 101.4  
Variable lease cost 0.9 0.2 5.3 3.5 2.1 12.0 
 
Supplemental operating cash flow information related to leases was as follows:
Fiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2022Fiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2021
Cash paid for operating leases included in operating cash flows (1) $ 106.8  $ 96.3 
Non-cash operating lease liabilities arising from obtaining operating right-of-use assets 52.9 67.4 
  _______________
(1) Includes $ 12.4 million and $ 12.0 million in variable lease payments not included in “Operating lease liabilities” and “Long-term operating lease
liabilities” on the Consolidated Balance Sheet for fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively .
The weighted average remaining lease term for operating leases is 6.9 and 7.3 years at January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively.
The weighted average discount rate was 2.46% and 2.69% at January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively,
Maturities of operating lease liabilities were as follows:
Fiscal year ending
2023 $ 95.8 
2024 87.1 
2025 66.4 
2026 56.0 
2027 38.0 
Thereafter 124.1  
467.4  
Less imputed interest 35.0 
Present value of operating lease liabilities $ 432.4  
 
As of January 31, 2022, Autodesk had no additional operating lease minimum lease payments for executed leases that have not
yet commenced.
102
Table of Contents
10.     Commitments and Contingencies
Purchase Commitments
In the normal course of business, Autodesk enters into various purchase commitments for goods or services. Total non-
cancellable purchase commitments as of January 31, 2022, were approximately $317.6 million for periods through fiscal 2032. These
purchase commitments primarily result from contracts entered into for the acquisition of cloud services, marketing, and commitments
related to our investment agreements with limited liability partnership funds.
Autodesk has certain royalty commitments associated with the sale and licensing of certain products. Royalty expense is
generally based on a fixed rate over a specified period, dollar amount per unit sold or a percentage of the underlying revenue. Royalty
expense, which was recorded under cost of subscription and maintenance revenue and cost of other revenue on Autodesk’s
Consolidated Statements of Operations, was $15.8 million in fiscal 2022, $14.9 million in fiscal 2021, and $14.3 million in fiscal
2020.
Guarantees and Indemnifications
In the normal course of business, Autodesk provides indemnifications of varying scopes, including limited product warranties
and indemnification of customers against claims of intellectual property infringement made by third parties arising from the use of its
products or services. Autodesk accrues for known indemnification issues if a loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated.
Historically, costs related to these indemnifications have not been significant, and because potential future costs are highly variable,
Autodesk is unable to estimate the maximum potential impact of these indemnifications on its future results of operations.
In connection with the purchase, sale, or license of assets or businesses with third parties, Autodesk has entered into or assumed
customary indemnification agreements related to the assets or businesses purchased, sold, or licensed. Historically, costs related to
these indemnifications have not been significant, and because potential future costs are highly variable, Autodesk is unable to estimate
the maximum potential impact of these indemnifications on its future results of operations.
As permitted under Delaware law, Autodesk has agreements whereby it indemnifies its officers and directors for certain events
or occurrences while the officer or director is, or was, serving at Autodesk’s request in such capacity. The maximum potential amount
of future payments Autodesk could be required to make under these indemnification agreements is unlimited; however, Autodesk has
directors’ and officers’ liability insurance coverage that is intended to reduce its financial exposure and may enable Autodesk to
recover a portion of any future amounts paid. Autodesk believes the estimated fair value of these indemnification agreements in excess
of applicable insurance coverage is minimal.
Legal Proceedings
Autodesk is involved in a variety of claims, suits, inquiries, investigations, and proceedings in the normal course of business
including claims of alleged infringement of intellectual property rights, commercial, employment, tax, prosecution of unauthorized
use, business practices, and other matters. Autodesk routinely reviews the status of each significant matter and assesses its potential
financial exposure. If the potential loss from any matter is considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated, Autodesk
records a liability for the estimated loss. Because of inherent uncertainties related to these legal matters, Autodesk bases its loss
accruals on the best information available at the time. As additional information becomes available, Autodesk reassesses its potential
liability and may revise its estimates. In the Company’s opinion, resolution of pending matters is not expected to have a material
adverse impact on its consolidated results of operations, cash flows, or its financial position. Given the unpredictable nature of legal
proceedings, there is a reasonable possibility that an unfavorable resolution of one or more such proceedings could in the future
materially affect the Company’s results of operations, cash flows, or financial position in a particular period, however, based on the
information known by the Company as of the date of this filing and the rules and regulations applicable to the preparation of the
Company’s financial statements, any such amount is either immaterial or it is not possible to provide an estimated amount of any such
potential loss.
11.     Stock Repurchase Program
Autodesk has a stock repurchase program that is used to offset dilution from the issuance of stock under the Company’s
employee stock plans and for such other purposes as may be in the interests of Autodesk and its stockholders, which has the effect of
returning excess cash generated from the Company’s business to stockholders. Autodesk repurchased and retired
103
Table of Contents
approximately 4.0 million shares in fiscal 2022 at an average repurchase price of $275.50 per share, 2.6 million shares in fiscal 2021 at
an average repurchase price of $207.61 per share, and 2.7 million shares in fiscal 2020 at an average repurchase price of $168.63 per
share.
At January 31, 2022, 8.1 million shares remained available for repurchase under the repurchase program approved by the Board
of Directors. The share repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will depend on
factors such as cash generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, cash requirements for
acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price and legal and regulatory requirements.
12.    Interest and Other Expense, net
Interest and other expense, net, consists of the following:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Interest and investment expense, net $ (65.0)$ (51.1)$ (54.0)
Gain on foreign currency 0.4 3.5 3.9 
Gain (loss) on strategic investments 4.0 (41.7) (3.3)
Other income 7.7 6.9 5.2 
Interest and other expense, net $ (52.9)$ (82.4)$ (48.2)
13.     Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
Accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of taxes, consisted of the following:
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Derivative
InstrumentsNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Available
for Sale
SecuritiesDefined
Benefit
Pension
ComponentsForeign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments Total
Balances, January 31, 2020 $ 8.4 $ 4.7 $ (22.8)$ (150.6 )$ (160.3 )
Other comprehensive (loss) income before reclassifications (33.1) 1.5 0.3 64.3 33.0 
Pre-tax (gain) loss reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (4.4) 0.1 1.5 — (2.8)
Tax ef fects 5.0 0.1 (0.3) (0.6) 4.2 
Net current period other comprehensive (loss) income (32.5) 1.7 1.5 63.7 34.4 
Balances, January 31, 2021 (24.1) 6.4 (21.3) (86.9) (125.9 )
Other comprehensive income (loss) before reclassifications 39.4 11.7 0.7 (63.2) (11.4)
Pre-tax loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive
income 17.2 0.1 4.7 — 22.0 
Tax ef fects (8.3) — (0.7) 0.3 (8.7)
Net current period other comprehensive income (loss) 48.3 11.8 4.7 (62.9) 1.9 
Balances, January 31, 2022 $ 24.2 $ 18.2 $ (16.6)$ (149.8 )$ (124.0 )
Reclassifications related to gains and losses on available-for-sale debt securities are included in “Interest and other expense, net.”
Refer to Note 3, “Financial Instruments” for the amount and location of reclassifications related to derivative instruments.
Reclassifications of the defined benefit pension components of net periodic benefit cost are included in “Interest and other expense,
net.”
104
Table of Contents
14.     Net Income Per Share
Basic net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding during the
period. Diluted net income per share is computed using the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding during
the period and potentially dilutive common shares, including the effect of restricted stock units, performance share awards, and stock
options using the treasury stock method. The following table sets forth the computation of the numerators and denominators used in
the basic and diluted net income per share amounts:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2022 2021 2020
Numerator:
Net income $ 497.0  $ 1,208.2  $ 214.5  
Denominator:
Weighted average shares for basic net income per share 219.7  219.4  219.7  
Effect of dilutive securities 2.3 2.7 2.8 
Weighted average shares for dilutive net income per share 222.0  222.1  222.5  
Basic net income per share $ 2.26 $ 5.51 $ 0.98 
Diluted net income per share $ 2.24 $ 5.44 $ 0.96 
The computation of diluted net income per share does not include shares that are anti-dilutive under the treasury stock method
because their exercise prices are higher than the average market value of Autodesk’s stock during the fiscal year. The effect of 0.2
million and 0.1 million potentially anti-dilutive shares were excluded from the computation of diluted net income per share for the
fiscal years ended January 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. There were no potentially anti-dilutive shares excluded from the
computation of diluted net income per share for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2020.
15.     Retirement Benefit Plans
Pretax Savings Plan
Autodesk has a 401(k) plan that covers nearly all U.S. employees. Eligible employees may contribute up to 75% of their pretax
salary, subject to limitations mandated by the Internal Revenue Service. Autodesk makes voluntary cash contributions and matches a
portion of employee contributions in cash. Autodesk’s contributions were $24.3 million in fiscal 2022, $21.6 million in fiscal 2021,
and $21.4 million in fiscal 2020. Autodesk does not allow participants to invest in Autodesk common stock through the 401(k) plan.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
Autodesk provides certain defined benefit pension plans to employees located in countries outside of the United States, primarily
the United Kingdom, Switzerland, and Japan. The Company deposits funds for specific plans, consistent with the requirements of
local law, with insurance companies or third-party trustees, or into government-managed accounts, and accrues for the unfunded
portion of the obligation, where material.
The projected benefit obligation was $106.7 million and $110.0 million as of January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021,
respectively. The accumulated benefit obligation was $99.5 million and $105.2 million as of January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021,
respectively. The related fair value of plan assets was $112.5 million and $107.2 million as of January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021,
respectively. Our defined pension plan assets are measured at fair value and consist primarily of insurance contracts categorized as
level 2 in the fair value hierarchy and an investment fund valued using net asset value. The insurance contracts represent the
immediate cash surrender value of assets managed by qualified insurance companies. The assets held in the investment fund are
invested in a diversified growth fund actively managed by a third party.
Autodesk recognized an aggregate pension liability for the funded status of $9.3 million and $12.1 million in “Long-term other
liabilities” on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of January 31, 2022, and January 31, 2021, respectively. Our total net periodic
pension plan cost was $2.6 million, $2.8 million and $3.7 million for fiscal years 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
Our expected funding for the plans during fiscal 2023 is approximately $4.8 million.
105
Table of Contents
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
Estimated benefit payments over the next 10 fiscal years are as follows:
Pension Benefits
2023 $ 2.9 
2024 1.8 
2025 4.0 
2026 3.4 
2027 3.2 
2028-2032 19.9 
Total $ 35.2 
Defined Contribution Plans
Autodesk also provides defined contribution plans in certain foreign countries where required by statute. Autodesk’s funding
policy for foreign defined contribution plans is consistent with the local requirements in each country. Autodesk’s contributions to
these plans were $38.3 million in fiscal 2022, $31.7 million in fiscal 2021, and $28.7 million in fiscal 2020.
Cash Balance Plans
Autodesk provides a cash balance plan that insures the risks of disability, death, and longevity, in which the vested pension
capital is reinvested and provides a 100% capital and interest guarantee. The weighted-average guaranteed interest crediting rate for
cash balance plans was 1%, 1%, and 1% for mandatory retirement savings and 0.3%, 0.1%, and 0.1% for supplementary retirement
savings for fiscal 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
Other Plans
In addition, Autodesk offers a non-qualified deferred compensation plan to certain key employees whereby they may defer a
portion (or all) of their annual compensation until retirement or a different date specified by the employee in accordance with terms of
the plan. See Note 7, “Deferred Compensation,” for further discussion.
106
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of Autodesk, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Autodesk, Inc. (the Company) as of January 31, 2022, and
2021, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ (deficit) equity, and cash flows for each
of the three years in the period ended January 31, 2022, and the related notes and the financial statement schedule listed in the Index at
Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at January 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended January 31, 2022, in conformity with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal
Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 framework)
and our report dated March 14, 2022 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or
fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due
to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence
regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are
not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or
disclosures to which they relate.
107
Table of Contents
Revenue Recognition
Description of
the MatterAs discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, revenue is recognized when the Company's offerin
are delivered to customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration expected in exchange for products and
services. The Company’s contracts with customers often contain multiple performance obligations. For contracts
with more than one performance obligation, the transaction price is allocated among the performance obligations in
an amount that depicts the relative standalone selling price (“SSP”) of each obligation.
Auditing the Company’s revenue recognition was challenging and complex due to the effort required to analyze the
accounting treatment for the Company’s various software product and service offerings in accordance with ASC 60
Revenue from Contracts with Customers. This involved assessing the impact of terms and conditions of new or
amended contracts with customers or new product or service offerings, the determination of the relative standalone
selling prices for each distinct performance obligation and the timing of recognition of revenue.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of internal controls over
the Company's identification and evaluation of performance obligations, determination of the relative standalone
selling price for each performance obligation, and the determination of the timing of recognition of revenue.
Among other procedures, to evaluate management’s identification and evaluation of the performance obligations an
timing of revenue recognition, we read executed contracts for a sample of sales transactions to understand the
contract, identified the promised goods and services in the contract and identified the distinct performance
obligations. To test management’s determination of relative standalone selling price for each performance obligatio
we assessed the appropriateness of the methodology applied, tested mathematical accuracy of the underlying data
and calculations, and tested a sample of sales transactions to corroborate the data underlying the Company’s
calculations.
Valuation of Innovyze intangible assets
Description of
the MatterDuring fiscal 2022, the Company completed its acquisition of Storm UK Holdco Limited, the parent of Innovyze,
Inc., for consideration of $1,038.1 million, as disclosed in Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements. The
transaction was accounted for as a business combination.
 
Auditing the accounting for the acquisition was complex due to the significant estimation uncertainty of the key
assumptions in determining the fair values of the customer relationships of $221.0 million. The significant estimati
was primarily due to the judgmental nature of the inputs to the valuation models and the sensitivity of the fair value
to certain underlying significant assumptions. In particular for the customer relationships intangible, the significant
assumptions include the projections of future revenue and the impact of customer attrition. These significant
assumptions are forward-looking and could be affected by future economic and market conditions.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe tested the Company's controls over its accounting for acquisitions. Our tests included controls over the
estimation process supporting the recognition and measurement of customer relationships intangible assets. We also
tested management’s review of assumptions used in the valuation models.
To test the estimated fair value of the customer relationships intangible assets, we performed audit procedures that
included, among others, evaluating the Company's selection of the valuation methodology, evaluating the methods
and significant assumptions used by the Company's valuation specialist, and evaluating the completeness and
accuracy of the underlying data supporting the significant assumptions and estimates. We involved our valuation
specialists to assist with our evaluation of the methodologies used by the Company and significant assumptions
included in the fair value estimates. Specifically, when assessing the key assumptions, we focused on the projection
of future revenue and the impact of customer attrition for the customer relationships intangible asset.
                                /s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1983.
San Francisco, California
March 14, 2022
 
108
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of Autodesk, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Autodesk, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2022, based on criteria established in
Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Autodesk, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2022, based on the COSO criteria.
As indicated in the accompanying management’s report on internal control over financial reporting, management’s assessment of
and conclusion on the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting did not include the internal controls of Storm UK
Holdco Limited, the parent of Innovyze, Inc. (“Innovyze”), which is included in the January 31, 2022 consolidated financial
statements of the Company and constituted less than 1% of total assets as of January 31, 2022 and 1% of revenues for the year then
ended. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting of the Company also did not include an evaluation of the internal control
over financial reporting of Innovyze.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of January 31, 2022, and 2021, the related consolidated
statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ (deficit) equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period
ended January 31, 2022, and the related notes and the financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a)(2) and our report
dated March 14, 2022, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1)
pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the
assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being
made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance
regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a
material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
109
Table of Contents
                                /s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
San Francisco, California
March 14, 2022
110
Table of Contents
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
EVALUATION OF DISCLOSURE CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
We maintain “disclosure controls and procedures,” as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”). Our disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that information
required to be disclosed in our Exchange Act reports is (i) recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time periods
specified in the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”), and (ii) accumulated and communicated to Autodesk
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, to allow timely decisions regarding required
disclosure. We conducted an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures as of the end of the period
covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Based upon this evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
have concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective as of January 31, 2022.
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting (as defined in
Rule 13a-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended). Our management assessed the effectiveness of our internal
control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2022. In making this assessment, our management used the criteria set forth by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”) in the 2013 Internal Control—Integrated
Framework. Our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, does not expect that our disclosure
controls and procedures or our internal control over financial reporting will necessarily prevent all errors and all fraud. A control
system, no matter how well conceived and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the objectives of the
control system are met. Further, the design of a control system must reflect the fact that there are resource constraints, and the benefits
of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations in all control systems, no evaluation of
controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within Autodesk have been detected.
In accordance with guidance issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission, companies are permitted to exclude
acquisitions from their final assessment of internal control over financial reporting for the first fiscal year in which the acquisition
occurred. Our management’s evaluation of internal control over financial reporting excluded the internal control activities of Storm
UK Holdco Limited, the parent of Innovyze, Inc. (“Innovyze”), which we acquired March 31, 2021, as discussed in Note 6,
“Acquisitions,” of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements. The exclusion represents internal control over financial
reporting of approximately 1% of consolidated net revenue and less than 1% of consolidated total assets. We have included the
financial results of Innovyze in the consolidated financial statements from the date of acquisition.
Our management has concluded that, as of January 31, 2022, our internal control over financial reporting was effective to
provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external
purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Our independent registered public accounting firm, Ernst &
Young LLP, has issued an audit report on our internal control over financial reporting, which is included in Item 8 herein.
CHANGES IN INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)
under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) during the three months ended January 31, 2022, that have materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
111
Table of Contents
ITEM 9C.     DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS
Not Applicable.
112
Table of Contents
PART III
Certain information required by Part III is omitted from this Annual Report because we intend to file a definitive proxy
statement pursuant to Regulation 14A for our Annual Meeting of Stockholders not later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year
covered by this Annual Report (the “Proxy Statement”) and certain information included therein is incorporated herein by reference.
Only those sections of the Proxy Statement that specifically address the items set forth herein are incorporated by reference.
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Proposal One—Election of
Directors,” “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance,” and “Corporate Governance” in our Proxy Statement.
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
The following sets forth certain information as of March 14, 2022, regarding our executive officers.
Name Age Position
Andrew Anagnost 57 President and Chief Executive Of ficer
Deborah L. Clif ford 47 EVP and Chief Financial Of ficer
Steve M. Blum 57 Chief Operating Of ficer
Pascal W. Di Fronzo 57 EVP, Corporate Affairs, Chief Legal Of ficer & Secretary
Andrew Anagnost joined Autodesk in September 1997 and has served as President and Chief Executive Officer since June
2017. He also served as Interim Chief Financial Officer from January 2021 to March 2021. Dr. Anagnost served as Co-CEO from
February 2017 to June 2017, Chief Marketing Officer from December 2016 to June 2017 and as the Company’s Senior Vice President,
Business Strategy & Marketing, from March 2012 to June 2017. From December 2009 to March 2012, Dr. Anagnost was Vice
President, Product Suites and Web Services of the Company. Prior to this position, Dr. Anagnost served as Vice President of
CAD/CAE products for the manufacturing division of the Company from March 2007 to December 2009. Previously, Dr. Anagnost
held other senior management positions at the Company. Prior to joining the Company, Dr. Anagnost held various engineering, sales,
marketing and product management positions at Lockheed Aeronautical Systems Company and EXA Corporation. He also served as
an NRC post-doctoral fellow at NASA Ames Research Center.
Deborah L. Clifford joined Autodesk as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in March 2021. Ms. Clifford
previously served as Chief Financial Officer of SVMK Inc. (“SurveyMonkey”), an online survey software company, since July 2019.
Prior to joining SurveyMonkey, Ms. Clifford served as Vice President of Financial Planning and Analysis at Autodesk from January
2018 to July 2019, and had served in various finance positions at Autodesk since September 2005, including as Vice President,
Division Finance from July 2014 to December 2017.
Steven M. Blum joined Autodesk in January 2003 and has served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer since
November 1, 2022. He previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer from December 2020 through
January 2022 and as Vice President and Chief Revenue Officer from August 2020 to December 2020. Mr. Blum served as Executive
Vice President, Worldwide Field Operations from December 2020 to November 2021 and as Senior Vice President, Worldwide Field
Operations from September 2017 to December 2020. Mr. Blum served as Senior Vice President, Worldwide Sales and Services from
February 2011 to September 2017. From January 2003 to February 2011, he served as Senior Vice President of Americas Sales. Prior
to this position, Blum was Executive Vice President of Sales and Account Management for Parago, Inc. Blum also held positions at
Mentor Graphics, most recently serving as Vice President of America's sales. Before joining Mentor Graphics, he held engineering and
sales positions at NCR Corporation and Advanced Micro Devices.
Pascal W. Di Fronzo joined Autodesk in June 1998 and has served as Executive Vice President, Corporate Affairs, Chief Legal
Officer & Secretary since December 2016. Mr. Di Fronzo is expected to retire as of May 9, 2022. Mr. Di Fronzo served as Senior Vice
President, General Counsel and Secretary from March 2007 to December 2016. From March 2006 to March 2007, Mr. Di Fronzo
served as Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, and served as Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Assistant
Secretary from March 2005 through March 2006. Previously, Mr. Di Fronzo served in other business and
113
Table of Contents
legal capacities in our Legal Department. Prior to joining Autodesk, he advised high technology and emerging growth companies on
business and intellectual property transactions and litigation while in private practice.
There is no family relationship among any of our directors or executive officers.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Corporate Governance” and
“Executive Compensation” in our Proxy Statement.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Security Ownership of Certain
Beneficial Owners and Management” and “Executive Compensation—Equity Compensation Plan Information” in our Proxy
Statement.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Certain Relationships and
Related Party Transactions” and “Corporate Governance—Independence of the Board” in our Proxy Statement.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Proposal Two—Ratification of
the Appointment of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” in our Proxy Statement.
114
Table of Contents
PART IV
 
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)     The following documents are filed as part of this Report:
1.Financial Statements: The information concerning Autodesk’s financial statements, and the Report of Ernst & Young LLP,
Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID: 42), San Francisco, California, required by this Item is
incorporated by reference herein to the section of this Report in Item 8, entitled “Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data.”
2.Financial Statement Schedule: The following financial statement schedule of Autodesk, Inc., for the fiscal years ended
January 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, is filed as part of this Report and should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated
Financial Statements of Autodesk, Inc.:
Schedule II    Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
Schedules not listed above have been omitted because they are not applicable or are not required or the information
required to be set forth therein is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements or Notes thereto.
3.Exhibits: See Item 15(b) below. We have filed, or incorporated into this Report by reference, the exhibits listed on the
accompanying Index to Exhibits immediately prior to the signature page of this Form 10-K.
(b)     Exhibits:
We have filed, or incorporated into this Report by reference, the exhibits listed on the accompanying Index to Exhibits
immediately prior to the signature page of this Form 10-K.
(c)     Financial Statement Schedules: See Item 15(a), above.
 
ITEM 15(A)(2)FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE
SCHEDULE II: VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
(in millions)
 
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Fiscal YearAdditions
Charged to
Costs and
Expenses or
Revenues DeductionsBalance at
End of Fiscal Year
 (in millions)
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2022
Partner program reserves (1) $ 64.0 623.0  622.8  $ 64.2 
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2021
Partner program reserves (1) $ 60.4 491.9  488.3  $ 64.0 
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2020
Partner Program reserves (1) $ 51.7 453.7  445.0  $ 60.4 
 ____________________
(1) The partner program reserves balance impacts "Accounts receivable, net" and "Accounts payable" on the accompanying Consolidated Balance
Sheets.
ITEM 16 FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
115
Table of Contents
Index to Exhibits 
Exhibit Filed Incorporated by Reference
Number Description Herewith Form SEC File No. Exhibit Filing Date
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Registrant 10-K 000-14338 3.1 3/20/2006
3.2 Amended and Restated Bylaws of Registrant 8-K 000-14338 3.1 3/23/2020
4.1 Indenture dated December 13, 2012, by and between the Registrant and
U.S. Bank National Association8-K 000-14338 4.1 12/13/2012
4.2 First Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated December
13, 2012, by and between the Registrant and U.S. Bank National
Association8-K 000-14338 4.2 12/13/2012
4.3 Third Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated June 8,
2017, by and between the Registrant and U.S. Bank National
Association8-K 000-14338 4.1 6/8/2017
4.4 Fourth Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated January
14, 2020, by and between the Registrant and U.S. National Bank
Association8-K 000-14338 4.1 1/14/2020
4.5 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated October 7, 2021, by and between
Autodesk, Inc. and U.S. Bank National Association, including Form of
Note for Autodesk, Inc.’ s 2.400% Notes due 20318-K 000-14338 4.1 10/7/2021
4.6 Description of Registrant's Capital Stock 10-K 000-14338 4.6 3/19/2020
10.1* Description of Registrant's Performance Stock Unit Program 8-K 000-14338 3/26/2018
10.2* Registrant’ s 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan, as amended
and restated ef fective as of June 12, 201810-Q 000-14338 10.3 8/30/2018
10.3* Registrant’ s 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan Forms of
Subscription Agreement, as amended and restated10-Q 000-14338 10.5 8/30/2016
10.4* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan, as amended and restated
effective as of June 12, 201810-Q 000-14338 10.2 8/30/2018
10.5* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement, as amended and restated10-Q 000-14338 10.2 8/30/2016
10.6* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Severance Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement, as amended and restated10-Q 000-14338 10.3 8/30/2016
10.7* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Stock Option
Agreement8-K 000-14338 10.2 3/13/2012
10.8* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Stock Option
Agreement (non-U.S. Employees)8-K 000-14338 10.4 3/13/2012
10.9* PlanGrid, Inc. 2012 Equity Incentive Plan S-8 333-228934 99.1 12/21/2018
10.10* Amended and Restated BuildingConnected, Inc. 2013 Stock Plan S-8 333-229346 99.1 1/24/2019
10.11* Registrant's 2012 Outside Directors' Stock Plan, as amended and restated 10-K 000-14338 10.18 3/21/2017
10.12* Registrant's 2012 Outside Directors' Stock Plan Form of Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement8-K 000-14338 10.5 3/13/2012
10.13* Registrant's 2012 Outside Directors' Stock Plan Form of Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement10-Q 000-14338 10.1 6/4/2019
10.14* Registrant’ s Executive Incentive Plan, as amended and restated 10-K 000-14338 10.23 3/23/2016
10.15* Registrant’ s 2005 Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan, as
amended and restated, ef fective as of January 1, 201010-Q 000-14338 10.1 12/8/2009
10.16* Executive Change in Control Program, as amended and restated 8-K 000-14338 10.1 12/21/2016
10.17* Sub-Plan of the Autodesk, Inc. 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase
Plan, as amended and restated10-K 000-14338 10.17 3/25/2019
10.18* Form of Indemnification Agreement executed by the Registrant and each
of its of ficers and directors10-K 000-14338 10.8 3/31/2005
10.19 Form of Qualified Retirement Agreement under the Autodesk Amended
and Restated Severance Plan and Summary Plan Description dated
March 25, 202110-Q 000-14338 10.1 9/1/2021
10.20* Employment Agreement, dated as of June 19, 2017, by and between the
Registrant and Andrew Anagnost8-K 000-14338 10.1 6/19/2017
10.21* Deborah Clif ford Of fer Letter dated February 12, 2021 10-Q 000-14338 10.1 6/3/2021
10.22* Autodesk, Inc. Amended and Restated Severance Plan and Summary
Plan Description dated March 25, 202110-Q 000-14338 10.2 6/3/2021
10.23* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Retirement Restricted
Stock Unit Agreement, as amended and restated10-K 000-14338 10.21 3/19/2021
116
Table of Contents
Exhibit Filed Incorporated by Reference
Number Description Herewith Form SEC File No. Exhibit Filing Date
  10.24* Office Lease between Registrant and the J.H.S. Trust for 1 11 McInnis
Parkway , San Rafael, CA, as amended10-Q 000-14338 10.1 10/31/2004
10.25 Fourth Amendment to Lease between Registrant and the J.H.S.
Holdings L.P . for 1 11 McInnis Parkway , San Rafael, CA10-K 000-14338 10.30 3/19/2010
10.26 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated September 30, 2021, by
and a mong Autodesk, Inc., the lenders from time to time party thereto
and Citibank, N.A., as  administrati ve agent, and the other partie s there to8-K 000-14338 10.1 10/4/2021
21.1 List of Subsidiaries X
23.1 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (Ernst &
Young LLP) (filed herewith)X
24.1 Power of Attorney (contained in the signature page to this Annual
Report on Form 10-K)X
31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934X
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934X
32.1† Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002X
101.INS †† XBRL  Instance Document
101.SCH †† XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema
101.CAL  ††XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
101.DEF †† XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
101.LAB
††XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
101.PRE †† XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL  and
contained in Exhibit 101)
 ____________________
*    Denotes a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
†    The certifications attached as Exhibit 32.1 that accompany this Annual Report on Form 10-K are not deemed filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission and are not to be incorporated by reference into any filing of Autodesk, Inc. under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, whether made before or after the date of this Form 10-K, irrespective of any
general incorporation language contained in such filing.
††     The financial information contained in these XBRL  documents is unaudited.     
117
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly
caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
AUTODESK, INC.
By: /s/    ANDREW  ANAGNOST        
Andr ew Anagnost
President and Chief Executive Officer
Dated: March 14, 2022
118
Table of Contents
POWER OF ATTORNEY
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that each person whose signature appears below constitutes and appoints
Andrew Anagnost and Deborah L. Clifford each as his or her attorney-in-fact, each with the power of substitution, for him or her in
any and all capacities, to sign any amendments to this Report on Form 10-K, and to file the same, with exhibits thereto and other
documents in connection therewith, with the Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming all that each of
said attorneys-in-fact, or his substitute or substitutes, may do or cause to be done by virtue hereof.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities as of March 14, 2022.
 
Signature Title
/s/    ANDREW  ANAGNOST         President and Chief Executive Of ficer, Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Andrew Anagnost
/s/    DEBORAH L. CLIFFORD   Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer)
Deborah L. Clif ford
/s/ STEPHEN W. HOPEVice President and Chief Accounting Of ficer
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Stephen W. Hope
/s/    ST ACY  J. SMITH         Director
(Non-executive Chairman of the Board)
Stacy J. Smith
/s/    KAREN BLASING         Director
Karen Blasing
/s/    REID FRENCH Director
Reid French
/s/ AYANNA  HOW ARD Director
Ayanna Howard
/s/    MAR Y T. MCDOWELL         Director
Mary T. McDowell
/s/    BLAKE J. IR VING        Director
Blake J. Irving
/s/    STEPHEN D. MILLIGAN      Director
Stephen D. Milligan 
/s/    LORRIE M. NORRINGT ON        Director
Lorrie M. Norrington
/s/    ELIZABETH RAF AEL     Director
Elizabeth Rafael
119
